TORRES: Controls to full stop, sir. Now reading full stop, sir.
ANNOTATION: (There's a flash of light, and an Elizabethan era soldier appears, complete with breast plate and plumed hat)
Q: Thou are notified that thy kind hath infiltrated the galaxy too far already. Thou art directed to return to thine own solar system immediately.
PICARD: That's quite a directive. Would you mind identifying what you are?
Q: We call ourselves the Q. Or thou mayst call me that. It's all much the same thing.
ANNOTATION: (The same force barrier stops two people exiting the turbolift)
Q: I present myself to thee as a fellow ship captain, that thou mayst better understand me. Go back whence thou camest. (to Helmsman) Stay where thou art!
ANNOTATION: (And the helmsman is frozen solid, phaser in hand)
PICARD: Data, call medics.
TROI: He's frozen.
PICARD: He would not have injured you. Do you recognise this, the stun setting?
Q: Knowing humans as thou dost, Captain, wouldst thou be captured helpless by them? Now, go back or thou shalt most certainly die.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplementary. The frozen form of Lieutenant Torres has been rushed to sickbay. The question now is the incredible power of the Q being. Do we dare oppose it?
Q: Captain, thy little centuries go by so rapidly. Perhaps thou will better understand this.
ANNOTATION: (A flash of light and he is wearing a 20th century US military uniform, with a cigarette in his hand)
Q: Actually, the issue at stake is patriotism. You must return to your world and put an end to the commies. All it takes is a few good men.
PICARD: What? That nonsense is centuries behind us.
Q: But you can't deny that you're still a dangerous, savage child race.
PICARD: Most certainly I deny it. I agree we still were when humans wore costumes like that, four hundred years ago.
Q: At which time you slaughtered millions in silly arguments about how to divide the resources of your little world. And four hundred years before that you were murdering each other in quarrels over tribal god-images. Since there are no indications that humans will ever change.
PICARD: But even when we wore costumes like that we'd already started to make rapid progress.
Q: Oh yeah? You want to review your rapid progress?
ANNOTATION: (Flash, and a change into a padded suit)
Q: Rapid progress, to where humans learned to control their military with drugs.
WORF: Sir, sickbay reports Lieutenant Torres's condition is better.
Q: Oh, concern for one's fellow comrade. How touching.
WORF: And now a personal request, sir. Permission to clean up the bridge.
YAR: Lieutenant Worf is right, sir. As Security Chief I can't just stand here and let
PICARD: Yes you can, Lieutenant Yar.
Q: (taking a snort of something) Oh, better. And later, on finally reaching deep space, humans of course found enemies to fight out there too. And to broaden those struggles you again found allies for still more murdering. The same old story, all over again.
PICARD: No. The same old story is the one we're meeting now. Self-righteous life forms who are eager not to learn but to prosecute, to judge anything they don't understand or can't tolerate.
Q: What an interesting idea. Prosecute and judge. Suppose it turns out we understand you humans only too well.
PICARD: We've no fear of what the true facts about us will reveal.
Q: Facts about you? Splendid, splendid, Captain! You're a veritable fountain of good ideas. There are preparations to make, but when we next meet, Captain, we'll proceed exactly as you suggest.
ANNOTATION: (A flash and he is gone)
WORF: Sir, respectfully submit our only choice is to fight.
SOLDIER: Attention! On your feet. Attention!
ANNOTATION: (Tasha disarms him)
Q: (to soldier) You are out of order. (another soldier kills him) The prisoners will not be harmed until they are found guilty. Dispose of that.
PICARD: Can we assume you mean this will be a fair trial?
Q: Yes, absolutely equitable. Proceed.
BAILIFF: Before this gracious court now appear these prisoners to answer for the multiple and grievous savageries of their species. How plead you, criminal?
DATA: If I may, Captain? Objection, your honour. In the year 2036, the new United Nations declared that no Earth citizen could be made to answer for the crimes of his race or forbears.
BAILIFF: You will answer the charges, criminals.
PICARD: Or what? Or this? Her death? Or worse? You promised the prisoners will not be harmed. We plead nothing so long as you break your own rules.
Q: I suggest you centre your attention on this trial, Captain. It may be your only hope.
PICARD: I suggest you are now having second thoughts it. You are considering that if you conduct a fair trial, which was your promise, you may lose.
Q: Lose?
PICARD: Yes, even though you're judge and prosecutor.
Q: And jury.
PICARD: Accepted, so long as you keep to your agreement. And assaulting prisoners is hardly a fair trial.
Q: This is a merciful court. (Tasha is thawed) Silence! Continuing these proceedings, I must caution you that legal trickery is not permitted. This is a court of
PICARD: court of fact! We humans know our past, even when we're ashamed of it. I recognise this court system as the one that agreed with that line from Shakespeare. Kill all the lawyers.
Q: Which was done.
PICARD: Which led to the rule guilty until proven innocent.
Q: Of course. Bringing the innocent to trial would be unfair. You will now answer to the charge of being a grievously savage race.
PICARD: Grievously savage could mean anything. I will answer only specific charges.
Q: Are you certain you want a full disclosure of human ugliness? So be it, fool! Present the charges.
BAILIFF: Criminal, you will read the charges to the court.
ANNOTATION: (Picard takes his time to read the pad that is handed to him, then gives it back)
PICARD: I see no charges against us, Your Honour.
Q: You are out of order!
ANNOTATION: (Guns are placed at Data and Troi's heads)
Q: Soldiers, you will press those triggers if this criminal answers with any word other than guilty. Criminal, how plead you?
PICARD: Guilty. Provisionally.
Q: The Court will hear the provision.
PICARD: We question whether this court is abiding by its own trial instructions. Have I have permission to have Commander Data repeat the record?
Q: There will be no legal trickery
PICARD: These will be your own words, your Honour. What exactly what followed his Honour's statement that the prisoner will not be harmed?
DATA: Yes, sir. The Captain had asked the question. Can we assume you mean this will be a fair trial? And in reply the judge stated, yes, absolutely equitable.
Q: Irrelevant testimony, entirely irrelevant.
PICARD: Alright! We agree there is evidence to support the court's contention that humans have been savage. Therefore I say test us. Test whether this is presently true of humans.
Q: I see, I see. And so you petition the Court to accept you and your comrades as proof of what humanity has become.
PICARD: There must be many ways we can be tested. We have a long mission ahead of us.
Q: Another brilliant suggestion, Captain. But your test hardly requires a long mission. Your immediate destination offers far more challenge than you can possibly imagine. Yes, this Farpoint station will be an excellent test.
BAILIFF: All present, respectfully stand.
Q: This trial is adjourned, to allow the criminals to be tested.
BAILIFF: This honourable court is adjourned. Stand respectfully.
Q: Captain, you may find you are not nearly clever enough to deal with what lies ahead for you. It may have been better to accept sentence here.
[now in "Battle Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien is unaware the four were ever away)
DATA: What is present course, conn?
YAR: (to Riker) This way, sir.
ANNOTATION: (She sits him down in front of a screen and runs a tape of the Q encounter on the Bridge)
Q: Thou art directed to return to thine own solar system immediately. Go back or thou shalt most certainly die. You can't deny you're still a dangerous, savage, child race.
DATA: Message from the saucer module, sir. It will arrive here in fifty one minutes.
PICARD: Inform them we'll connect as soon as they arrive. And sent the Commander to me when he's finished.
YAR: Yes, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
Q: And four hundred years before that, you were murdering each other in quarrels over tribal god images. Since then there are no indications that humans will ever change. There are preparations to make, and when we next meet, Captain, we'll proceed exactly as you suggest.
RIKER: He calls that a little adventure?
[now in "Battle ready room"]
PICARD: Come.
RIKER: Your exact message. Bon voyage mon ami.
PICARD: What was my answer, computer?
Q: You're wasting time, Captain. (appears on viewscreen) Or did you think I was gone?
PICARD: Lieutenant! Do you intend to blast a hole through the viewer? If the purpose of this is to test humans, your honour, we must proceed in our own way.
Q: You are dilatory. You have twenty four hours. Any further delay and you risk summary judgement against you, Captain.
WORF: Sorry, sir
RIKER: You reacted fast, Mister Worf.
YAR: Phasers locked on, Captain.
ANNOTATION: (There's a flash, and the Judge Q stands there)
Q: Typical. So typical. Savage lifeforms never follow even their own rules.
PICARD: Get off my bridge!
Q: Interesting, that order about phasers.
YAR: Standing by on phasers, Captain.
Q: Please, don't let me interfere. Use your weapons.
PICARD: We've no idea who is on that vessel. My order was a routine safety precaution.
Q: Really? No idea of what it represents? The meaning of that vessel is as plain, as plain as the noses on your ugly little primate faces. And if you were truly civilised, Captain, wouldn't you be doing something about the casualties happening down there?
PICARD: Captain to CMO.
[now in "Sickbay"]
PICARD: Are you reading any of this?
CRUSHER: Medical teams already preparing to beam down, Captain.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Compliments on that, Doctor. Any questions? Starfleet people are trained to render aid and assistance whenever
Q: But not trained in clear thinking.
PICARD: Let's consider your thoughts. You call us savages and yet you knew those people down there would be killed. It is your conduct that is uncivilised.
WORF: Sir, they're firing on the planet again.
RIKER: First officer to Enterprise. We've lost Zorn. Something like a transporter beam seems to have snatched him away.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Question, sir, could it be this Q?
Q: None of you knows who transported him. You're running out of time, Captain.
TROI: Captain, suddenly I'm sensing something else. Satisfaction. Enormous satisfaction.
PICARD: From the same source as before?
TROI: No, that was on the planet. This is much closer.
Q: Excellent, Counsellor. He's such a dullard, isn't he?
CREW: Captain from Transporter Room. First Officer and Mister Data have beamed aboard.
Q: Excellent also. Perhaps with more of these little minds helping
PICARD: That is enough, damn it!
Q: Have you forgotten that we have an agreement,
PICARD: An agreement which you are at this moment breaking by taking over our vessel, interfering with my decisions. Either leave or finish us.
Q: Temper, temper, mon Capitaine. I'm merely trying to assist a pitiful species. But perhaps I will leave if Commander Riker provides me with some amusement.
PICARD: Do nothing that he asks.
Q (JUDGE): But I ask so little, and it's so necessary if you're to solve all this. Beam over there with your what do you call it? Your away team.
PICARD: I'll risk none of my crew on that unknown.
Q: You should already know what you'll find there. Or perhaps it's too adult a puzzle for you.
RIKER: With all respect, Captain, I want to beam over there.
Q: You show promise, my good fellow.
RIKER: Have you understood any part of what he's tried to tell you? Humanity is no longer a savage race.
Q: But you must still prove that.
ANNOTATION: (And he vanishes)
PICARD: At least you impressed him, Number One. That's hopeful.
PICARD: Transporter chief, yank them back now! Riker, acknowledge!
ANNOTATION: (Flash! Q is in a Starfleet uniform)
Q: Your time is up, Captain.
PICARD: Transporter Chief, do you have their coordinates? Transporter Chief!
Q: He can't hear you, Captain.
PICARD: Transporter Chief, come in! I've people in trouble over there, Q.
ANNOTATION: (Q sits himself in the Captain's chair)
PICARD: Everyone at ease. That's an order. Q, my people are in trouble. Let me help them, please. I'll do whatever you say.
ANNOTATION: (The away team and Zorn materialise on the Bridge)
Q: You'll do whatever I say?
PICARD: It seems I did make that bargain.
TROI: The agreement isn't valid, sir. It wasn't Q that saved us.
Q: Save yourself. It may attack you now.
RIKER: It was that which sent us back, Captain.
TROI: Yes sir. It is not merely a vessel, sir. Somehow it is alive.
Q: She lies. Destroy it while you have a chance. Make phasers and photon torpedoes ready.
PICARD: No! Do nothing he demands.
ZORN: Captain, that thing was killing my people!
PICARD: Was there a reason?
Q: It is an unknown, Captain. Isn't that enough?
PICARD: If you'd earned that uniform you're wearing, you'd know that the unknown is what brings us out here.
Q: Wasted effort, considering the human intelligence.
PICARD: Let's test that. Beginning with the tunnels you have under Farpoint, Groppler.
RIKER: Identical to the ones on the space vessel lifeform over there. Why was it punishing you, Groppler?
PICARD: Groppler, you captured something like that, didn't you?
ZORN: Warn my people, please, to leave Farpoint Station immediately!
Q: He lies, Captain. Shouldn't you let his people die?
PICARD: Transmit the message, leave Farpoint Space Station immediately.
TROI: Then it was a pair of creatures I was sensing. One down there in grief and pain, the other up here, filled with anger.
YAR: Energy beam ready, sir.
PICARD: Lock it in on Farpoint Station.
Q: I see now it was too simple a puzzle. Generosity has always been my weakness.
PICARD: Let it have whatever it can absorb. Energise.
ANNOTATION: (A stream of light bathes Farpoint)
YAR: Now getting feedback on the beam, sir.
PICARD: Discontinue. Groppler Zorn, there'll soon be no Farpoint Station, if I'm right about this.
Q: A lucky guess.
ANNOTATION: (Farpoint transforms into another space jellyfish)
ZORN: Please believe me, we meant no harm to the creature. It was starving for energy.
TROI: Sir! Wonderful! A feeling of great joy. And gratitude. Great joy and gratitude, from both of them.
PICARD: Why do you use other lifeforms for recreation?
Q: If so, you've not provided the best.
PICARD: Leave us! We've passed your little test.
Q: Temper, temper, mon Capitaine.
PICARD: Get off my ship.
Q: I do so only because it suits me to. But I will not promise never to appear again.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 41174.2. The agreement for the rebuilding Farpoint Station has been completed per my instructions.
PICARD: All stations?
LAFORGE: Now reading full stop, sir.
ANNOTATION: (There's a flash, and something similar to Prince of Wales' feathers hovers)
Q: Humans, I thought by now you would have scampered back to your own little star system.
PICARD: If this is Q I'm addressing, we are on a mission of rescue where a group of badly injured
Q: We the Q have studied our recent contact with you, and are impressed. We have much to discuss, including perhaps the realisation of your most impossible dream.
PICARD: However intriguing that may be, we are now in the midst of an urgent journey. Once that is completed, then, perhaps
Q: You will abandon that mission, Captain. My business with you takes precedence. If my magnificence blinds you, then perhaps something more familiar.
ANNOTATION: (Flash, and the familiar human shape of John de Lancie, this time costumed as)
Q: Starfleet Admiral Q, at your service.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. Our rescue mission to the Sigma Three solar system has been halted by an immense grid and an untimely visit from Q
PICARD: You're no Starfleet Admiral, Q.
Q: Neither am I an Aldebaran serpent, Captain, but you accepted me as such.
RIKER: He's got us there, Captain.
Q: The redoubtable Commander Riker, whom I noticed before. You seem to find this all very amusing.
RIKER: I might, if we weren't on our way to help some suffering and dying humans who
Q: Your species is always suffering and dying.
PICARD: No, Lieutenant Worf. You'll make no move against him unless I order it.
Q: Pity. You might have learned an interesting lesson. Macro head with a micro brain.
PICARD: You said you had the realisation of impossible dreams to offer us. When this rescue is completed, I am prepared to listen carefully to whatever proposal you wish to make and subject to it being acceptable
Q: Subject to your foolish human values? Oh, come, Picard. Why do you distrust me so?
PICARD: Why? At our first meeting you seized my vessel. You condemned all humans as savages, and on that charge you tried us in a post-atomic twenty first century court of horrors, where you attacked my people. You again seized my vessel.
Q: And that angered you, did it? Seized my vessel, seized my vessel.
PICARD: You interfered with our Farpoint mission. You threatened to convict us as ignorant savages, if, while dealing with a powerful and complex life forms, we made the slightest mistake, and when that didn't happen
Q: The Q became interested in you. Does no one here understand your incredible good fortune? Seized my vessel. These are the complaints of a closed mind too accustomed to military privileges. But you, Riker, and I remember you well, what do you make of my offer?
RIKER: We don't have time for these games.
Q: Games? Did someone say games? And perchance for interest's sake, a deadly game? To the game.
ANNOTATION: (A flash, and Picard is alone on the Bridge)
[now in "Planet surface"]
ANNOTATION: (sand and rocks under a green sky with yellow horizon)
YAR: Sir! Over here.
ANNOTATION: (It's Q, in a French uniform complete with tricorn hat and tricolor cockade)
Q: Join me, Riker. A good game needs rules and planning. Wasn't it your own Hartley who said, nothing reveals humanity so well as the games it plays? Almost right. Actually, you reveal yourselves best in how you play.
DATA: Sir, what he has in mind might provide us with vital information.
ANNOTATION: (Riker joins Q at a table in front of a tent. He picks up a glass to drink)
RIKER: Incredible. I was just thinking about an old-fashioned lemonade.
Q: And so it became that. An excellent thirst quencher. It gets rather hot out on this plain.
RIKER: What about my people?
Q: Whatever they'd like, of course!
ANNOTATION: (Glasses appear in everyone's hands. Worf ostentatiously pours his onto the ground)
Q: Drink not with thine enemy. The rigid Klingon code. That explains something of why you defeated them.
RIKER: You're still fascinated with the human past? Perhaps you're not that original.
Q: Au contraire! It's the human future which intrigues us, and should concern you most. You see, of all species, yours cannot abide stagnation. Change is at the heart of what you are. But change into what? That's the question.
DATA: That is what humans call a truism.
Q: You mean hardly original?
RIKER: You're the one who said it. While we're at it, this isn't part of any human future.
Q: True. I borrowed this from your stodgy Captain's mind. This is dressing for a game that we will play. Now games require rules and rewards and dangers and familiar settings. That sort of thing.
RIKER: This isn't that familiar to me. Data?
DATA: This is from Europe's Napoleonic era, sir. Late eighteenth, early nineteenth centuries. This is a campaign headquarters tent, his uniform is that of a French Army marshal.
RIKER: And a marshal outranks even an Admiral
Q: Well, do you think I would go from a Starfleet Admiral to anything else?
RIKER: Of course you wouldn't. But Napoleonic equipment on an alien planet. One so different it has twin moons?
Q: Well, as you said, I'm nothing if not imaginative. And the game should reflect that. Shall it be a test of strength? Meaningless, since you have none. A test of intelligence, then? Equally as meaningless. But it needs risk, something to win and something to lose.
RIKER: If we must play a game, what would we win?
Q: The greatest possible future that you can imagine. Which, of course, requires something totally disastrous if you lose. Now the point of this game shall be, can any of you can stay alive?
WORF: If your game is fair, we will.
Q: Oh, for shame, Worf. Fairness is such a human concept. Think imaginatively! This game shall in fact be completely unfair.
YAR: You've gone too far!
Q: Game penalty!
ANNOTATION: (Tasha vanishes)
RIKER: Where is she, Q? You can forget your game if
Q: To use a twentieth century term, she's in a penalty box. Where she will remain unharmed unless one of you merits a penalty. Unfortunately, there is only one penalty box. If any of you should be sent there, dear Tasha must give the box up to you.
LAFORGE: And where does she go?
Q: Into nothingness. I entreat you to carefully obey the rules of the game. The only one who can destroy your Tasha now is you.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Captain's log
COMPUTER: Captain's log
PICARD: Don't worry. There's a new ship's standing order on the Bridge. When one is in the penalty box, tears are permitted.
YAR: Captain. Oh, if you weren't a captain.
Q: Consorting with lower rank females, Captain? Especially ones in penalty boxes? Destructive to discipline, they say. But then again, you're what? You're only human? Penalty over.
PICARD: A marshal of France? Ridiculous!
Q: One takes what jobs he can get. For example, star log entry, stardate today. This is Q, speaking for Captain Jean-Luc Picard, who we consider too bound by Starfleet customs and traditions to be useful to us. The Enterprise is now helpless, stuck like an Earth insect in amber while its bridge crew plays out a game whose real intent is to test whether the First Officer is worthy of the greatest gift the Q can offer.
PICARD: So you're taking on Riker this time. Excellent. He'll defeat you just as I did.
Q: Shall we wager on that, Captain? Your starship command against?
PICARD: Against your keeping out of humanity's path for ever. Done?
Q: Done! You've already lost, Picard. Riker will be offered something impossible to refuse.
[now in "Planet surface"]
RIKER: Geordi, can you see Worf?
LAFORGE: I'd see the freckles on his nose if he had them, sir. He's at the third ridge.
ANNOTATION: (Them being soldiers in an camp. And they grunt like pigs. Worf runs back)
[now in "Ready Room"]
PICARD: Listen to me, Q. You seem to have some need for humans.
Q: Concern regarding them.
PICARD: Whatever it is, why do you demonstrate it through this confrontation? Why not a simple, direct explanation, a statement of what you seek? Why these games?
Q: Why these games? Why, the play's the thing. And I'm surprised you have to ask when your human Shakespeare explained it all so well.
PICARD: So he did, but don't depend too much on any single viewpoint
Q: It's a pity you don't know the content of your own library. Hear this, Picard, and reflect. All the galaxy's a stage.
PICARD: World, not galaxy. All the world's a stage.
Q: Oh, you know that one? Well, if he were living now he would have said galaxy. How about this? Life is but a walking shadow, a poor player that struts and frets his hour upon the stage and then is heard no more. It is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing.
PICARD: I see. So how we respond to a game tells you more about us than our real life, this tale told by an idiot? Interesting, Q.
Q: Oh, thank you very much. I'm glad you enjoyed it. Perhaps maybe a little Hamlet?
PICARD: Oh, no. I know Hamlet. And what he might said with irony, I say with conviction. What a piece of work is man. How noble in reason. How infinite in faculty. In form, in moving, how express and admirable. In action, how like an angel. In apprehension, how like a god.
Q: Surely you don't really see your species like that, do you?
PICARD: I see us one day becoming that, Q. Is it that what concerns you?
[now in "Planet"]
LAFORGE: Those soldiers have formed a skirmishing line, I think you'd call it, and they're headed this way.
Q (DATA): Send them the same way as I do. I've given you that power. Do you understand? I have given you the power of the Q. Use it.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
Q: Use your power.
ANNOTATION: (The real Data reappears)
Q: Use your power.
ANNOTATION: (Riker holds up his hand and beams Worf, Data and Geordi away)
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (The forcefield vanishes while Tasha is sitting alone on the Bridge. Everything comes back to life and Picard comes out of the Ready room)
PICARD: I wish I knew. Q first became interested in him at Farpoint. I have no idea what it means. Meanwhile, we must proceed with our rescue mission.
[now in "Planet surface"]
ANNOTATION: (Riker is sitting on a rock, laughing)
Q: Something amuses you? Perhaps you'll share the joke with me?
RIKER: The joke is you.
Q: Strange gratitude, from one who has been granted a gift beyond any human dream. How can you not appreciate being able to send your friends back to their ship, or sending the soldiers back to the nothingness from which they came? Certainly, you must understand that at this moment you can send yourself back to the ship or to Earth, or change your shape and become anything else you want to be.
RIKER: What do you need, Q?
Q: Need?
RIKER: You want something from us, desperately. What is it?
Q: Want something from you foolish, fragile, non-entities? Oh come, Riker. You're beginning to sound like your Captain.
RIKER: Now that's a compliment, Q. But that's not an answer.
Q: Riker, we have offered you a gift beyond all other gifts!
RIKER: Out of the goodness of your heart.
Q: After Farpoint, I returned to where we exist. The Q Continuum.
RIKER: Which means exactly what?
Q: The limitless dimensions of the galaxy in which we exist.
RIKER: I don't understand.
Q: Of course you don't, and you never will until you become one of us.
RIKER: Until? Would you mind going over that again?
Q: Well if you'll stop interrupting me. This is hardly a time to be teaching you the true nature of the universe. However, at Farpoint we saw you as savages only. We discovered instead that you are unusual creatures in your own limited ways. Ways which in time will not be so limited.
RIKER: We're growing. Something about us compels us to learn, explore.
Q: Yes, the human compulsion. And unfortunately for us, it is a power which will grow stronger century after century, aeon after aeon.
RIKER: Aeons. Have you any idea how far we'll advance?
Q: Perhaps in a future that you cannot yet conceive, even beyond us. So you see, we must know more about this human condition. That's why we've selected you, Riker, to become part of the Q, so that you can bring to us this human need and hunger, that we may understand it.
RIKER: I suppose you mean that as a compliment, Q. Or maybe it's my limited mind. But to become a part of you? I don't even like you.
Q: You're going to miss me!
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes and the Bridge crew appear)
LAFORGE: Come on, not again!
PICARD: No, we've learned the Q do not admire us. The Q has muddled your mind.
RIKER: Don't you understand his incredible gift to me?
Q: Are these truly your friends, brother?
ANNOTATION: (Everyone turns to see Q in a monk's habit)
Q: Let us pray. For understanding and for compassion.
PICARD: Let us do no such damned thing! What is this need of yours for costumes, Q? Have you no identity of your own?
Q: I come in search of the truth.
PICARD: You come in search of what humanity is!
Q: I forgive your blasphemy.
PICARD: Don't you see, Riker? He's nothing but a flim-flam man! He's been that ever since we first met him at Farpoint.
WORF: Flim-flam?
Q: You offer Riker jealousy. What I offer him is clearly beyond your comprehension. How can you claim friendship for Riker while obstructing his way to the greatest adventure ever offered a human?
PICARD: Obstructing him? Then it's not yet certain. He's not yet committed.
Q: The truly evil part of this, Captain, is your jealousy. (to Riker) You love each one of your people. Demonstrate it. You have the power to leave each of them with a gift proving your affection.
RIKER: There'd be no harm, would there, if I gave them something I know they'd like?
Q: How touching. A plea to his former Captain. May I please give some happiness to my friends, sir? Please sir?
PICARD: In fact I authorise and support your idea, Riker. Please, feel free to cooperate with him if you wish.
DATA: Are you certain, sir?
LAFORGE: Worf, is this your idea of sex?
WORF: This is sex. But I have no place for it in my life now.
Q: No place, micro-brain? What possesses you?
WESLEY: Commander Riker, it's too soon for this.
RIKER: If this is because your mother objects?
WESLEY: No. I just want to get there on my own. Honest.
Q: But it's easier, boy. Listen to Riker.
RIKER: How did you know, sir? I feel like such an idiot.
PICARD: Quite right. So you should. It's all over, Q. You have no further business here.
Q: Human, you have just destroyed yourself.
PICARD: Pay off your wager.
Q: I recall no wager!
PICARD: I'm sure your fellow Q remember you agreed to never trouble our species again. Just as they're aware you failed to tempt a human to join you.
Q: (to the ceiling) No, if I could just do one more thing.
PICARD: Q, I strongly suspect it's some explaining you have to do now.
ANNOTATION: (Q screams as he disappears. Wesley returns to gangly teenager, the Klingon woman vanishes and everyone is moved to new positions)
ANNOTATION: (But instead of a deck, he steps out into a shuttlecraft in space)
PICARD: Crewman? What is going on?
Q: Welcome, Picard, to shuttlecraft six.
PICARD: Q.
Q: There, there, haven't we been careless. A little cleaning service I'm only too than happy to provide.
ANNOTATION: (A wave of the hand and the uniform is clean again)
PICARD: We agreed you would never trouble my ship again!
Q: I always keep my arrangements, sir. Look, we're nowhere near your vessel.
[now in "Corridor"]
LAFORGE: I read your graduating thesis. Now, I wouldn't have requested you if you weren't the best.
SONYA: Where are we going?
RIKER: No Guinan, nothing out of the ordinary. Why do you ask?
[now in "Ten Forward"]
GUINAN: I'm not sure. It's just a feeling. I've had it a couple of times before. It's probably nothing. Forget that I called. Ten Forward out.
[now in "Shuttlecraft"]
Q: The locator beacon won't help. They'll never think to look for you this far away.
PICARD: Enterprise, this is Picard. Stop this foolishness, Q. Return me to the Enterprise.
Q: I suggest you change your attitude. Petulance does not become you. We have business, Picard.
PICARD: Keeping me a prisoner here will not compel me to discuss anything with you.
Q: It will in time.
[now in "Ten forward"]
SONYA: I appreciate your advice, Lieutenant. And, I'll take it to heart.
LAFORGE: Guinan?
RIKER: Widen the area.
[now in "Shuttlecraft"]
ANNOTATION: (Q is doing his Virgil Hilts impression with a baseball, glove and bulkhead)
Q: Do we stay out here years? Decades? I am ageless, Picard. You are not.
PICARD: The Enterprise will continue with Riker as Captain.
Q: You are an impossibly stubborn human.
PICARD: Return me to my ship!
Q: If I return you to your ship, will you agree to give my request a full hearing?
[now in "Ten forward"]
ANNOTATION: (a seamless transition to an empty room)
Q: You're right Picard. This is the proper venue for our discussion.
ANNOTATION: (Guinan pops up from behind the bar)
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Commander. My status board indicates that the shuttle is back in bay two.
COMPUTER: Captain Picard is in Ten Forward.
[now in "Ten forward"]
GUINAN: I knew it was you.
Q: You! Picard, if you had half the sense you pretend to have, you would get her off your ship immediately. And if you like, I'd be more than pleased to expedite her departure.
PICARD: You know him?
GUINAN: We have had some dealings.
Q: Those dealings were two centuries ago. This creature is not what she appears to be. She's an imp, and where she goes, trouble always follows.
PICARD: You're speaking of yourself, Q, not Guinan.
Q: Guinan? Is that your name now?
PICARD: Guinan is not the issue here. You are. We had an agreement that you would stop meddling with us.
Q: And so I have.
PICARD: What do you want, Q? You state your business. Get on with it.
Q: I agree, Captain. Enough about this creature. She's diverting us from the purpose of my being here.
ANNOTATION: (Riker enters with Worf)
RIKER: Which is?
Q: Ah, the redoubtable Commander Riker. And Micro-brain. Growl for me. Let me know you still care.
PICARD: Worf.
Q: My purpose is to join you.
RIKER: To join us as what?
Q: As a member of the crew. Willing and able. Ready to serve. This ship is already home for the indigent, the unwanted, the unworthy. Why not for a homeless entity.
RIKER: Homeless?
Q: Yes.
RIKER: The other members of the Q continuum kicked you out.
GUINAN: Not all the Q are alike. Some are almost respectable.
PICARD: Ready and willing. Able to serve. What would you do? Would you start as an ordinary crewman? What task is too menial for an entity?
Q: Sir, do you mock me?
PICARD: Not at all. That's the last thing I would do. You, by definition, are part of our charter. Our mission is to go forth to seek out new and different life forms, and you certainly qualify as one of the most unique I've ever encountered. To learn about you is, frankly, provocative. But you're next of kin to chaos.
Q: Captain, at least allow me to present my argument.
PICARD: Worf.
ANNOTATION: (Worf goes to stand guard outside)
Q: After our last encounter, I was asked to leave the Q Continuum. Since then, I've been wandering vaguely, bored really, my existence without purpose. Then I remembered all the good times I had with you.
RIKER: The good times? The first time we met you, you put us on trial for the crimes of humanity.
Q: Of which you were exonerated.
RIKER: The next time we saw you, you asked me to join the Q Continuum.
Q: A big mistake that you did not accept my offer. More and more I realise that here, here is where I want to be. Think of the advantages. Now, I neither expect nor require any special treatment. And if necessary, although I can't imagine why, I will renounce my powers and become as weak and incompetent as all of you.
PICARD: No.
Q: No? Oh, Captain, in fairness, let me try, I deserve at least that much.
RIKER: In fairness? You disrupt this ship, you kidnap the Captain.
Q: I add a little excitement, a little spice to your lives, and all you do is complain. Where's your adventurous spirit, your imagination. Think, Picard, think. Think of the possibilities.
PICARD: Simply speaking, we don't trust you.
Q: Oh. Well, you may not trust me, but you do need me. You're not prepared for what awaits you.
PICARD: How can we be prepared for that which we do not know? But I do know that we are ready to encounter it.
Q: Really?
PICARD: yes. Absolutely. That's why we're out here.
Q: Oh, the arrogance. They don't have a clue as to what's out here.
GUINAN: But they will learn, adapt. That is their greatest advantage.
Q: They're moving faster than expected, further than they should.
PICARD: By whose calculations?
Q: You judge yourselves against the pitiful adversaries you have encountered so far. The Romulans, the Klingons. They are nothing compared to what's waiting. Picard, you are about to move into areas of the galaxy containing wonders more incredible than you can possibly imagine, and terrors to freeze your soul. I offer myself as guide only to be rejected out of hand.
RIKER: We'll just have to do the best we can without you.
Q: What justifies that smugness?
PICARD: Not smugness, not arrogance. But we are resolute, we are determined, and your help is not required.
Q: We'll just have to see how ready you are.
GUINAN: Q!
ANNOTATION: (The Enterprise is thrown through space at even more incredible speed than usual)
DATA: At maximum warp, in two years, seven months, three days, eighteen hours we would reach Starbase one eight five.
RIKER: Why?
Q: Why? Why, to give you a taste of your future, a preview of things to come. Con permiso, Capitan. The hall is rented, the orchestra engaged. It's now time to see if you can dance.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
PICARD: Guinan, your people have been in this part of the galaxy.
PICARD: Lieutenant? Status.
LAFORGE: It seemed to make a visual survey of the engine core, sir, then it moved in here.
Q: Interesting, isn't it? Not a he, not a she. Not like anything you've ever seen. An enhanced humanoid.
PICARD: What is it you want? We mean you no harm. Do you understand me?
Q: Understand you? You're nothing to him. He's not interested in your life form. He's just a scout, the first of many. He's here to analyse your technology. He may attempt to gain control of the ship. I wouldn't let him.
ANNOTATION: (The mechanical arm is used to pass a green light to the console)
PICARD: Stop! I cannot allow you to interfere with the operation of this ship. Mister Worf.
PICARD: That would have definite advantages.
TROI: Yes, A single leader can make mistakes. It's far less likely in the combined whole.
Q: Picard. Picard, are you sure you don't want me as a member of your crew?
WORF: Captain, the Borg have locked on to us with some form of tractor beam.
PICARD: We're on our way.
PICARD: Anything would help.
GUINAN: They're made up of organic and artificial life which has been developing for thousands of centuries.
Q: The Borg is the ultimate user. They're unlike any threat your Federation has ever faced. They're not interested in political conquest, wealth or power as you know it. They're simply interested in your ship, its technology. They've identified it as something they can consume.
RIKER: You brought us here, you exposed us to them, and you cost us the lives of our shipmates
Q: Oh, please.
PICARD: Number One. Eighteen of our people have died. Please, tell us this is one of your illusions.
Q: Oh, no. This is as real as your so called life gets.
ANNOTATION: (And he vanishes)
LAFORGE: This is Lieutenant La Forge, Captain. We've been able to restore power to the shields.
LAFORGE: Bridge, this is Engineering. We are now at warp nine point six five.
WORF: The Borg are still gaining.
Q: They will follow this ship until you exhaust your fuel. They will wear down your defences. Then you will be theirs. Admit it, Picard. You're out of your league. You should have stayed where you belonged.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log supplemental. We are unable to maintain the gap between the Enterprise and the Borg ship.
LAFORGE: Engineering to Bridge.
PICARD: Fire the photons.
WORF: The Borg ship was not damaged.
Q: You can't outrun them. You can't destroy them. If you damage them, the essence of what they are remains. They regenerate and keep coming. Eventually you will weaken, your reserves will be gone. They are relentless.
WORF: The Borg ship is firing. We have lost shields again.
[now in "Engineering"]
LAFORGE: Captain, we've just lost the warp engines.
[now in "Bridge"]
Q: Where's your stubbornness now, Picard, your arrogance? Do you still profess to be prepared for what awaits you?
WORF: The Borg ship is re-establishing its tractor beam.
RIKER: Lock on photon torpedoes.
RIKER: Prepare to fire.
ANNOTATION: (Q swaps places with Data)
Q: I'll be leaving now. You thought you could handle it, so handle it.
PICARD: Q. End this.
Q: Moi? What makes you think I am either inclined or capable to terminate this encounter?
PICARD: If we all die, here, now, you will not be able to gloat. You wanted to frighten us. We're frightened. You wanted to show us that we were inadequate. For the moment, I grant that. You wanted me to say I need you. I need you!
ANNOTATION: (With a snap of Q's fingers, the Enterprise goes whirling through space again)
WESLEY: Zero seven zero, mark six three, sir. Back where we started.
ANNOTATION: (Q swaps places with Riker)
Q: That was a difficult admission. Another man would have been humiliated to say those words. Another man would have rather died than ask for help.
PICARD: I understand what you've done here, Q, but I think the lesson could have been learned without the loss of eighteen members of my crew.
Q: If you can't take a little bloody nose, maybe you ought to go back home and crawl under your bed. It's not safe out here. It's wondrous, with treasures to satiate desires both subtle and gross, but it's not for the timid.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes and everyone is back in his own seat)
PICARD: Mister Crusher, set course for the nearest starbase.
ANNOTATION: (There is a bright flash, and a naked Q is suspended in mid air, lying on his side, with modesty maintained by the camera angle)
PICARD: Q!
Q: Red alert.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. We are no closer to finding a solution to the deteriorating orbit of the Bre'el Four moon, but with the arrival of Q, we now have a good idea of the cause.
PICARD: Our options?
ANNOTATION: (La Forge leaves. Q is now dressed in a pale mauve and olive jumpsuit)
RIKER: We know you're behind this, Q.
Q: These aren't my colours. And what are you blathering about, Riker?
PICARD: What kind of twisted pleasure does it give you to bring terror into their lives?
Q: Whose lives?
PICARD: The millions of people down there who are watching as their moon falls out of the sky.
Q: I haven't the vaguest idea what you're talking about and I have a much more serious problem. I'm no longer a member of the Continuum. My superiors have decided to punish me.
PICARD: And punish us as well, it would seem.
Q: They said I've spread chaos through the universe, and they've stripped me of all my powers. You don't believe me, do you? Do you think I would humiliate myself like this?
RIKER: If it served your purpose, yes.
Q: It's the truth. I stand before you defrocked. Condemned to be a member of this lowest of species. A normal, imperfect, lumpen human being.
TROI: They made you human as part of your punishment?
Q: No, it was my request. I could have chosen to exist as a Markoffian sea lizard or a Belzoidian flea. Anything I wished as long as it was mortal. And since I only had a fraction of a second to mull and I chose this and asked them to bring me here.
TROI: Why?
Q: Because in all the universe you're the closest thing I have to a friend, Jean-Luc.
DATA: Sir, he is reading as fully human.
Q: What, is there an echo in here?
TROI: I am sensing an emotional presence, Captain. I would normally describe it as being terrified.
Q: How rude.
PICARD: what is it you want, Q?
Q: Your compassion. All right, Sanctuary on this ship, dreary as it may sound to both of us.
PICARD: Return that moon to its orbit.
Q: I have no powers. Q the ordinary.
PICARD: Q the liar. Q the misanthrope.
Q: Q the miserable. Q the desperate. What must I do to convince you people?
WORF: Die.
Q: Oh, very clever, Worf. Eat any good books lately?
PICARD: Fine. You want to be treated as a human?
Q: Absolutely.
PICARD: All right. Mister Worf, throw him in the brig.
WORF: Delighted, Captain.
Q: You can't do this to me, Jean-Luc.
WORF: You will walk or I will carry you.
Q: Given the option, I'll walk. You've disappointed me, Jean-Luc. I'm very disappointed. Hey, I'm claustrophobic, I don't like it in here.
[now in "Turbolift"]
Q: It was a mistake. I never should have picked human. I knew it the minute I said it. To think of the future in this shell. Forced to cover myself with fabric because of some outdated human morality. To say nothing of being too hot or too cold, growing feeble with age, losing my hair, catching a disease, being ticklish, sneezing, having an itch, a pimple, bad breath. Having to bathe.
WORF: Too bad.
[now in "Corridor"]
Q: Klingon. I should have said Klingon. In my heart of hearts, I am a Klingon, Worf.
ANNOTATION: (Q puts his hand on Worf's shoulder and quickly removes it)
Q: Sorry. So you understand I could never survive in confinement. I mean, this is cruel and unusual punishment. The universe has been my back yard. As a fellow Klingon, if you would speak to the Captain on my behalf, I would be eternally grateful. which doesn't mean as much as it used to, I admit.
WORF: Be quiet! Or disappear back where you came from.
Q: I can't disappear any more than you could win a beauty contest.
[now in "Brig"]
Q: If I ask a very simple question, do you think you might be able to answer it without it troubling your intellect too much? (He enters the cell) Ready? Here goes. Would I permit you to lock me away if I still had all my powers?
WORF: You have fooled us too often, Q.
Q: Perspicacity incarnate. Please don't feel compelled now to tell me the story of the boy who cried Worf.
WORF: Computer, activate force field.
Q: I demand to be let out of here, immediately. Do you hear me? You will deactivate this cell immediately! Romulan!
ANNOTATION: (Worf leaves)
Q: I should have said Romulan, that Klingon goat!
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: The question is, what sort of jaded game is he up to this time?
RIKER: Maybe he just wants a big laugh. He'll take Bre'el Four to the edge of disaster, and then pull the moon back.
DATA: The sensors cannot identify the point of origin. It seems to be coming from all around us.
[now in "Brig"]
ANNOTATION: (The light becomes a globe hovering over the sleeping Q, then disappears. He is awake when Picard enters)
Q: Ah, you've come to apologise. How nice. All's forgiven. No offense taken.
PICARD: Enough. Q, what exactly is going on.
Q: Well, how can I know what's going on? I've been in this dungeon of yours, alone, helpless, bored to tears.
PICARD: We have a moon inexplicably falling out of orbit, and just now this ship was probed with Berthold radiation.
Q: I wasn't aware of this. Truthfully, Jean-Luc. I have been entirely preoccupied by a most frightening experience of my own. A couple of hours ago, I realising that my body was no longer functioning properly. I felt weak. I could no longer stand. The life was oozing out of me. I lost consciousness.
PICARD: You fell asleep.
Q: Terrifying. How can you stand it day after day?
PICARD: You get used to it.
Q: What other dangers await me? I'm not prepared for this. I need guidance.
PICARD: Q, I'm not going to play along with this. If you want to continue this charade, you can do it alone.
Q: Jean-Luc, wait! (walks into the forcefield) This is getting on my nerves, now that I have them. You have a moon in a deteriorating orbit. I've known moons through the universe. Big ones, small ones. I'm an expert. I could help you with this one, if you let me out of here.
PICARD: Q, there are millions of lives at risk. If you have the power to
Q: I don't have any powers. But I have the knowledge, locked up in this puny brain. You cannot afford to not take that advantage, can you?
PICARD: Mister Data, report to detention cell three.
DATA: On my way, sir.
PICARD: Computer, remove the forcefield. If you are human, which I seriously doubt, you will have to work hard to earn our trust.
Q: I'm not worried about that, Jean-Luc. You only dislike me. There are others in the cosmos who truly despise me.
ANNOTATION: (Data enters)
PICARD: Mister Data, you are hereby assigned to Q for the remainder of his stay. You will escort him to Mister La Forge in Engineering.
DATA: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
Q: Can I have a Starfleet uniform? What are you looking at?
DATA: I was considering the possibility that you are telling the truth, that you really are human.
Q: It's the ghastly truth, Mister Data. I can now stub my toe with the best of them.
DATA: An irony. It means that you have achieved in disgrace what I have always aspired to be.
[now in "Corridor"]
Q: Humans are such commonplace little creatures. They roam the galaxy looking for something, they know not what.
DATA: The human race has an enduring desire for knowledge, and for new opportunities to improve itself.
Q: There's certainly room for improvement, but the truth is, Data, they are a minor species in the grand scheme. Not worth your envy.
DATA: Oh, I do not feel envy.
Q: Well, that's good.
DATA: I feel nothing at all. That is part of my dilemma. I have the curiosity of humans, but there are questions I will never have the answer to. What is it like to laugh, or cry, or to experience any human emotions.
Q: Well, if you ask me, these human emotions are not what they're cracked up to be.
[now in "Engineering"]
LAFORGE: The moon will hit its perigee in ten hours. Now, we match its trajectory, increase emitter coolant rate so we can apply continuous warp-equivalent power nine to the tractor beam. We can push it for nearly seven hours and I think that just might do it. But, there's a problem.
DATA: The Enterprise will be dangerously close to the atmosphere.
LAFORGE: That's the problem.
Q: This is incredible.
LAFORGE: You see something here, Q?
Q: I think I just hurt my back. I'm feeling pain. I don't like it. What's the right thing to say? Ow?
LAFORGE + DATA: Ow.
Q: Ow! I can't straighten up.
DATA: Medical assistance to Engineering.
LAFORGE: Q, I've got a few people down on Bre'el Four who are going to be hurt
Q: Yes, yes, your marvellous plan will not only tear the moon to pieces but your precious ship as well.
LAFORGE: You got a better idea?
Q: I would certainly begin by examining the cause and not the symptom.
LAFORGE: We've done that, Q, and there's no way to
Q: This is obviously the result of a large celestial object passing through at near right angles to the plane of the star system. Probably a black hole.
DATA: Can you recommend a way to counter the effect?
Q: Simple. Change the gravitational constant of the universe.
LAFORGE: What?
Q: Change the gravitational constant of the universe, thereby altering the mass of the asteroid.
LAFORGE: Redefine gravity? How am I supposed to do that?
Q: You just do it. Where's that Doctor, anyway?
DATA: Geordi is trying to say that changing the gravitational constant of the universe is beyond our capabilities.
Q: Oh. In that case, never mind.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher enters)
Q: Ah, Doctor Crusher. I see Starfleet has shipped you back into exile.
DATA: Q says he has hurt his back.
CRUSHER: Ah ha. Well, if I didn't see it with my own eyes, I wouldn't believe it. According to this, he has classic back trauma. Muscle spasms.
Q: I've been under a lot of pressure lately. Family problems.
CRUSHER: Well. don't expect too much sympathy from me. You've been a pain in our backside often enough.
Q: Your bedside manner is admirable, Doctor. I'm sure your patients recover quickly just to get away from you.
LAFORGE: You know, this might work. We can't change the gravitational constant of the universe, but if we wrap a low level warp field around that moon, we could reduce its gravitational constant. Make it lighter so we can push it.
Q: Glad I could help. Ow. I think.
CRUSHER: Now what?
Q: There's something wrong with my stomach.
CRUSHER: It hurts?
Q: It's making noises.
CRUSHER: Maybe you're hungry.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
Q: I've never eaten before. What do I ask for?
DATA: The choice of meal is determined by individual taste.
Q: What do you like? DATA Although I do not require sustenance, I occasionally ingest semi-organic nutrient suspension in a silicon-based liquid medium. Is it good?
DATA: It would be more accurate to say it is good for me, as it lubricates my bio-functions.
Q: It doesn't sound very appealing. What else is there?
DATA: A wide variety of items. The replicator can make anything you desire.
Q: How do I know what I desire?
DATA: I have observed that the selection of food is often influenced by the mood of the person ordering.
Q: I'm in a dreadful mood. Get me something appropriate.
DATA: When Counsellor Troi is unhappy, she usually eats something chocolate.
Q: Chocolate?
DATA: A chocolate sundae, for example. Although I do not speak from personal experience, I have seen it have a profound psychological impact.
Q: I'll have ten chocolate sundaes.
WAITRESS: Ten?
DATA: I've never seen anyone eat ten chocolate sundaes.
Q: I'm in a really bad mood, and since I've never eaten before, I should be very hungry.
ANNOTATION: (We hear the doors open and close)
Q: This is not a moment I've been looking forward to.
GUINAN: I hear they drummed you out of the Continuum.
Q: I like to think of it as a significant career change.
GUINAN: Just one of the boys, ay?
Q: One of the boys with an IQ of two thousand and five.
DATA: The Captain and many of the crew are not yet convinced he is truly human.
GUINAN: Really?
ANNOTATION: (So she picks up a fork and stabs it into Q's hand)
Q: Argh!
GUINAN: Seems human enough to me.
Q: This is a dangerous creature. You have no idea. Why Picard would make her a member of the crew and not me
GUINAN: It must be terribly frightening for you, to be totally defenceless after all of those centuries being omnipotent.
Q: I'm warning you. I still have friends in high places.
GUINAN: Frightening one race after the other, teasing them like frightened animals, and you enjoying every moment of your victims fears.
Q: From now on I'll do missionary work, okay?
DATA: That would be a most noble cause, Q.
GUINAN: You could learn a lot from this one.
Q: Sure, the robot who teaches the course in humanities.
DATA: I am an android, not a robot.
Q: I beg your pardon.
GUINAN: I'd enjoy that, and you'd better get used to it.
Q: What?
GUINAN: Begging. You're a pitiful excuse for a human. The only way you're going to survive is by the charity of others.
ANNOTATION: (Ten chocolate sundaes arrive)
Q: I'm not hungry.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Captain, sensors are picking up a cloud of energetic plasma. Bearing, three-four one mark two zero. Range, twelve kilometres and closing.
PICARD: On screen.
WORF: The added harmonics are blocking the tachyon field.
[now in "Ten forward"]
ANNOTATION: (Q is freed, and falls to the floor)
Q: Help me! Somebody, help me!
GUINAN: How the mighty have fallen.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. We have sustained light damage from an attack by an alien species known as the Calamarain. They apparently have a grievance with Q. No doubt one of many lifeforms that do.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
Q: The Calamarain are not very hospitable creatures. They exist as swirls of ionised gas.
PICARD: What did you do to them, Q?
Q: Nothing bizarre, nothing grotesque.
RIKER: You tormented them.
Q: A subjective term, Riker. One creature's torment, is another creature's delight. They simply have no sense of humour, a character flaw with which you can personally identify.
RIKER: I say we turn him over to them.
Q: Oh, I take it back. You do have a sense of humour. A dreadful one at that.
RIKER: I'm serious.
PICARD: Of course. You knew this would happen, didn't you?
Q: One can never anticipate the Calamarain. They're very intelligent, but very flighty.
PICARD: Yes, but you must have so many enemies. Certainly you knew that once you became mortal some of them might look you up.
Q: It had occurred to me.
PICARD: And for all your protestations of friendship, your real reason for being here is protection.
Q: You're very smart, Jean-Luc, but I know human beings. They're all sopping over with compassion and forgiveness. They can't wait to absolve almost any offence. It's an inherent weakness in the breed.
PICARD: On the contrary, it is a strength.
Q: You call it what you will, but I think you'll protect me even though I've tortured you now and again.
RIKER: Fighting off all the species you've insulted would be a full time mission. That's not the one I signed up for.
PICARD: Indeed. Human or not, I want no part of you. We will deposit you at the first starbase. Let them deal with you.
Q: But I could be a valuable member of the team. I'm human, I can learn.
DATA: He has provided important theoretical guidance for Geordi's analysis of the Bre'el satellite, Captain.
TROI: It seems you have an advocate, Q.
PICARD: Mister Data, you will escort Q to Engineering. You will assist Mister La Forge. Mister Worf, hail the Bre'el Four science station.
WORF: Aye, sir.
[now in "Corridor"]
Q: Picard thinks I can't cut it on his starship. I can do anything his little trained minions can do.
DATA: I do not perceive your skills to be in doubt, Q. The Captain is more concerned with your ability to interact successfully with his little trained minions. Human interpersonal relationships are more complex. Your experiences may not have adequately prepared you.
Q: I'm not interested in human interpersonal relationships. I just want to prove to Picard that I'm indispensable.
[now in "Turbolift"]
DATA: Engineering. To function aboard a starship, or in any human activity, you must learn to form relationships.
Q: It's so hard.
DATA: And of more immediate importance is your ability to work within groups.
Q: I'm not good in groups. It's difficult working in a group when you're omnipotent.
[now in "Bridge"]
GARIN: The tides reached ten metres on the last orbit. They are already beginning to swell again. We have a lot of frightened people down here, Captain.
PICARD: Your moon has begun moving toward its perigee. We're prepared to make our attempt.
PICARD: Proceed. Mister Worf, keep a close eye on Q's friends out there.
WORF: Understood.
[now in "Engineering"]
Q: All right, everyone, this is what we're going to be doing.
LAFORGE: Q, everybody already knows what they're going to do, except for you, Now here's what I need.
Q: La Forge, obviously my knowledge and experience far exceed yours by about a billion times. So, if you'll just step aside gracefully.
LAFORGE: Q, your experience will be most valuable to me if you can manually control the field integrity.
Q: Don't be foolish. That would be a waste of my talents.
LAFORGE: Q, get to the controls or get the hell out of here. Data, you're my liaison to the Bridge. I'll need you with me.
Q: Who does he think he is, giving me orders.
DATA: Geordi thinks he is in command here, and he is correct.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Engineering, holding at station keeping, range six hundred and forty metres.
DATA: Warp core to ninety percent.
LAFORGE: Engage field coils. Tractor beam to stand by. Field output? (nudges Q) Field output?
Q: Two seventeen.
LAFORGE: Impulse engines to full. Ready to engage tractor beam.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Lowering shields. Engage tractor beam.
DATA: Yes, Captain. We are unable to encompass the entire moon.
PICARD: Do you recommend that we proceed?
Q: The two parts of the moon will have different inertial densities.
LAFORGE: Stand by, Captain. I can adjust the field symmetry to compensate.
Q: I doubt it.
LAFORGE: You don't know what this ship can do, Mister. Yes, Captain, I still believe it'll work. Increasing power and warp field and tractor beam.
Q: And if you're wrong, the moon will crumble due to subspace compression. Don't say I didn't warn you.
LAFORGE: Shut up, Q.
Q: I will not be spoken to in this manner!
LAFORGE: Data.
DATA: Q, I strongly suggest that you cooperate. Inertial mass of the moon is decreasing to approximately two point five million metric tonnes.
LAFORGE: We can try to discharge and reset the motor pathways, recouple the autonomic nodes.
CRUSHER: There's overpressure in his fluidic systems. Thermal shock. If he was mortal, he'd be dead.
Q: Let us not overstate the matter here, Doctor. I'm mortal and I survived. The cheers are overwhelming.
PICARD: Q, you exceed your own standards of self-preoccupation. You have no concern for an officer who may have saved your life.
Q: He's strong, he'll survive.
LAFORGE: Osmotic pressure still rising. Maybe we can by-pass the flow regulator.
CRUSHER: It would be helpful if everybody just got out of here now.
LAFORGE: Commander, he's not worth it.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Come.
Q: You're right, of course. I am extraordinarily selfish. But it has served me so well in the past.
PICARD: It will not serve you here.
Q: Don't be so hard on me, Jean-Luc. You've been a mortal all your life. You know all about dying. I've never given it a second thought. Or a first one, for that matter. I could have been killed. If it hadn't been for Data and that one brief delay he created, I would have been gone. No more me. And no one would have missed me, would they? Data may have sacrificed himself for me. Why?
PICARD: That is his special nature. He learned the lessons of humanity well.
Q: When I ask myself if I would have done the same for him, And I am forced to answer no, I feel, I feel ashamed.
PICARD: Q, I'm not your father confessor. You will receive no absolution from me. You have brought nothing but pain and suffering to this crew. And I'm still not entirely convinced that all this isn't your latest attempt at a puerile joke.
Q: It is a joke. A joke on me. The joke of the universe. The king who would be man. As I learn more and more what it is to be human, I am more and more convinced that I would never make a good one. I don't have what it takes. Without my powers, I'm frightened of everything. I'm a coward, and I'm miserable, and I can't go on this way.
[now in "Sickbay"]
ANNOTATION: (Q enters. Data is sitting up)
CRUSHER: He's going to be all right.
LAFORGE: We're recalibrating his language circuits, so he can't talk yet.
Q: There are creatures in the universe who would consider you the ultimate achievement, android. No feelings, no emotions, no pain. And yet you covet those qualities of humanity. Believe me, you're missing nothing. But if it means anything to you, you're a better human than I.
[now in "Turbolift"]
Q: Where's the main shuttlebay?
COMPUTER: Main shuttlebay is located on deck four.
Q: Take me there.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Captain, an unscheduled shuttle has just been launched.
PICARD: On main viewer. Hailing frequency.
WORF: Frequencies open.
PICARD: Shuttle occupant, identify yourself.
Q: Don't try to talk me out of it, Jean-Luc.
PICARD: Q, return to the ship immediately.
Q: I just can't get used to following orders.
WORF: Captain, the plasma cloud is moving toward the shuttle.
Q: It's easier this way. They won't bother you after I'm gone.
RIKER: Engineering, prepare to extend shields.
Q: Please, don't fall back on your tired clich of charging to the rescue just in the nick of time. I don't want to be rescued. My life as a human being has been a dismal failure. Perhaps my death will have a little dignity.
PICARD: Q, there is no dignity in this suicide.
Q: Yes, I suppose you're right. Death of a coward, then. So be it. But as a human, I would have died of boredom.
PICARD: This goes against my better judgment. Transporter room three, lock on to shuttle one. Beam it back into it's bay.
CREWMAN: Aye, Captain.
Q2: Not bad, Q. Not great. But not bad.
ANNOTATION: (Dressed in a similar fashion, and stepping through the bulkhead. This Q looks at his hands as if they are something completely new to him)
Q: Q!
Q2: Sacrificing yourself for these humans? Do I detect a little selfless act?
Q: You flatter me. I was only trying to put a quick end to a miserable existence.
Q2: What a dreadful colour.
Q: Yeah. What are you doing here?
Q2: I've been keeping track of you.
Q: I always felt you were in my corner.
Q2: Actually, I was the one who got you kicked out. You know, you're incorrigible, Q. A lost cause. I can't go to a single solar system without having to apologise for you, and I'm tired of it.
Q: I wasn't the one who misplaced the entire Deltived asteroid belt.
Q2: Hey, this isn't about me. I've got better places to be. But somebody had to keep an eye on you to make sure you still didn't find a way to cause trouble. Even as a member of this limited species.
Q: Well, I hope I've been entertaining you.
Q2: Barely. But I find these humans rather interesting. I'm beginning to understand what you see in them. After all the things that you've done, they're still intent on keeping you safe.
Q: A genetic weakness of the race.
Q2: And they're still at it. They just tried to beam you up, back, whatever it is they call it.
Q: Really?
Q2: I stopped them.
Q: Well, if the Calamarains hurry up and finish me off, we can get you back on your way.
Q2: Afraid I had to put them on hold too. You see, there's still this matter of the selfless act. You and I both know that the Calamarain would have eventually destroyed the Enterprise to get to you. And that's really why you left, right?
Q: It was a teeny bit selfless, wasn't it?
Q2: And there's my problem. See, I can't back to the Continuum and tell them you committed a selfless act just before the end. If I do there's going to be questions and explanations for centuries.
Q: I've learned my lesson, Q.
Q2: Remember who you're talking to. All knowing, all seeing. Fine, you got your powers back. Try and stay out of trouble.
ANNOTATION: (Q2 vanishes, and Q snaps his fingers. He gets himself a Starfleet uniform)
Q: So they wanted to destroy me, did they?
ANNOTATION: (The Calamarain are in the palm of his hand)
Q: If you think I tormented you in the past, my little friends, wait until you see what I do with you now.
Q2: Q?
Q: I was just seeing if you were still watching.
ANNOTATION: (Q blows the Calamarain away, gently)
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Captain, the aliens have disappeared, and so has the shuttle.
PICARD: Well, I suppose that is the end of Q.
ANNOTATION: (A Mexican Mariachi band appear, with Q as lead trumpet)
Q: Au contraire, mon capitaine! He's back!
ANNOTATION: (Cigars for everyone)
Q: I'm forgiven. My brothers and sisters of the Continuum have taken me back. I'm immortal again. Omnipotent again.
RIKER: Swell.
Q: Don't fret, Riker. My good fortune is your good fortune.
ANNOTATION: (two women are fawning over Will)
RIKER: I don't need your fantasy women.
Q: Oh, you're so stolid, Commander. You weren't like that before the beard. Very well.
ANNOTATION: (the women vanish from Riker and reappear with Worf)
PICARD: Q!
Q: But I feel like celebrating.
PICARD: I don't.
Q: All right.
ANNOTATION: (The women vanish)
PICARD: All of it.
ANNOTATION: (Bye, bye, band, hello uniform)
PICARD: Now, at the risk of being rude.
Q: Yes, once again I've overstayed my welcome. As a human, I was ill-equipped to thank you, but as myself you have my everlasting gratitude. Until next time. Ah, but before I go, there's a debt I wish to repay to my professor of the humanities. Data, I've decided to give you something very, very special.
DATA: If your intention is to make me human, Q.
Q: No, no, no, no, no, no. I would never curse you by making you human. Think of it as a going away present.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes, and Data turns into a quivering heap of helpless, contagious laughter)
LAFORGE: Data? Data, why are you laughing?
PICARD: Perhaps there's a residue of humanity in Q after all. Ensign, en
ANNOTATION: (a lit cigar appears in Picard's hand)
Q: Don't bet on it, Picard.
RIKER: How was the reception?
PICARD: Splendid.
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: Jean-Luc, it's wonderful to see you again. How about a big hug? Well don't just stand there, say something.
PICARD: Get out of my chair.
Q: Oh, and I was hoping for something more along the lines of, welcome back, Q, it's a pleasure to see you again my old friend."
PICARD: We're not friends.
Q: You wound me, mon capitaine.
ANNOTATION: (a snap of fingers swaps their places)
Q: There, perhaps now your manners will show some improvement.
PICARD: What brings you here, Q? Have you been banished by the Continuum once again?
Q: Oh, hardly. They're still apologising to me for the last time.
PICARD: Then what is it you want?
Q: Do I always have to have a reason to stop by? I was merely in the sector, I. You force a confession from me. The truth is, I have a debt to repay.
PICARD: A debt?
Q: To you. And it gnaws at me, and it interferes with each of my days.
PICARD: I have no idea what you're talking about.
Q: Without your assistance at our last encounter, I never would have survived. I would have taken my own life but for you.
PICARD: We all make mistakes.
Q: Your good deed made possible my reinstatement in the Continuum, and I resent owing you anything. So, I'm here to pay up. Tell me, what is it you wish and I'll be gone.
PICARD: Just be gone. That'll do nicely.
Q: No, no, no, no, no. It has to be something more, more constructive. That's my new word for the day.
PICARD: Some other time, Q. Right now I have other matters to attend to.
Q: Yes, your speech. I read it. It's dull, plodding, pedantic, much like yourself. I could help you with it.
PICARD: No thank you.
Q: You've never actually been to the ruins at Tagus Three, have you?
PICARD: No. They were sealed off more than a century ago.
Q: Well, that explains it, then. How can you write about something that you've never seen. I know, why don't I take you there?
ANNOTATION: (Q is now wearing a safari suit, complete with pith helmet and shorts)
PICARD: Out of the question. That would mean breaking Taguan law.
Q: Must you always be so ethical? I suppose we could travel back in time. You could see what Tagus was like two billion years ago. They really knew how to party back in those days.
PICARD: My answer is still no. My lecture will have to stand on its own. Now, will you please leave my ship.
Q: You are simply the most impossible person to buy a gift for.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears)
PICARD: Commander Riker, will you report to my Ready room?
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves, and Q pokes his head through the hull)
[now in "Picard's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard has just got into bed when Q appears)
Q: Sleeping alone?
PICARD: I'm in no mood for your foolishness, Q.
Q: I knew there was something different about you. You seem tense, preoccupied, somewhat smaller. At first I thought it was that horrible lecture of yours, but I was mistaken.
PICARD: Whatever game you want to play will have to wait until tomorrow.
Q: I had such high hopes for you, Picard. I thought you were a bit more evolved than the rest of your species. But now I realise you're just as weak as all the others. Still, it pains me to see the great Jean-Luc Picard brought down by a woman.
PICARD: What woman?
Q: Don't play coy with me, Captain. I witnessed your little spat with Vash. Nor will I soon forget the look of anguish on your face. The pain, the misery. If I didn't know better, I would have thought you were already married.
PICARD: You must be very bored, Q. Your imagination is running away with you.
Q: This human emotion, love, is a dangerous thing, Picard, and obviously you are ill-equipped to handle it. She's found a vulnerability in you. A vulnerability I've been looking for for years. If I had known sooner, I would have appeared as a female. Mark my words, Picard, this is your Achilles heel.
PICARD: Believe what you wish.
Q: Do you deny that you care for this woman? Believe me, I'd be doing you a big favour if I turned her into a Klabnian eel.
PICARD: Stay away from her, Q.
Q: I was just trying to help. My debt to you
PICARD: Is hereby nullified. I don't want your help, your advice, your favours or for that matter, you. Do you understand? Once and for all!
Q: You would have me stand idly by as she lead you to your destruction?
PICARD: Yes!
Q: As you wish.
[now in "Meeting room"]
ANNOTATION: (looking remarkably like the ship's theatre. Picard enters in dress uniform. Senior staff are at the back, normally dressed)
PICARD: Ladies and gentlemen, members of the Archaeology Council. Welcome. Mystery. It is the mystery of Tagus Three that brings us together today. It is a mystery that has invited more argument, more deduction, more speculation than the best works of fiction. And if you'll excuse the conceit, I want to tell you about my detective story. For several years now, I have been trying to unravel the secrets of Tagus Three.
ANNOTATION: (a horse is heard approaching, then pops in out of thin air)
PICARD: Q. It's about time you showed up.
Q: I would prefer if you addressed me as His Honour the High Sheriff of Nottingham.
PICARD: We will no longer share in this pointless fantasy of yours.
Q: Fine. stay here and do nothing. By midday tomorrow, your crew will be safely aboard their ship. Of course, you will have to accept the consequences of your inaction.
PICARD: Consequences?
Q: What is the one thing that Robin Hood is most famous for?
LAFORGE: He robs from the rich and gives to the poor.
Q: Besides that.
DATA: Perhaps you are referring to the rescue of Maid Marian from Nottingham Castle?
Q: Yes, Data. And it just so happens that Sir Guy of Gisbourne has decreed that Marian's head shall come off tomorrow at noon.
PICARD: Vash.
Q: It's your choice, Robin. You can either take your ease in this sylvan glade or risk your life to save the woman you care nothing about.
PICARD: My feelings toward Vash are irrelevant. I would attempt to save any innocent life, as you well know.
Q: Yes, but what about your merry men? Are you willing to jeopardise their lives as well? Is Vash's life worth more than Data's or Troi's or Worf's? You know, Worf, you'd make a perfect throw rug in Nottingham Castle.
PICARD: Q, I ask you to put and end to this before someone gets hurt.
Q: Oh, that's impossible. You see, I've given this fantasy as you call it, a life of its own. I have no more idea what's going to happen than you do. But of one thing I am absolutely sure. If you dare come to Nottingham Castle, blood will be spilt.
[now in "Marian's chambers"]
NURSE: Oh, you'll wear yourself out with all that pacing, Milady.
VASH: I told you to stop calling me that. The name's Vash.
PICARD: You have your orders, Commander. And I expect you to follow them.
[now in "Castle courtyard"]
ANNOTATION: (The headsman is having his axe sharpened on the grindstone)
Q: A touch sharper, shall we?
ANNOTATION: (Guy leads Vash out. She carries a bouquet of flowers)
Q: Such benevolence, Sir Guy. Allowing the condemned prisoner fresh air?
SIR GUY: You're mistaken, Sheriff. Maid Marian has promised to be my wife.
Q: What? But that's impossible?
VASH: Not at all. Though I admit a maiden seldom has the opportunity to win herself such a noble husband.
SIR GUY: A toast. To the most beautiful bride-to-be in the whole of England.
Q: Don't drink that! It could be poison.
SIR GUY: Have you taken leave of your senses?
Q: A foul scheme of Robin Hood's. She's in league with him still, I'll warrant.
VASH: Robin Hood? Oh, Robin Hood. Oh, well, that was over long ago.
Q: All of Nottingham knows you're still in love with him.
VASH: That's a lie. He bewitched me. He put me under some evil spell.
SIR GUY: I suspected as much. You can add sorcery to the list of charges against that rogue.
Q: Sir Guy, if anyone's been bewitched here, it's you.
SIR GUY: Silence. Any more impudence and it'll be your head on the block. Guard, escort the Lady Marian to her chamber.
ANNOTATION: (the transcriber coughs and splutters at the idea of Sir Guy giving orders to the King's Sheriff!!!!)
ANNOTATION: (Vash leaves)
SIR GUY: Lovely creature.
Q: Intriguing.
ANNOTATION: (all of which has been overheard by Robin/Jean-Luc in disguise)
[now in "Marian's chamber"]
ANNOTATION: (someone climbs the outside wall and opens the window)
SIR GUY: Well done, my dear.
VASH: Consider it my wedding gift to you, darling.
[now in "Castle courtyard"]
Q: Congratulations, Sir Guy. I see you've snared the jackal.
SIR GUY: It's Marian who deserves the credit. Took him with his own sword.
[now in "Marian's chamber"]
NURSE: You sent for me, Milady?
VASH: But you must go, otherwise they'll kill him.
ANNOTATION: (the Sheriff enters)
Q: Out.
ANNOTATION: (the nurse leaves)
VASH: How dare you barge in here like this
Q: I've come to apologise for my harsh words. I had no idea that you were so ruthless.
VASH: That's most gracious of you.
Q: I admit I was surprised, but no more surprised than Jean-Luc.
VASH: You're Q.
Q: Yes. And you are a very interesting woman. What is this?
VASH: Give me that.
Q: A letter to Riker. Quick, Come to Castle. Save the Captain. Why, this is wonderful. What marvellous duplicity. You certainly fooled Sir Guy, and me as well. I think you're worth further study.
VASH: Am I?
Q: Yes, but unfortunately we just don't have the time. Guards! Take this traitor away. It appears there's going to be a double execution.
[now in "Castle courtyard"]
ANNOTATION: (Four cowled monks walk in front of the camera. The headsman is ready at his block. The prisoners are escorted in.)
VASH: This whole thing is your fault.
VASH: Well next time don't bother.
PICARD: Don't you worry. I won't.
Q: Don't the two of you ever stop arguing? Now, tell me, Robin, as you stand here facing the termination of your insect existence, do you see what brought you to this end? Was she worth it?
PICARD: Can we just get this over with.
VASH: Are you implying that I'm not worth it?
PICARD: Q, your game was for my benefit. She is innocent in all of this.
Q: She is many things, none of them innocent.
PICARD: Let her go.
VASH: Jean-Luc, you do care.
Q: A gallant gesture, Robin, but a futile one. Farewell. I hope the two of you are happy together.
ANNOTATION: (the outlaws are in position)
SIR GUY: You have been found guilty of outlawry and high treason. Do you have anything to say before sentence is carried out?
ANNOTATION: (they kiss)
PICARD: It's over, Q! Get us out of here.
Q: My compliments, Picard. I doubt Robin Hood himself could have done much better.
PICARD: If you have hurt any of my people
Q: Sadly enough, they're all fine, but my point is they could have been killed, and so might have you. All for the love of a maid. My debt to you, Picard, is paid. If you've learned how weak and vulnerable you really are, if you finally see how love has brought out the worst in you
VASH: Nonsense. You're absolutely wrong. It's brought out the best in him. His nobility, courage, self-sacrifice, tenderness.
Q: Oh, you're good. You're really good.
PICARD: Enough of this.
Q: Indeed.
[now in "Meeting room"]
ANNOTATION: (the delegates have all gone, and the crew are in their uniforms)
RIKER: Everybody here?
VASH: I haven't made up my mind.
ANNOTATION: (Q appears, similarly attired)
Q: After all, she has the entire universe to choose from.
VASH: Meet my new partner.
PICARD: Him?
VASH: Why not?
PICARD: I'll tell you why not.
Q: Now, Jean-Luc, let's not be unkind.
PICARD: He's devious, and amoral, and unreliable, and irresponsible, and, and definitely not to be trusted.
VASH: Remind you of someone you know?
PICARD: As a matter of fact, it does.
Q: We're going to have fun. I'm going to take her places no human has ever seen.
VASH: Who can resist an offer like that?
PICARD: As payment in full for your debt to me, you will guarantee her safety.
Q: She will not be harmed, Jean-Luc. I promise you that. Well, are you going to kiss her goodbye? All right.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
VASH: Well? Aren't you?
ANNOTATION: (Q reappears)
Q: Oh, I'm sorry, I forgot my hat.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes, Picard and Vash kiss)
VASH: Goodbye, Jean-Luc.
PICARD: Commander, have you been able to determine the cause of the warp breach?
LAFORGE: No, sir. Everything was normal and then suddenly it's like the laws of physics went right out the window.
Q: And why shouldn't they? They're so inconvenient.
PICARD: Q!
Q: Mon Capitane.
PICARD: Are you responsible for the incident in Engineering?
Q: Of course. I needed to find out if what I suspected about the girl were true.
PICARD: That being?
Q: That she's Q.
TROI: Amanda's a Q?
CRUSHER: How is that possible? Her parents, her biological parents, were human.
Q: Well, not exactly. They had assumed human form in order to visit Earth, I suppose for amusement. But in vulgar human fashion they proceeded to conceive a child. And then like mawkish humans, they became attached to it. What is it about those squirming little infants that you find so appealing?
CRUSHER: I'm sure that's beyond your comprehension, Q.
Q: I desperately hope so.
TROI: What happened to Amanda's parents?
Q: They died in an accident. None of us knew whether she had inherited the capacities of the Q, but recently they've began to emerge, and as an expert in humanity, I was sent to investigate.
RIKER: You, an expert in humanity?
Q: Not a very challenging field of study, I grant you.
LAFORGE: Are you saying that you created a core breach just to test this girl?
TROI: What would have happened if she couldn't stop it?
Q: Then I would've known she wasn't a Q.
CRUSHER: And now that you know, what do you intend to do?
Q: Instruct here. If that child does not learn how to control her power, she may accidently destroy herself. Or all of you. Or perhaps your entire galaxy.
PICARD: I find it hard to believe that you're here to do us a favour.
Q: You're quite right I wouldn't. But there are those in the Continuum who have an over-exaggerated sense of responsibility. They think that we need to take precautions to keep the little dear from running amuck.
CRUSHER: And once you've taught her, then you'll go away?
Q: And leave her here? Of course not. She'll come back to the Continuum, where she belongs.
CRUSHER: Wait a minute. You can't just come in here and take her away from everything she's ever known.
Q: I assure you I can.
CRUSHER: She has plans for herself. She wants to have a career and a family.
Q: I'm rescuing her from that miserable existence.
CRUSHER: That miserable existence is all she's known for the last eighteen years. You have no right to take it away from her.
Q: Mon Capitane, I really think that we need to speak privately.
ANNOTATION: (so Q and Picard vanish)
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: Well, there, that's better. Crusher gets more shrill with each passing year.
PICARD: Q, what is it you really want?
Q: Well, since you know so much about the Q, I thought you'd the perfect person to introduce me to the child. Let her know she can trust me.
PICARD: I don't trust you, Q. Why should I expect Amanda to?
Q: Well she'd better, because I'm all she's got. She needs me to help her prepare for her future with the Q.
PICARD: But what if she doesn't want that future? It must be her decision.
Q: Oh, yes, yes, yes. Do you think she'll want to remain an enfeebled mortal?
PICARD: But if she really is Q, she must understand what that means. Very well, I will introduce you. But we cannot argue like this in front of her. We must at least appear to be
Q: Pals?
PICARD: Civil.
Q: I knew I could count on you, Jean-Luc.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Mister Data, I want you to access any available records on Amanda Rogers.
DATA: Yes, Captain.
CRUSHER: Good.
ANNOTATION: (Beverly goes to open the door, but Q walks straight through)
Q: There's my girl!
ANNOTATION: (Picard enters the conventional way)
PICARD: Amanda, allow me to introduce, er, Q. He's er, he's an acquaintance of ours. We've er, we've known him for years.
Q: Very impressive the way you contained that explosion. What else have you done?
AMANDA: I don't understand.
Q: Telekinesis? Teleportation? Spontaneous combustion of someone you didn't like? That sort of thing.
PICARD: Amanda, what Q is asking is have you ever deliberately used your abilities?
AMANDA: Not until I came here. The first time it happened was when the container almost fell on Commander Riker.
Q: And you handled that very well. That's why I gave you a greater challenge. The warp core breach.
ANNOTATION: (Q grasps her face and stares into her eyes)
Q: She has potential, this one. I see no reason why she can't come back to the Continuum right now.
AMANDA: What?
PICARD: Q
AMANDA: I don't want to go anywhere.
Q: Don't worry. With time you'll overcome the disadvantages you suffered as a child. No one will hold it against you for having been human. Let's go.
ANNOTATION: (Amanda sends Q flying across the room)
AMANDA: Leave me alone! I'm not going anywhere with you!
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: You agreed that she has a right to choose her own future. The first chance you get you try to abduct her.
Q: You're overreacting as usual, Picard. I was merely testing her power. She's quite a little spitfire, now isn't she?
PICARD: What's going on, Q? What's your real purpose here?
Q: I think I've been perfectly clear. The Continuum has a vested interest in this young woman.
PICARD: If you wish to protect that investment, I suggest that you approach her differently.
Q: She was being impetuous. She'll just have to start behaving like a Q.
PICARD: If I'm not mistaken, she just did.
[now in "Amanda's quarters"]
AMANDA: You understand, don't you? It's just that I have these things that I want to do. I'm going to the Academy. I want a career, and I want to join Starfleet.
AMANDA: Yes, ma'am.
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (a shadow darkens the wall)
Q: Your progress, Q? As anticipated, there are some problems. I need time. However, there is a possibility we won't have to terminate her.
[now in "Amanda's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Q starts to walk through her door, then thinks better of it and rings the doorbell)
AMANDA: Come in.
Q: Hello, my dear. I've been told I behaved badly. I apologise. Apparently you had every reason to chastise me. But, then again, what's done is done. Right?
AMANDA: I'd like to ask you some questions.
Q: Anything.
AMANDA: What exactly are the Q?
Q: It would be so much easier to show you than to tell you. If you would agree to take a short visit to the Continuum
AMANDA: No, just tell me.
Q: Well. to put it simply, we're omnipotent. There's nothing, nothing we can't do.
AMANDA: And what do you do with this power?
Q: Anything we want.
AMANDA: Do you use it to help others?
Q: I think you've missed the point, my dear. Clearly, you've spent far too much time with humans. As a Q, you can have your heart's desire, instantly, whatever that may be. Would you like precious jewels? Works of art? Would you like to walk along the rings of Tautine?
AMANDA: I'm not interested in any of those things.
Q: Of course not. You're a Q. But surely there must be something that you want? Something that you never dreamed was possible. Tell me, Amanda. What is it?
AMANDA: I'd like to know what my parents looked like. My real parents.
Q: How quaint. So do it.
AMANDA: What do you mean?
Q: Summon the image.
AMANDA: I don't know how.
Q: Think about them. Evoke the memory. You can do it, Amanda. Trust me. Close your eyes. Close your eyes. In your mind, return to the time when you were an infant. Think about your parents. Remember them. Good. Good. Now, open your eyes.
ANNOTATION: (there is a young couple with a baby sitting in front of her)
AMANDA: They loved me.
CRUSHER: Try to do the work. I'll come back and check on you later.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher leaves)
Q: I thought she'd never leave.
AMANDA: I don't know if I'll ever get used to that.
Q: It's time for another lesson.
AMANDA: Well, I have to finish this experiment first.
Q: What are you doing?
AMANDA: We're delivering live vaccine bacilli to Tagra. I'm supposed to find the best nutrient solution so we can keep them living while they're in stasis.
Q: Fascinating. I've just had a splendid idea. Why don't we combine what you're doing with our lesson, and we'll show you how to finish in no time.
AMANDA: Well, I think that I should finish it the way Doctor Crusher showed me.
Q: Why? I'm sure she'll be delighted if we sped things along. Think what it would mean. You could double, even triple the work load.
AMANDA: Well.
Q: Good.
AMANDA: I guess so.
Q: Now, as you take a look at the tissue samples, form an image in your mind.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Number One Doctor Crusher has some live vaccine bacilli to be delivered to Tagra. It'll have to be shipped in a stasis field. Will you make the arrangements?
RIKER: I'll get right on it.
PICARD: See if you can find out any more details, Mister Data. I'd like to know more about that storm.
DATA: Aye, sir.
[now in "Medical lab"]
Q: Well, if it isn't Number Two.
RIKER: I was looking for Doctor Crusher. I didn't know what nutrients she wanted to send with the bacilli.
AMANDA: I'm not sure. I'll tell her to contact you.
RIKER: Just tell her I'll be in shuttlebay two.
ANNOTATION: (Riker leaves with a big grin)
Q: You're attracted to him.
AMANDA: I am not.
Q: I think you are. How repulsive. How do you stand that hair all over his face?
ANNOTATION: (Beverly enters)
AMANDA: Doctor, Commander Riker was just here looking for you. He said he'd be in Shuttlebay Two.
CRUSHER: That explains this data. I needed to know the rates of mitosis. By artificially inflating them you made the experiment useless. Now I have to do it all over again.
AMANDA: I'm sorry, Doctor.
Q: Don't be sorry. If she wants to make things difficult on herself, that's her business.
CRUSHER: Why did you interfere with what she was doing?
Q: She's a Q. Making her plod through human chores is beneath her.
CRUSHER: She has asked not to be treated differently.
Q: That doesn't mean she should be bored to death.
CRUSHER: I don't interfere with what you're teaching her.
Q: You wouldn't be capable of interfering.
CRUSHER: I don't think it's too much to ask for you to do the same.
ANNOTATION: (Beverly is suddenly turned into a red setter dog. Amanda restores her to human)
CRUSHER: And you stay out of mine.
Q: Well, when you put it like that, I think you're absolutely right.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Captain.
PICARD: Yes, Mister Data?
PICARD: Download the files to my Ready room. I'll study them there.
DATA: Aye, sir.
[now in "Amanda's quarters"]
Q: Have you been practicing your teleportation?
AMANDA: Yes. But it's kind of hard. I keep ending up somewhere I don't want to be.
Q: Well, it won't do to be sloppy. You should hone your abilities. I have a wonderful idea. Why don't we play a little game? I'll hide somewhere on the ship and you find me.
AMANDA: But how do I know how?
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
Q: Don't worry, Amanda. You can do it.
[now in "Shuttlebay two"]
ANNOTATION: (Amanda reveals that Q has disguised himself as a container)
Q: Not bad. Not bad at all.
[now in "Engineering"]
DATA: If we can use phase buffers we may be able to devise a mechanism that can be integrated into the present system while it is in operation.
ANNOTATION: (Amanda appears. Data and Geordi stare at her. She's about to leave when Q sticks his head out of the warp core)
Q: You're still thinking like a human.
[now in "Enterprise hull"]
ANNOTATION: (They are standing on the rear hull, and Amanda is entranced by being in space.)
[now in "Amanda's quarters"]
Q: Now do you understand? What do humans have to offer you that even begins to compare with that? Your future contains wonders you can't even imagine. The universe could be your playground.
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
AMANDA: Doctor Crusher and Counsellor Troi. They're taking me to dinner.
Q: You don't have to eat, you know. It's a nasty human habit you could easily do without.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes and Amanda opens the door)
CRUSHER: Hello, Amanda. Are you ready?
RIKER: Amanda.
AMANDA: Just go back to Ten Forward.
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: Bon jour, mon Capitane. You wanted to talk with me?
PICARD: I wanted to ask you about Amanda's biological parents. When they decided to remain on Earth, what was the reaction in the Q Continuum?
Q: We found it incomprehensible.
PICARD: Were they pressured to return? Were they threatened with any punishment if they didn't?
Q: What are you driving at, Picard?
PICARD: Well, the circumstance of their death's quite odd. A tornado somehow escaped the weather modification net and touched down in only one spot. Amanda's home.
Q: Well, you never can predict the weather.
PICARD: But tornadoes develop from existing storm fronts. But you see, there were no storm fronts in Kansas that day. Witnesses reported that the funnel materialised spontaneously directly over Amanda's home, destroyed it, and disappeared.
Q: If you say so. I wasn't there.
PICARD: Were Amanda's parents executed by the Q Continuum?
Q: And what if they were?
PICARD: Then I think she has a right to know that before she makes a choice about her future.
Q: Don't be foolish, Picard. She has no choice. She never did. If she's truly Q, then she must return to the Continuum where she belongs. But if she were some kind of hybrid, neither human nor Q, then (a gesture)
PICARD: You would be so despicable?
Q: Don't be naive. You have no idea what it means to be Q. With unlimited power comes responsibility. Do you think it is reasonable for us to allow omnipotent beings to roam free through the universe?
PICARD: So what have you concluded? Does she live or does she die?
Q: I haven't decided yet.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 46193.8. We have arrived at Tagra Four and have begun delivering supplies. In the meantime, I am faced with a crisis of a different nature.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: Look, I have no reason to believe that Q is lying. He claims he has orders from the Continuum. If Amanda cannot prove that she is fully Q, then he must kill her.
PICARD: They're not convinced that you are fully Q. And they are also responsible for your parent's death.
AMANDA: My parents? But what right do they have? Q? Answer me. Are you afraid to face me?
Q: She's such a plucky little thing, now, isn't she. I really do enjoy you, you know.
PICARD: Amanda's question deserves an answer, Q. You've made yourself judge, jury, and if necessary executioner. By what right have you appointed yourself to this position?
Q: Superior morality.
PICARD: Yes. I recall how you used your superior morality when we first encountered you. You put us on trial for the crimes of humanity.
Q: The jury is still out on that, Picard, make no mistake.
PICARD: Your arrogant pretence at being the moral guardians of the universe strikes me as being hollow, Q. I see no evidence that you are guided by a superior moral code, or any code whatsoever. You may be nearly omnipotent, and I don't deny that your parlour tricks are very impressive, but morality? I don't see it. I don't acknowledge it, Q. I would put human morality against the Q's any day. And perhaps that's the reason that we fascinate you so. Because our puny behaviour shows you a glimmer of the one thing that evades your omnipotence, a moral centre. And if so, I can think of no crueller irony than that you should destroy this young woman, whose only crime is that she's too human.
Q: Jean-Luc, sometimes I think the only reason I come here is to listen to these wonderful speeches of yours. But this time, your concern is unwarranted. We've decided not to harm her. And we're prepared to offer her a choice.
AMANDA: What kind of choice?
Q: You can either come to the Continuum with me
AMANDA: Or?
Q: Now this choice is more difficult. You have it within yourself the ability to refrain from using the power of Q. If you can do that, you can stay here.
AMANDA: Then I'm staying here.
Q: Think about this. This is not so easy. Your parents were given this choice and they were unable to resist the temptation of using their power.
AMANDA: All I've wanted since this whole thing began is to become a normal human being again. I know I can resist.
WORF: Worf to Picard. There is an emergency message from Commander Riker.
LOTE: Commander. Over here, quickly.
PICARD: Is this your doing, Q?
Q: Not this time, Picard.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
PICARD: Mister Worf, see if there's any way we can do to cut through the interference and beam them out of there.
PICARD: Amanda?
ANNOTATION: (Q reappears)
Q: I told you it would be harder to resist than you thought.
AMANDA: I couldn't let all those people die
ANNOTATION: (Amanda summons Crusher)
AMANDA: Ever since I got here, I've been fighting this. I've been denying the truth. Denying what I am. I am Q. Doctor Crusher, I've decided that I can't stay. I can't stay here.
Q: Well, now that you've come to your senses, let's go.
AMANDA: No. I want to go and see my parents first. It's going to take some time to explain all this, so you'll have to be patient.
ANNOTATION: (Amanda hugs Beverly)
CRUSHER: Forty cc's inaprovaline. The activity in the isocortex is falling. Cortical stimulators. Now. (Picard jerks) Again. His respiratory system is shutting down. The levels in the isocortex are still falling. Damn. Prepare a four percent series
[now in "Limbo"]
ANNOTATION: (A bright white void. There is a figure also in shimmering white nearby). Picard touches it's hand and then sees who it is.)
Q: Welcome to the afterlife, Jean-Luc. You're dead.
PICARD: Q, what is going on?
Q: I told you. You're dead. This is the afterlife, and I'm God.
PICARD: You are not God.
Q: Blasphemy! You're lucky I don't cast you out, or smite you or something. The bottom line is, your life ended about five minutes ago, under the inept ministrations of Doctor Beverly Crusher.
PICARD: No. I am not dead. Because I refuse to believe that the afterlife is run by you. The universe is not so badly designed.
Q: Very well. If you really require more evidence of your post-mortem status, I guess I'll just have to provide you some.
MAURICE: Jean-Luc, I told you not to go running off to that Academy.
PICARD: Father.
MAURICE: I told you that Starfleet would bring you to a bad end, but you wouldn't listen. Now look at you. Dead before your time.
PICARD: Q, enough of this.
Q: Enough what?
MAURICE: Why couldn't you have listened? Didn't you know that I was working for your best interests?
PICARD: Q, stop this.
MAURICE: After all these years, even now, you manage to disappoint me, Jean-Luc.
Q: He's not the only one who'd like to have a word with you.
WOMAN: Why, Jean-Luc? Why did you do it?
CREWWOMAN: Captain, there are still people down there. You can't abandon them.
CREWMAN: There must be some other way, Captain. Some other choice than firing on them.
MAN: If you continue on this course. A direct hit, sir. The ship is destroyed.
Q: These are the voices of all the people you've killed throughout the years.
PICARD: Whom I've killed? What do you mean?
Q: Death has made you a little dim, Jean-Luc. These are the voices of all the people who have died through your actions or your inactions. Now, if you have any words of apology or regret, I believe they're all listening. They're a surly bunch, actually, so don't drag this out too long.
PICARD: I've no intention of performing for your amusement.
Q: This is not for me. This is for you, Jean-Luc. This is your opportunity to make peace with your sordid past.
PICARD: I find it hard to believe that you are doing this for the benefit of my soul.
Q: Well, now that you've shuffled off the mortal coil, we're free to spend a little time together.
PICARD: A little time together? How much?
Q: Eternity. Now, you're sure you have no regrets or feelings of guilt about your former life? I can't have you whining and complaining through time.
PICARD: If I'm really dead, then my only regret is dying and finding you here.
Q: You wound me, Jean-Luc. After all, I was not the cause of your death. This was.
ANNOTATION: (He holds up the contraption Kate Pulaski put in him all those seasons ago)
PICARD: Is that?
Q: Your artificial heart. You might have lived if you had a real one instead of this unreliable piece of technology. By the way, how did you lose yours anyway?
PICARD: A mistake.
Q: Is that a regret I hear?
PICARD: I regret a great many things from those days.
Q: Really?
ANNOTATION: (A Nausicaan and a young man in old-style uniform are fighting. Then a second Nausicaan joins in, and a third stabs the man through the back. The blade sticks out of his chest. The young man falls to his knees, looks at the knife point and laughs, then falls to the floor.)
Q: It wasn't very smart of you to take on three Nausicaans, was it?
PICARD: No, it wasn't.
Q: And did I hear a laugh? It's so unlike you, Jean-Luc, to have a sense of humour, especially about getting stabbed through the back.
PICARD: I was a different person in those days. Arrogant, undisciplined, with far too much ego and too little wisdom. I was more like you.
Q: Then you must have been far more interesting. Pity you had to change.
PICARD: The pity is that I had to be impaled through the back before I learned that lesson. I started that fight with those Nausicaans. I started it because, because I was young and cocky. If I'd been more responsible in those days, I wouldn't have needed this heart, and I wouldn't have died from a random energy surge thirty years later.
Q: So, if you had it to do all over again?
PICARD: Things would be different.
[now in "Starbase - Picard's quarters"]
PICARD: 8.27 (Picard, in old style uniform, gets slapped across the face by a woman who then storms out of the room)
ANNOTATION: (Corey and Marta leave, and Q appears in modern uniform)
COREY: Try not to end up in the hospital.
Q: Attention on deck, Ensign Picard.
PICARD: Q.
Q: That's Captain Q to you, young man.
PICARD: What's the point of creating this fantasy?
Q: This is no fantasy, I assure you. It's all very real. You're twenty one years old again. A brash young man, fresh out of the Academy.
PICARD: I certainly don't look it.
Q: Well, to everyone else you do.
PICARD: So, Q, I thought you told me that I was dead. Now it seems that I'm alive.
Q: Oh, you mortals are so obtuse. Why do you persist in believing that life and death are such static and rigid concepts. Why, I can take your life and give it back to you again with the snap of a finger.
PICARD: Let's say for the moment that may be true. What is the purpose of bringing me here?
Q: You said you regretted a great many things in your life. Well, here's a chance to change some of them.
PICARD: Change them? You mean change the past? Q, even if you have been able to bring me back in time somehow, surely you must realise that any alteration in this timeline will have a profound impact on the future.
Q: Please. Spare me your egotistical musings on your pivotal role in history. Nothing you do here will cause the Federation to collapse or galaxies to explode. To be blunt, you're not that important.
PICARD: I won't do it. I won't alter history.
Q: Oh, very well. Since you attach so much importance to the continuity of time, I will give you my personal guarantee that nothing you do here will end up hurting anyone, or have an adverse affect on what you know of as history. The only thing at stake here is your life and your peace of mind. Now, whether you believe me or not, you are here, and you have a second chance. What you choose to do with it is entirely up to you. Do you know where you are?
PICARD: Starbase Earhart. We came here right after graduation to await our first deep space assignments.
Q: That's right. It's two days before your unfortunate encounter with a Nausicaan sword. You have that long to make whatever changes you wish. If you can avoid getting stabbed through the heart this time, which I doubt, I will take you back to what you think of as the present. And you can go on with your life with a real heart.
PICARD: Then I won't die?
Q: Of course you'll die. It'll just be at a later time.
PICARD: What if I don't avoid the fight? What if I won't make the changes?
Q: Then you die on the table, and we spend eternity together.
PICARD: Wonderful.
Q: I'm glad you think so. I am curious about one thing, Johnny. Why did that rather attractive woman strike you just now? Something you said?
PICARD: Her name was Corlina. I'd arranged to take her out today, and then she discovered that I had already made a second date with another woman called, er, Penny, and Corlina was naturally upset.
Q: I'd no idea you were such a cad. I'm impressed.
PICARD: Computer, what is the time right now?
COMPUTER: Sixteen eleven hours.
PICARD: In fact, Penny is waiting for me right now.
Q: Well, carry on.
[now in "Bonestell Facility bar"]
PENNY: You're awfully quiet today. What happened to the dashing young Ensign from last night? The one with the winning smile and the smooth talk about my eyes?
PICARD: I'm just a little more contemplative.
PENNY: I didn't want your pity.
ANNOTATION: (Penny leaves in high dudgeon. The bartender has a new face.)
Q: Penny for your thoughts? You never told me you were such a lady's man.
PICARD: I wasn't. I was a puerile adolescent who allowed himself to be led by his hormones instead of his head.
Q: Looks like your friends know how to have fun. You ought to take lessons.
ANNOTATION: (The gang are playing a variation of pool where the ball bounces off coloured lights on the table)
Q: Excuse me.
[now in "Bonestell Facility casino"]
MARTA: He's winning.
PICARD: Of course.
PICARD: No, Corey, listen to me. This is a big mistake. Don't play him.
COREY: What's gotten into you? Let's go.
Q: I see you've found your Nausicaan friend. You seem unimpaled so far.
PICARD: I'm sorry to disappoint you.
Q: Ensign Zweller seems to be doing well.
PICARD: He's going to lose. The Nausicaan is cheating.
Q: Really? I'm beginning to like these Nausicaans.
PICARD: If history repeats itself, Corey will figure it out later tonight, and then he'll want revenge.
Q: And will you help your best friend avenge this injustice?
PICARD: I did last time. I rigged the table so that he would win in a rematch.
Q: Picard, you cheated? Picard, I'm impressed.
PICARD: It was a stupid mistake. The Nausicaan didn't take kindly to losing. Nor his friends. They were outraged. They wanted a fight. I gave them one.
Q: That's a beautiful story. It gets you right here, doesn't it?
NAUSICAAN 1: Ten.
ANNOTATION: (the Nausicaan puts a bet down and makes his play, then laughs and pots the winner) Dom-jot. Human play dom-jot. [Starbase - Picard's quarters]
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
PICARD: Come.
Q: Flowers! Is there a John Luck Pickard here?
MARTA: From one of your conquests, no doubt. I guess some things aren't going to change.
ANNOTATION: (Marta leaves)
Q: Did I interrupt anything sordid, I hope?
PICARD: No, Q, you did not.
Q: Pity. She's quite attractive.
PICARD: We were friends, nothing more.
Q: Is that another regret I hear? My, my. We're simply riddled with regrets about our youth, now aren't we?
PICARD: My friendship with Marta is not something I regret.
Q: But you wish it had been more than just friendship, don't you? Well, maybe you can change all that.
PICARD: Q, what is it you want?
Q: I thought you'd like to know that Mister Zweller has decided not to take your advice. He's in the Bonestell Facility right now, rigging the table to beat the Nausicaan. I guess you weren't that persuasive.
ANNOTATION: (Corey is under the don-jot table with a screwdriver)
PICARD: Corey.
MARTA: You've said so now.
ANNOTATION: (and they kiss) (next morning, uniforms are scattered on the floor, and a hand tickles Picard's ear)
Q: Morning, darling. Feeling a little jumpy this morning? Are we guilty, perhaps?
PICARD: I don't feel guilty about anything, Q.
Q: No? We're just friends, Q, nothing more.
PICARD: And we're still friends.
Q: So what's next?
PICARD: I don't know. What I do know is, things will be different.
Q: I'm sure.
[now in "Bonestell Facility bar"]
PICARD: Good morning.
MARTA: Johnny.
MARTA: We've planned it. I'll be there.
ANNOTATION: (Marta leaves, her breakfast on the table)
Q: Well, let's see. You've managed to get slapped by one woman, a drink thrown in your face by another, and alienate your two best friends. Doing very well so far. The only thing left to avoid is getting stabbed through the heart.
[now in "Bonestell Facility casino"]
PICARD: I think you'll like serving on board the Ajax. I hear that Captain Narth is an excellent officer.
COREY: So I hear.
MARTA: Goodbye, Johnny.
ANNOTATION: (Corey and Marta leave)
Q: Congratulations, mon capitaine. You did it.
WORF: Can I help you?
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard is a science lieutenant)
PICARD: No. I can find my own way there. Thank you, Commander.
[now in "Doctor's office"]
PICARD: Beverly, something's happened to me. I'm not sure
Q: (German accent) Vell, vell, vell. Vhat seems to be de trouble, Lieutenant Picard?
PICARD: Q, what have you done?
Q: I've done exactly as I promised. I've returned you to the present.
PICARD: But this is not the present I remember. You said nothing would change.
Q: Nothing has changed, Jean-Luc, except for you. But then again, that's what you wanted, wasn't it? To change the man you were in your youth? Well, you did it. This is the man you are today. And You should be happy. You have a real heart beating in your chest, and you get to live out the rest of your life in safety, running tests, making analyses, and carrying reports to your superiors.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
ANNOTATION: (Riker and Troi are at a table)
PICARD: Excuse me, am I interrupting?
PICARD: I'm on my way, sir.
[now in "Turbolift"]
PICARD: Main Engineering. Are you having a good laugh now, Q? Does it amuse you to think of me living out the rest of my life as a dreary man in a tedious job?
[now in "Limbo"]
Q: I gave you something most mortals never experience. A second chance at life. And now all you can do is complain?
PICARD: I can't live out my days as that person. That man is bereft of passion and imagination. That is not who I am.
Q: Au contraire, he's the person you wanted to be. One who was less arrogant, and undisciplined as a youth. One who was less like me. The Jean-Luc Picard you wanted to be, the one who did not fight the Nausicaan, had quite a different career from the one you remember. That Picard never had a brush with death, never came face to face with his own mortality, never realised how fragile life is or how important each moment must be. So his life never came into focus. He drifted for much of his career, with no plan or agenda, going from one assignment to the next, never seizing the opportunities that presented themselves. He never lead the away team on Milika Three to save the ambassador, or take charge of the Stargazer's Bridge when its Captain was killed. And no one ever offered him a command. He learned to play it safe. And he never, ever got noticed by anyone.
PICARD: You're right, Q. You gave me the chance to change and I took the opportunity. But I admit now, it was a mistake.
Q: Are you asking me for something, Jean-Luc?
PICARD: Give me a chance to put things back the way they were before.
Q: Before you died in Sickbay. Is that what you want?
PICARD: I would rather die as the man I was than live the life I just saw.
[now in "Bonestell Facility casino"]
NAUSICAAN: Coward. Like all Starfleet. You talk and you talk but you have no guramba.
PICARD: I don't understand. This is not the way it's supposed to happen. Maintain this position. I'll be in my Ready room.
[now in "Courtroom"]
ANNOTATION: (but instead of the Ready room he walks into the courtroom from Encounter at Farpoint wearing his season 7 uniform)
Q: Mon capitane. I thought you'd never get here.
PICARD: Q. I knew it. What's going on?
Q: It's Judge Q to you. And isn't it obvious what's going on?
PICARD: The last time that I stood here was seven years ago.
Q: Seven years ago. How little do you mortals understand time. Must you be so linear, Jean-Luc?
PICARD: You accused me of being the representative of a barbarous species.
Q: I believe my exact words were a dangerous, savage, child race.
PICARD: We demonstrated to you that mankind had become peaceful and benevolent. You agreed and you let us go on our way. Now why am I standing here again?
Q: Oh, you'd like me to connect the dots for you, lead you from A to B to C so your puny mind can comprehend. How boring. They'd be so much more entertained if you tried to figure it out. I'll answer any ten questions that call for a yes or a no. Well?
PICARD: Are you putting mankind on trial again?
Q: No.
PICARD: Is there any connection between the trial seven years ago and whatever's going on now?
Q: I'd have to say yes.
PICARD: The spatial anomaly in the Neutral Zone, is it related to what's happening?
Q: Most definitely yes.
PICARD: Is it part of a Romulan plot, a ploy to start a war?
Q: No and no. Five down.
PICARD: That's only four.
Q: Is it a Romulan plot? Is it a ploy to start a war? Those are separate questions.
PICARD: Did you create the anomaly?
Q: No, no, no. You're going to be so surprised when you realise where it came from, if you ever figure it out.
PICARD: Are you responsible for my shifting through time?
Q: I'll answer that question if you promise you won't tell anyone. (in Picard's ear) Yes.
PICARD: Why?
Q: Sorry. That's not a yes or no question. You forfeit the rest of your questions. I expected as much. You're such a limited creature. A perfect example of why we made our decision. The trial never ended, Captain. We never reached a verdict. But now we have. You're guilty.
PICARD: Guilty of what?
Q: Of being inferior. Seven years ago I said we'd be watching you, and we have been, hoping that your ape-like race would demonstrate some growth, give some indication that your minds have room for expansion. But what have we seen instead? You worrying about Commander Riker's career, listening to Counsellor Troi's pedantic psychobabble, indulging Data in his witless exploration of humanity.
PICARD: We've journeyed to countless new worlds, we've contacted new species, we have expanded our understanding of the universe.
Q: In your own paltry, limited way. You have no idea how far you still have to go. But instead of using the last seven years to change and to grow, you have squandered them.
PICARD: We are what we are, and we're doing the best we can. It is not for you to set the standards by which we should be judged.
Q: Oh, but it is, and we have. Time may be eternal, Captain, but our patience is not. It's time to put an end to your trek through the stars, make room for other more worthy species.
PICARD: You're going to deny us travel through space?
Q: You obtuse piece of flotsam. You are to be denied existence. Humanity's fate has been sealed. You will be destroyed.
PICARD: Q, I do not believe that even you are capable of such an act.
Q: I? There you go again, always blaming me for everything. Well this time I'm not your enemy. I'm not the one that causes the annihilation of mankind. You are.
PICARD: Me?
Q: That's right. You're doing it right now. You did it before and you'll do it again.
PICARD: What sort of meaningless doubletalk is this?
Q: He doesn't understand. I have only myself to blame, I suppose. I believed in you. I thought you had potential. But apparently I was wrong. May whatever god you believe in have mercy on your soul. This court stands adjourned.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Commander, assemble the senior staff and go to Red alert. We have a bigger problem than I thought.
RIKER: Red alert!
CRUSHER: Jean-Luc, I care for you too much not to tell you the truth. You have advanced Irumodic Syndrome. It's possible that all of this is in your mind. I'll stay here six hours longer and then we're heading home. I want you to remember, if it were anyone but you, we wouldn't even be here.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher leaves, Q appears as a ancient man with an ear trumpet)
Q: Eh? What was that she said, sonny? I couldn't quite hear her.
PICARD: Q? What is going on here? Where is the anomaly?
Q: Where's your mommy? Well, I don't know.
PICARD: Answer me.
Q: There is an answer, Jean-Luc, but I can't hand it to you. Although you do have help.
PICARD: What help?
Q: You're not alone, you know. What you were and what you are to become will always with you.
PICARD: My time shifting. The answer does lie there, doesn't it. Now, tell me one thing. This anomaly we're looking for, will that destroy humanity?
Q: You're forgetting, Jean-Luc. You destroy humanity.
PICARD: By doing what? When? How can
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Report, Mister Data.
PICARD: Dismissed.
ANNOTATION: (Data, Troi and Riker leave)
Q: It's a pretty big decision, Jean-Luc. Tinkering with an anomaly you know nothing about, trying to collapse it. Isn't that risky?
PICARD: Why? Will that cause the destruction of mankind?
Q: Maybe. On the other hand, maybe leaving it alone would be the wrong thing to do. It's a pretty big decision, all right. Would it help to have a different perspective?
[now in "Primordial Earth"]
Q: Welcome home.
PICARD: Home?
Q: Don't you recognise your old stomping grounds? This is Earth, France, about, oh, three and a half billion years ago, give or take an eon or two. Smells awful, doesn't it? All that sulphur and volcanic ash. I really must speak to the maid.
PICARD: Q, is there any point to all this?
Q: Look.
ANNOTATION: (a purple sky is dominated by a swirling white)
PICARD: So the anomaly is here too, at Earth.
Q: At this point in history the anomaly fills your entire quadrant of the galaxy.
PICARD: The further back in time, the larger the anomaly.
Q: Come here. There's something I want to show you. You see this?
ANNOTATION: (a sludge filled pond)
Q: This is you. I'm serious. Right here, life is about to form on this planet for the very first time. A group of amino acids are about to combine and form the first protein, the building blocks of what you call life. Strange, isn't it? Everything you know, your entire civilisation, it all begins right here in this little pond of goo. Appropriate, somehow, isn't it? Too bad you didn't bring your microscope. It's really quite fascinating. Oh, look, there they go. The amino acids are moving closer and closer, and closer. Oh! Nothing happened. See what you've done?
PICARD: Are you saying that I caused the anomaly, and that the anomaly somehow disrupted the beginnings of life on Earth?
Q: Congratulations.
[now in "Past - Engineering"]
PICARD: Let's concentrate on how this anomaly was initially formed. Speculation?
DATA: Our tachyon pulse has been unable to completely penetrate the anomaly. If we had information on the centre of the phenomenon, we might have a basis for speculation.
ANNOTATION: (KaBOOM!)
[now in "Future - Bridge"]
DATA: Both of the other ships have been destroyed.
Q: Two down, one to go.
PICARD: Data, report!
DATA: The anomaly is nearly collapsed.
LAFORGE: We're losing containment.
Q: Goodbye, Jean-Luc. I'm going to miss you. You had such potential. But then again, all good things must come to an end.
LAFORGE: Containment field is at critical. I'm losing it!
ANNOTATION: (the anomaly sucks into the Enterprise and KaBOOM!)
[now in "Courtroom"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard is sitting with his head in his hands)
Q: The Continuum didn't think you had it in you, Jean-Luc, but I knew you did.
PICARD: Are you saying that it worked? We collapsed the anomaly?
Q: Is that all this meant to you? Just another spatial anomaly? Just another day at the office?
PICARD: Did it work?
Q: Well, you're here, aren't you? You're talking to me, aren't you?
PICARD: What about my crew?
Q: The anomaly. My crew. My ship. I suppose you're worried about your fish, too. Well, if it puts your mind at ease, you've saved humanity once again.
PICARD: Thank you.
Q: For what?
PICARD: You had a hand in helping me get out of this.
Q: I was the one that got you into it. A directive from the Continuum. The part about the helping hand, thought, was my idea.
PICARD: I sincerely hope that this is the last time that I find myself here.
Q: You just don't get it, do you, Jean-Luc? The trial never ends. We wanted to see if you had the ability to expand your mind and your horizons. And for one brief moment, you did.
PICARD: When I realised the paradox.
Q: Exactly. For that one fraction of a second, you were open to options you had never considered. That is the exploration that awaits you. Not mapping stars and studying nebulae, but charting the unknowable possibilities of existence.
PICARD: Q, what is it that you're trying to tell me?
ANNOTATION: (Q nearly whispers in Picard's ear)
Q: You'll find out. In any case, I'll be watching. And if you're very lucky, I'll drop by to say hello from time to time. See you out there.
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Worf are about to kiss when Picard comes out of the turbolift in his dressing gown)
TROI: Captain, are you all right?
VASH: Now that I'm back, I'll have to look him up.
[now in "Vash's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Vash looks at an interesting sculpture on the table then puts her bag on the bed.)
Q: Really, Vash, I can't believe you're still pining for Jean-Luc, that self righteous do-gooder.
VASH: I should have listened to him. He warned me about you.
Q: You're hurt, you strike back. I understand. But be of good cheer, I bring wonderful news. I'm back. I can see now it was cruel of me to leave you.
VASH: Very touching. But you didn't leave me, I left you.
Q: You left me, I left you Details, mere details. The important thing is we're back together again. A team, joined together at the hip.
VASH: Not a chance.
Q: You know you're going to miss me.
VASH: Don't flatter yourself.
ANNOTATION: (Q gets all her stuff back into her bag so she has to unpack again)
Q: You know, I thought first we'd visit the Teleris Cluster, look in on the star dancers at Mundahla. Or maybe head over to the Lantar nebula and view the Sampalo relic on Hoek Four.
VASH: Not interested.
Q: I know. Vadris Three. Charming little world. The natives think they're the only intelligent life in the universe.
VASH: No.
ANNOTATION: (Her bag is back on her shoulder so she throws it at him)
Q: All right, you choose then.
VASH: I choose never to go anywhere with you again, Q.
Q: You don't know what you're missing. When we started this little partnership, I promised to take you places no human had ever seen before.
VASH: And you have. It was wonderful. Thank you. Now goodbye.
Q: Two years in the Gamma Quadrant hardly qualifies as a grand tour of the universe. There's still the Delta Quadrant to explore, not to mention all the other galaxies.
VASH: It's over, Q. I want you out of my life. You are arrogant, you are overbearing and you think you know everything.
Q: But I do know everything.
VASH: That makes it even worse.
Q: All right, fine, what is it you really want?
VASH: I want the life I had before I met you.
Q: And a stellar life indeed. The eminent Vash. Barred from the Royal Museum of Epsilon Hydra Seven, persona non grata on Betazed. Wanted dead on Myrmidon for stealing the Crown of the First Mother.
VASH: Dead or alive.
Q: Preferably dead. It's a wonder you haven't offended every sentient race in the galaxy.
VASH: You're the one who almost got me killed on Errikang Seven. And they weren't exactly thrilled to see you on Brax either. What did they call you? The God of Lies?
Q: They meant it affectionately.
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
VASH: Come in.
ANNOTATION: (Quark enters with a bottle)
QUARK: I
Q: Go away.
ANNOTATION: (Quark vanishes)
VASH: Q, bring him back.
Q: What business could you possibly have with that disgusting little troll?
VASH: I don't know. You didn't give him time to tell me. Now bring him back this instant.
Q: All right.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears, Quark reappears)
VASH: Can I help you?
QUARK: Oh, you're good. You're very, very good.
ANNOTATION: (Quark leaves, Q is back)
Q: How perfectly vile. If that's the kind of company you kept before meeting me, it's no wonder you ended up with Picard.
VASH: Go away.
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
VASH: Enter.
Q: Aren't we the hub of activity?
BASHIR: I'm sorry. Am I interrupting anything?
VASH: No. Come in, Doctor.
BASHIR: Those twenty minutes will seem like an eternity.
ANNOTATION: (Bashir leaves, Q is back)
Q: These mating rituals you humans indulge in really are quite disgusting.
VASH: Get out.
Q: You know you don't mean it.
VASH: Out.
Q: You're making a terrible mistake. You'd be lost without me.
VASH: I can take care of myself.
Q: Really? Well, we'll see about that.
[now in "Replimat"]
ANNOTATION: (A waiter approaches)
BASHIR: Just a cup of mint tea.
Q: (bajoran waiter) You're making a terrible mistake.
BASHIR: Why? The replicators haven't malfunctioned again?
Q: I'm talking about Vash. Stay away from her.
BASHIR: My god, you're an impertinent waiter.
Q: I'm a friend. I'm giving you friendly advice. She's nothing but trouble.
BASHIR: Really? Well I don't think it's any of your business who I see. In fact, I'm having dinner with her now.
Q: Are you sure you're feeling up to it? You look tired.
BASHIR: I feel fine.
Q: No, no, no. You look tired. Very, very tired.
ANNOTATION: (Q yawns and Bashir catches it)
BASHIR: Funny, I do feel a bit, a bit spent. Maybe I should go and lie down for a few minutes.
Q: Hopefully by yourself for a change.
ANNOTATION: (Q has been recognised)
OBRIEN: Bloody hell.
SISKO: Tell me about Q.
ANNOTATION: (Q is at the table behind them)
Q: I'll tell you anything you want to know, Commander. Just answer one question. Is Starfleet penalising you or did you actually request such a dismal command.
SISKO: I want you off this station.
Q: Don't be hasty, my happy-go-lucky friend. This dreary little gulag could use a little colour, some excitement. And who better to provide it than moi? Though I must say I approve of your new tailor.
ANNOTATION: (Q changes from TNG uniform to DS9)
SISKO: I'm not impressed by your parlour tricks. These power outages are going to stop right now.
Q: Why tell me? Oh, yes, of course, go ahead. Blame Q if it makes you feel any better. I suppose it's my fate to be the galaxy's whipping boy. Heavy is the burden of being me.
SISKO: If you're looking for sympathy, you've come to the wrong place.
Q: Actually, what I was hoping for was a little witty repartee, but I see I'm not going to get any of that either. At least your beloved Jean-Luc knows how to turn a phrase
VASH: Take a hint, Q. No one wants you around.
Q: Really, Vash, this playing hard to get is growing tedious. Let's not forget that I'm the Q and you the lowly human. I will decide when this partnership is over. Understand?
SISKO: Why don't you and I continue this discussion in private?
Q: Excellent idea.
ANNOTATION: (Everyone else vanishes)
Q: You're right. This is an excellent idea.
SISKO: Sisko to Ops.
Q: All gone.
SISKO: Bring them back, Q, now!
Q: Or what? You'll thrash me? Shall we settle this mano a mano?
ANNOTATION: (Everyone is back, and Q and Sisko are 1900s bare-knuckle fighters)
Q: Marquis of Queensberry Rules?
SISKO: What?
Q: Fisticuffs, pugilism, the manly art of self-defence. (Q hits Sisko) Come on. Isn't this all wonderfully barbaric? Go on, take a poke at me. I know that's really what you want to do. Come on.
QUARK: I'll wager five bars of latinum on Sisko.
VASH: You're on.
Q: Fight back. This is supposed to be brutal.
ANNOTATION: (Q punches Sisko three times in the face, then Sisko blocks his arm and pile-drives into his solar plexus. Q falls)
QUARK: You can pay me out of your profits from the auction.
Q: You hit me Picard never hit me.
SISKO: I'm not Picard.
Q: Indeed not. You're much easier to provoke. How fortunate for me.
[now in "Promenade"]
ANNOTATION: (A big well-dressed alien and a Ferengi arrive. There are 3 others with blue bags over their heads. Odo watches from his office doorway. Then lights go down again)
ODO: Not again.
ANNOTATION: (Odo seems to consider it, then dismisses the idea)
[now in "Promenade"]
ANNOTATION: (Vash is escorted from the assay office with a full rucksack.)
Q: Well, I'm glad to see you've packed. I hope you said goodbye to all your new-found friends.
VASH: I don't have time for this.
Q: You've led a charmed life these past two years under my benevolent protection.
VASH: I can take care of myself.
Q: Really? Do you remember that tiny little insect bite you had on Erabus Prime? If I hadn't been there (Vash has very little hair left)
VASH: I am not going with you.
Q: The galaxy can be a dangerous place when you're on your own.
ANNOTATION: (Vash gets nasty boils)
VASH: It's over, Q.
ANNOTATION: (Now she's deathly grey, bent over and falling to the floor under the weight of her bag)
Q: I leave you now to reconsider my offer of friendship.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes and Vash is normal again)
CAPTAINS LOG: Station log, stardate 46531.2. The station's power is continuing to be drained and converted into gravitons. At this rate, our life support systems will fail in fourteen hours.
DAX: Only when it's highly concentrated. We'd only use a very small amount.
SISKO: Do it. Unless we get this under control in the next eight hours, we'll begin evacuation procedures.
Q: Still chasing your own tail? Picard and his lackeys would have solved all this techno-babble hours ago. No wonder you're not commanding a starship.
KIRA: Security to Ops.
Q: Well, aren't we the feisty little go-getter. I'd keep my eye on this one. Chances are, she's after your job.
OBRIEN: Why don't you do something constructive for a change? Like torment the Cardassians.
Q: Do I know you?
OBRIEN: O'Brien. From the Enterprise.
Q: Enterprise. oh yes. Weren't you one of the little people? Quite a motley crew you've assembled here, Benji. My advice to you is to evacuate now and save all this pointless guesswork.
SISKO: Q, either you tell us what's going on or get the hell out of the way.
Q: I'll tell you what's going on. While you're here conducting futile experiments, Vash is below engaging in base commerce and setting Federation ethics back two hundred years. Believe me, gang, she's far more dangerous to you than I.
[now in "Quark's"]
QUARK: Kolos, my friend. I don't know which pleases me more, your smiling face or your overflowing purse.
KOLOS: (the well-dressed alien) Quark, you obsequious toad, your so-called Gamma Quadrant merchandise had better be legitimate or I'll toss you out the nearest airlock.
OBRIEN: Sir, there's not enough power left to make any difference. If we get sucked into that wormhole, we'll be in a billion pieces by the time we reach the Gamma Quadrant.
[now in "Quark's"]
QUARK: Sold to Kolos for thirty-six bars of gold pressed latinum. Next we have a dagger, studded with some very interesting looking gems. Think of it as a weapon and an investment. Bidding will start at forty. Forty. Forty two. Forty five. Don't hold back. You know you want it. Give me fifty. Fifty. We have fifty.
Q: I hate to interrupt such a thrilling display of naked avarice, but I thought it was only right of me to warn you that this station is hurtling toward its doom, and it's very unlikely any of you will survive to enjoy your purchases. I just thought I'd mention it. Please, carry on.
QUARK: Ladies and gentlemen, I assure you, everything is under control. Drinks for everyone. And free use of the holosuites at the conclusion of the auction. And
VASH: I don't think I realised until this moment how evil you really are. You'd kill all these people to get even with me.
Q: I must admit, the thought had occurred to me, but this station is in enough trouble without me. Although I'd be glad to save you. All you have to do is ask. VASH I'll take my chances with the others. As you choose. I'm going to just right here sit here and watch. I've never seen a space station torn apart by a wormhole before.
QUARK: Sold to my cousin Stol for a hundred and five bars of gold pressed latinum.
[now in "Ops"]
KIRA: What if we pump more tridium gas into the central core? The sensors might be more accurate with the greater concentration.
SISKO: Chief, you have Ops.
[now in "Quark's"]
KOLOS: Twenty-five hundred.
Q: Twenty-five hundred and one.
[now in "Promenade"]
DAX: This way.
[now in "Quark's"]
KOLOS: Three thousand bars of latinum. My final offer.
QUARK: Three thousand bars.
Q: A million.
QUARK: A million bars of gold press latinum?
DAX: Over here.
QUARK: Sold.
SISKO: Chief, shut down the reactors. We've found it.
Q: And it's about time, too.
QUARK: Sorry, all transactions are final. This item now belongs to that gentleman over there.
DAX: I'm reading a massive graviton build up inside this container. It's increasing exponentially. We have got to get it off the station now.
VASH: Forget it, Quark. I'm going back to Earth.
QUARK: Have it your way.
Q: An abysmal place.
VASH: Tartaras Five?
Q: Earth. Oh, don't get me wrong. A thousand years ago it had character. Crusades, Spanish Inquisition, Watergate. But now it's just mind-numbingly dull.
VASH: Well then by all means, don't come with me.
Q: I think you'd be much happier poking about the ruins of Tartaras Five.
VASH: I don't need your advice. You really think I
Q: You know, I still feel that I owe you a million bars of gold pressed latinum.
VASH: Keep it. Just give me back my life.
Q: You'll regret it if I do.
VASH: I'm willing to take my chances.
Q: All right. If you insist. But it's not going to be the same without you. When I look at a gas nebula, all I see is a cloud of dust. Seeing the universe through your eyes, I was able to experience wonder. I'm going to miss that.
VASH: Well, I guess in some ways I'm going to miss you too.
Q: Maybe I could drop in sometime.
VASH: Oh, God, I hope not.
ANNOTATION: (Q vanishes)
JANEWAY: Return my crew!
QUINN: I, I'm not sure how. Humans. Humans. Who would have more recent experience with humans?
Q: What have you done now, Q? Well, now, isn't this just fine. Humans aren't supposed to be in this quadrant for another hundred years.
QUINN: I didn't bring them here. Nothing to do with me.
Q: How did you get out, Q?
JANEWAY: I'm afraid we're responsible for that.
Q: Oh, well, I guess that's what we get for having a woman in the captain's seat. You know, I was betting that Riker would get this command.
JANEWAY: May I assume you're the Q I've heard so much about?
Q: Have you heard about little me? Oh, do tell. Has Jean-Luc been whispering about me behind my back? Say, is this the ship of the Valkyries, or have you human women finally done away with your men altogether?
QUINN: There was a slight accident.
Q: A slight accident. Oh, let me guess. You were trying to commit suicide. Now you see why we've locked him up for the last three hundred years.
ANNOTATION: (Q snaps his fingers and the men reappear. He peers at Chakotay's tattoo.)
Q: Facial art. Ooo, how very wilderness of you.
CHAKOTAY: Captain?
Q: All right, Q, we should be going.
QUINN: I'm not leaving. Captain Janeway, I demand asylum.
Q: This is a joke.
QUINN: No it isn't. I am officially asking you, Captain, to grant me asylum and give me protection from my enemies, which is him.
Q: You would ask these puny humans to protect you from me? Fat chance.
ANNOTATION: (Quinn makes Q disappear. The ship starts shaking.)
JANEWAY: What did you do to him?
TUVOK: Captain, based on our readings, it appears we've been transported back in time to the birth of the universe.
QUINN: Very old hiding place.
Q: Oh, I know all the hiding places, Q. I hid here from the Continuum myself once.
TORRES: This ship will not survive the formation of the cosmos.
Q: Yes, but just think of the honour of having your DNA spread from one corner of the universe to the other. Why, you could be the origin of the humanoid form.
JANEWAY: Q, either Q, get us out of here.
Q: You heard the lady, Q. Back to your cell.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears again.)
PARIS: We're under attack.
QUINN: He'll never find us here.
JANEWAY: Mister Tuvok, see if you can release a positive ion charge to repel them.
Q: Ready or not, here I am.
ANNOTATION: (And vanishes again. The shaking stops.)
JANEWAY: Oh, now what?
JANEWAY: Let's see it. Computer, I need a wider angle.
ANNOTATION: (They are an ornament on a Christmas tree.)
Q: [on viewscreen] You can't hide from me, Q.
QUINN: And you can't take me by force. I'll stalemate you for eternity, if I have to.
JANEWAY: The hell you will. The vaunted Q Continuum. Self-anointed guardians of the universe. How dare you come aboard this ship and endanger this crew with your personal tug of war.
Q: [on viewscreen] Did anyone ever tell you you're angry when you're beautiful?
PARIS: We're back where we started from, Captain.
QUINN: It's doesn't matter. I'm not going into that cell.
Q: How would you like to spend eternity as a Gorokian midwife toad.
QUINN: Just try it.
JANEWAY: Stop! You want asylum? Fine. We'll have a hearing.
Q: A hearing? You would have me put his future in your delicate little hands? Oh, so touchably soft. What is your secret, dear?
JANEWAY: When the captain of a Starfleet vessel receives an official request for asylum, there is a clear procedure to follow. I suggest to end your deadlock, and to save my ship, that we follow it to the letter.
Q: Well, this could go on for a millennium or two, I suppose. All right, I accept on behalf of the Continuum on one condition. If you rule in our favour, Q agrees to return to his confinement.
QUINN: I have a condition of my own. If you rule in my favour, then the Continuum must grant me mortality.
Q: Why? So you can kill yourself?
QUINN: Exactly.
Q: Accepted. Well, this is going to make for an amusing diversion. Will you send him to prison for eternity or will you assist in his suicide plan? That's a toughie, but that's why they made you captain, isn't it? To handle the real tough ones? My, my. Now I guess now we get to find out whether the pants really fit.
[now in "Tuvok's office"]
ANNOTATION: (Quinn zaps in as Tuvok is reading a PADD.)
QUINN: Am I interrupting anything?
QUINN: I have the right to counsel, Mister Tuvok. Will you assist me?
[now in "Hearing room"]
JANEWAY: Let me begin by stating clearly that I expect all parties to act appropriately and with respect for these proceedings. I will not have this hearing turned into a circus, is that clear? Is that clear, Q?
Q: Madam Captain, we are dealing here with an issue of the greatest importance to the Q Continuum. I assure you we take this matter very seriously.
JANEWAY: Thank you. And please don't call me Madam Captain. Since you've made it clear that your asylum would lead to suicide, you place me in a difficult position.
QUINN: I understand, Captain.
JANEWAY: May I ask you why you want to commit suicide?
QUINN: As difficult as it is for you to imagine, for me, immortality is impossible to endure any longer. In the Continuum, an individual has an obligation to be responsible to the path his life will follow.
Q: His life will follow. Emphasise life.
QUINN: I never yielded that obligation to the Continuum. If the path I choose leads to death, what right have they to interfere?
Q: He's putting his selfish wishes above the welfare of everyone else.
QUINN: And if I don't agree with the majority, I'm to be locked up for eternity.
Q: You would not be confined if you were not intent on harming yourself. With your permission, Captain, I would like to call an expert on the Continuum to discuss the implications of the decision to be made.
JANEWAY: Proceed.
Q: I call myself to the stand.
Q2: Ta-da!
Q: Thank you for coming. It's a rare honour to have someone of your reputation and accomplishment with us today.
Q2: Thank you.
Q: Tell me, what would be the impact of a Q suicide?
Q2: Oh, it would be an interruption to the Continuum. It would change the very nature of Q.
JANEWAY: Can you be more specific?
Q2: No, because we're not even sure what the end result would be. His suicide could have all sorts of unknown consequences to the Continuum.
QUINN: Precisely! It would force the Q to deal with the unknown for the first time since the New Era began. They're afraid of me because they're afraid of the unknown.
Q: How would you characterise his remarks?
Q2: No Q has ever tried to commit suicide. Immortality is one of the defining qualities of being a Q. By every measure of the Continuum, his remarks would have to be considered as mentally unbalanced.
Q: Mentally unbalanced. And no civilised people in the universe, including the primitive Federation societies, would condone the suicide of a mentally unbalanced person.
TUVOK: Tell me Q, can you offer any other evidence of mental instability on the part of my client?
Q2: What more do I need? He wants to kill himself.
TUVOK: So, your entire basis for judging him mentally unbalanced is his wish to commit suicide. I submit that is a faulty premise. In many cultures, suicide is acceptable, and in and of itself cannot be used as evidence of mental illness.
JANEWAY: I tend to agree with Mister Tuvok.
Q: Vulcans.
TUVOK: Is it not true that on occasion the Continuum has executed Qs for certain crimes?
Q2: On rare occasions, yes.
JANEWAY: Any other questions, Lieutenant?
TUVOK: Just one other thing. Isn't it true that you yourself were once accused of being mentally unstable by the Continuum? Were you not you disciplined for inappropriate behaviour?
Q: Objection.
JANEWAY: I'll allow the question.
Q2: My record has been expunged.
JANEWAY: You're excused.
ANNOTATION: (The second Q vanishes.)
Q: If I may beg the court's indulgence, I have other witnesses to call.
JANEWAY: To what end?
Q: Your Captain Honour, I am here to argue for the majesty of life. What it means to us to be alive. A Q's life takes him to all corners of the universe. This Q's life has touched and affected many, many others, including some on your own homeworld. With your permission, I would like to call some of those people whose lives have been changed by this Q.
JANEWAY: You want to bring people here from Earth?
Q: I promise it won't impact the timeline, and no one will remember ever having being here after I send them back.
JANEWAY: This is most unusual. Do you have any objection, Mister Tuvok?
TUVOK: I am as curious as you are, Captain.
JANEWAY: You're having a very strange dream, and in this dream, you're seeing this man whom you've all met before.
NEWTON: Yes I have seen that man before. You were sitting under the tree the day
Q: The day the apple fell on your head?
NEWTON: Yes. That's right.
Q: Quite a day, wasn't it? As a matter of fact, this man jostled the tree when he got up to leave.
NEWTON: Just before the apple fell, yes.
Q: And a new era in human science was born.
GINSBERG: Wait a minute. Weren't you the guy in the jeep?
Q: The guy in the jeep, who picked you up after your own vehicle broke down that summer afternoon, isn't that right?
GINSBERG: Oh, man, he was a lifesaver. My van died and they dragged it off the road because of all the traffic. It was backed up for miles.
Q: You were on your way to a job, weren't you?
GINSBERG: Yeah, I was supposed to be on the follow spot up on tower three. I never would have made it in time if it weren't for him. Hey, whatever happened with that groovy chick with the long red beads in the back seat? I've been looking for her ever since you dropped me off.
QUINN: You'll see her again, don't worry.
Q: To sum up, you were a spotlight operator at an outdoor concert of some sort. A concert that was put in jeopardy moments before it was to begin, because the entire sound system failed.
GINSBERG: Oh, it was no big deal. Somebody must have snagged an extension cord with one of the trucks, that's all. I'm just lucky I noticed it.
Q: Yes, lucky you were at the right place at the right time, or it would have taken days to track down the problem and there would have been no concert.
RIKER: Well, I'm sorry to say I have met him, but I've never seen this man before in my life.
Q: Are you sure?
TUVOK: Has it not been established that my client has in captivity during all of Commander Riker's lifetime?
Q: Have you seen this photograph before?
ANNOTATION: (On an easel, a sepia picture of two Civil War soldiers.)
RIKER: Sure I have. That is Colonel Thaddeus Riker after he was wounded at Pine Mountain. They used to call him Old Iron Boots. He was in command of the Hundred and Second New York during General Sherman's march on Atlanta. This picture was taken in eighteen sixty four, just after they let him out of the army hospital.
Q: And the soldier beside him?
RIKER: I'll be damned. It's him.
Q: As a matter of fact, he carried your wounded ancestor back from the front line. Didn't you? My point is, Captain, that Q has had a profound influence on these three lives. Without Q, Isaac Newton would have died forgotten in a Liverpool debtor's prison, a suspect in several prostitute murders. Without Q, there would have been no concert at, er.
QUINN: Woodstock.
Q: Wherever. More importantly, Mister Ginsberg would never have met his future wife, the groovy chick with the long red beads, and he would never have become a successful orthodontist, settled in Scarsdale with four kids.
GINSBERG: Far out.
Q: Yes. Without Q there would have been no William T. Riker at all, and I would have lost at least a dozen really good opportunities to insult him over the years. Oh, and lest I forget, without Q, the Borg would have assimilated the Federation. Thank you. Thank you.
ANNOTATION: (The witnesses vanish.)
Q: This is the life Q treats without respect. This is the life that he would give up so easily.
TUVOK: May I remind this hearing, and my learned colleague, that for three centuries, my client has not been allowed contact with anyone. At this time, we would like to reproduce the environment in which he has been confined.
Q: I object.
JANEWAY: No, I'll allow this.
ANNOTATION: (Quinn does the transporting.)
ANNOTATION: (It is very cramped.)
TUVOK: These are the conditions my client would be forced to live in for eternity if you deny asylum, Captain.
Q: We just want to give him time to reconsider his position.
QUINN: I will never change my mind.
Q: This is your own doing. You could live a perfectly normal life if you were simply willing to live a perfectly normal life.
JANEWAY: I've seen enough. Please return us to the hearing room.
[now in "Hearing room"]
TUVOK: I would submit that the quality of life that my client will have to endure should be considered in this proceeding.
TUVOK: Then perhaps what we should do next is take this hearing to see life in the Continuum itself.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. I'm determined to find a better alternative to suicide or endless prison, so I've summoned the advocate Q to make him a proposal.
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: Yes, what is it, Captain?
JANEWAY: Come to the next session of the hearing and announce that the Continuum is ready to reintegrate Q into your society. That you won't condemn him to that cell for eternity.
Q: And you will rule in our favour.
JANEWAY: I would consider it a very meaningful gesture by the Continuum.
Q: How would you know if I intended to keep my word?
JANEWAY: Based on my research, you have been many things. A rude, interfering, inconsiderate, sadistic
Q: You've made your point.
JANEWAY: Pest. And, oh yes, you introduced us to the Borg, thank you very much. But one thing you have never been is a liar.
Q: I think you've uncovered my one redeeming virtue. Am I blushing? I wish I could help you, Kathy. I just can't. We're dealing here with the most dangerous man in the Continuum. Now I didn't tell you this, but one of his self destructive stunts created a misunderstanding which ignited the hundred year war between the Romulans and the Vulcans. No, this man goes back into his confinement. But I would like to make it easier for you. The Continuum is prepared to do you a little favour, if we approve of your ruling. Look out the window.
ANNOTATION: (Earth.)
Q: Now you see it. Now you don't.
[now in "Hearing room"]
TUVOK: We are prepared to illustrate the nature of Q's suffering, Captain. But in order to do so, we must show this hearing what life is like in the Continuum.
Q: And how do you intend to do that?
TUVOK: By going to the Continuum itself.
JANEWAY: Is this possible?
Q: No. It's a ridiculous idea. You would never understand.
TUVOK: My client has the right to ask for an inspection of the living conditions that lead to his suffering, Captain.
JANEWAY: I would agree with that.
Q: I suppose you have some crazy idea how to pull this off?
QUINN: Yes.
ANNOTATION: (Quinn whispers in Q's ear.)
Q: Only if.
QUINN: Fine, fine.
Q: We've agreed on a format for this little sojourn. But I still believe it's ill-advised.
JANEWAY: I'll be the judge of that. Whenever you're ready.
ANNOTATION: (They both raise their hands.)
Q: No, please.
ANNOTATION: (Quinn does the honours.)
[now in "Desert road"]
JANEWAY: This is the Q Continuum? A road in a desert?
Q: I told you so.
QUINN: This is a manifestation of the Continuum that we hope falls within your level of comprehension. This way.
[now in "Roadside building"]
ANNOTATION: (A man and woman in 20s clothes are playing croquet on an immaculate lawn, with planets for balls. A scarecrow in Starfleet uniform stands nearby. The sign over the door says Never Closes and the clock has no hands. A man puffing on a pipe is reading a book called The Old while a young woman reads a magazine called The New. Someone plays the Continuum Galaxy pinball machine. The group walk past a panting bloodhound.)
JANEWAY: Why?
QUINN: Because I hadn't done it.
Q: Oh, we've all done the scarecrow. Big deal.
JANEWAY: I can't say I entirely understand what I'm seeing here, but these people don't seem to be suffering.
Q: Of course not. They're happy people. Happy people. What's there to feel sad about? Look at them.
QUINN: They don't dare feel sad. If only they could, that would be progress.
Q: Oh, the philosopher speaks.
QUINN: When I was a respected philosopher, I celebrated the continuity, the undeviation of Q life. I argued that our civilisation had achieved a purity that no other culture had ever approached. And it was wonderful, for a while. At the beginning of the New Era, life as a Q was a continuous dialogue of discovery and issues and humour from all over the universe. But look at them now. Listen to their dialogue now.
TUVOK: I'm afraid I cannot hear any.
QUINN: Because it has all been said. Everyone has heard everything, seen everything. They haven't had to speak to each other in ten millennia. There's nothing left to say.
Q: Well, I don't know about you, but I appreciate a little peace and quiet now and again.
QUINN: It's ironic, isn't it, Q.
Q: I don't know what you mean.
QUINN: Of course you do. That you of all people should be arguing their case.
Q: I believe in the ultimate purity of the Q.
QUINN: You, who were banned from the Continuum and made mortal to pay for your crimes?
Q: My penance has ended. I'm a born again Q. That life is behind me.
QUINN: What a shame. Because in many ways, that life inspired me.
Q: It did? I did?
QUINN: Oh, yes. You never knew that, did you? You see, Captain, Q rebelled against this existence by refusing to behave himself. He was out of control. He used his powers irresponsibly and all for his own amusement. And he desperately needed amusement, because he could find none here at home.
Q: And I paid the price for my inappropriate behaviour.
QUINN: No, no, we paid the price by forcing you to stop. But for a moment there, you really had our attention. My attention. You gave us something to talk about. But then you surrendered to the will of the Continuum like a good little Q, and may I say that you've become a fine, upstanding member of the Continuum. But I miss the irrepressible Q, the one who forced me to think. May I borrow this?
ANNOTATION: (Quinn takes the The New magazine from the woman and shows and article to Janeway.)
(MY CORNER OF THE CONTINUUM. IM READY TO DIE: How About You?)
QUINN: But they couldn't keep me silent. I continued to speak out in favour of self-termination.
Q: That's when he lost his mind and started trying to destroy himself. We had no choice but to confine him but for his own safety.
QUINN: Not for my safety. For theirs. I was the greatest threat the Continuum had ever known. They feared me so much they had to lock me away for eternity. And when they did that, they were saying that the individual's rights will be protected only so long as they don't conflict with the state. Nothing is so dangerous to a society. My life's work is complete, but they force immortality on me, and when the do that they cheapen and denigrate my life and all life in the Continuum. All life. Captain, you're an explorer. What if you had nothing left to explore? Would you want to live forever under those circumstances? You want me to prove to you that I suffer in terms that you can equate with pain or disease. Look at us. When life has become futile, meaningless, unendurable, it must be allowed to end. Can't you see, Captain? For us, the disease is immortality.
[now in "Hearing room"]
TUVOK: We rest our case, Captain.
JANEWAY: Very well. I'll make my ruling in the morning. We'll be in recess until then.
[now in "Janeway's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Janeway rolls over in bed to come nose to nose with Q wearing a night cap.)
Q: Trouble sleeping? Did you ever try warm Kylerian goat's milk?
ANNOTATION: (Janeway leaps out of bed and puts on her dressing gown.)
JANEWAY: Get out.
Q: Did you think about our offer?
JANEWAY: You mean your bribe.
Q: Merely an incentive to make the proper decision.
JANEWAY: It'll play no part in my deliberations.
Q: No, I told them it wouldn't. That's why I talked them into giving you what you asked for. You have my word. He won't go back to the cell. We'll assign someone to look after him. Whatever it takes. It's what you wanted, isn't it?
JANEWAY: That's what I wanted.
Q: So, you've won. Let's celebrate. Just you and me. The two of us.
JANEWAY: What?
Q: I'll take you home. Before you know it, you'll be scampering across the meadow with your little puppies, the grass beneath your bare feet. A man, coming over the hill way in the distance, waves to you. You run to be in his arms and as you get closer you see that it's me.
JANEWAY: You?
Q: Forget Mark. I know how to show a girl a good time. How would you like a ticker-tape parade down Sri Lanka Boulevard? The captain who brought Voyager back. A celebrated hero. I never did anything like that for Jean-Luc. But I feel very close to you. I'm not sure why. Maybe it's because you have such authority and yet manage to preserve your femininity so well.
JANEWAY: Leave.
Q: We'll talk about this after the hearing tomorrow.
[now in "Hearing room"]
JANEWAY: I've tried to find some way to reconcile all the conflicting emotions I've felt during this hearing. My own aversion to suicide, my compassion for your situation, Q. It hasn't been easy. I've tried to tell myself that this is not about suicide, but about granting asylum. That I am not personally being asked to perform euthanasia. And as technically true as that may be, I cannot escape the moral implications of my choices. I've also had to consider that a decision to grant asylum, and the subsequent suicide of a Q, might have a significant impact on the Continuum. That such a decision could change the nature of an entire society, whether it be a favourable or unfavourable change, disturbs me greatly. But then there are the rights of the individual in this matter. I don't believe that you are mentally unbalanced. And I do believe that you are suffering intolerably. Under these conditions, I find it impossible to support immortality forced on an individual by the state. The unforeseen disruption that may occur in the Continuum is not enough, in my opinion, to justify any additional suffering by this individual. So, I hereby grant you asylum.
Q: May I see you in your chambers, Captain?
JANEWAY: You've been in my chambers enough for one visit, sir.
Q: A sidebar, your honour. Only for a moment.
QUINN: She ruled in my favour. You made a promise.
ANNOTATION: (Q snaps his fingers. Quinn does his vanish gesture.)
QUINN: Nothing happened. Nothing! My powers are gone! I'm mortal.
Q: Well, so much for ticker-tape parades.
JANEWAY: I'm not finished, Q. Now that you're mortal, you have a new existence to explore. An entirely new state of being filled with the mysteries of mortal life, pleasures you've never felt before. I like this life, Q. You might too. Think hard before you give it up. This hearing is adjourned.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 49301.2. We have assigned quarters to our new passenger, who has entered his name on our crew manifest as Quinn. I am anxious to engage him in ship activities as soon as possible.
TUVOK: The replicators will not produce them either.
JANEWAY: So how did he get his hands on Nogatch hemlock?
Q: I got it for him.
TUVOK: You assisted his suicide?
Q: Illogical, Tuvok? 1 don't think so. By demanding to end his life, he taught me a little something about my own. He was right when he said the Continuum scared me back in line. I didn't have his courage or his convictions. He called me irrepressible. This was a man who was truly irrepressible. I only hope I make a worthy student.
JANEWAY: I imagine the Continuum won't be very happy with you, Q.
Q: I certainly hope not. Au revoir, Madam Captain. We will meet again.
ANNOTATION: (Janeway enters her quarters, and sees a bed covered in red satin sheets with heart-shaped pillows.)
JANEWAY: Janeway to security. Intruder alert.
Q: There's no need to call room service, Kathy. I've already ordered.
ANNOTATION: (He is wearing a red silk dressing gown.)
JANEWAY: Oh, Q.
Q: You did say you wanted champagne?
JANEWAY: Janeway to security. Intruder alert.
Q: Oh, it's no use. I've taken the proverbial phone off the hook. After all, we don't want any interruptions.
JANEWAY: What are you doing here?
Q: To us.
JANEWAY: There is no us, Q.
Q: The night is young, and the sheets are satin.
JANEWAY: I want you out. But first, get rid of this bed.
Q: I have no intention of getting between those Starfleet issue sheets. They give me a terrible rash.
JANEWAY: Since you won't be getting in the bed, I wouldn't worry about it.
Q: Oh, Kathy, don't be such a prude. Admit it. It has been a while.
JANEWAY: And it's going to be a while longer. Now get out.
Q: So tense. Why don't you slip into something more comfortable?
ANNOTATION: (Flash, and she is in a silk nightdress.)
JANEWAY: If you think this puerile attempt at seduction is going to work, you're even more self-deluded than I thought.
Q: Now I see. You think I'm interested in some tawdry one night stand. That's because I haven't told you why I'm here yet. Out of all the females of all the species in all the galaxies, I have chosen you to be the mother of my child.
JANEWAY: Oh!
Q: I know that you're probably asking yourself, why would a brilliant, handsome, dashingly omnipotent being like Q want to mate with a scrawny little bipedal specimen like me?
JANEWAY: Let me guess. No one else in the universe will have you.
Q: Nonsense. I could have chosen a Klingon Targ, the Romulan empress, a Cyrillian microbe.
ANNOTATION: (Janeway puts on a dressing gown.)
JANEWAY: Really? I beat out a single-celled organism? How flattering.
Q: It's an overwhelming honour, isn't it? I can't get you out of my mind. You're confident, passionate, beautiful.
JANEWAY: And totally uninterested.
Q: Kathy, you can't leave. My cosmic clock is ticking. Besides, you have no idea what you're missing. Foreplay with a Q can last for decades.
JANEWAY: Sorry, but I'm busy for the next sixty or seventy years.
Q: Oh, I see, this is one of those silly human rituals. You're playing hard to get.
JANEWAY: As far as you're concerned, Q, I'm impossible to get.
Q: Goody! A challenge. This is going to be fun.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears, and so does the awful bed.)
JANEWAY: Janeway to bridge.
JANEWAY: Chakotay.
CHAKOTAY: I know I don't have any right to feel this way, but this bothers the hell out of me.
Q: I do believe you're jealous. (to Janeway) Why didn't you tell me there was another man?
ANNOTATION: (Q is in Starfleet uniform.)
JANEWAY: Because there isn't. I'm just not interested in you.
CHAKOTAY: Any more questions?
Q: I was wondering, Kathy. What could anyone possibly see in this big oaf, anyway? Is it the tattoo? Because mine's bigger.
ANNOTATION: (And covers the left half of his face.)
JANEWAY: Not big enough.
KIM: That'll be the day.
ANNOTATION: (The ladies are removed to a newcomer.)
Q: Nice programme, Tommy. But it's all just so much holo-pleasure, isn't it?
PARIS: All right, Q, we'll bite. What do you want?
Q: Guys, I just don't understand your Captain. I've tried everything. Filling the Bridge with roses, writing Drabian love sonnets, serenading her in her bath.
PARIS: Oh, I'll bet she loved that one.
Q: But no matter what lengths I go to win her heart, she rejects me. Me! How, I ask you, is that possible?
KIM: Did it ever occur to you that she just doesn't like you?
Q: No.
PARIS: Look, Q, we've been told about your appearances on the Enterprise. We know your little visits usually turn out to be more than meet the eye. So save your broken heart routine, and tell us what you're really after.
Q: I just thought that the two of you might be able to give me some advice on how to break through Kathy's icy exterior. You know, man to man.
PARIS: My advice would be to give up before you embarrass yourself anymore than you already have. Come on, Harry. We're not going to get a straight answer out of this guy.
Q: You, bar rodent, another one of these fruity concoctions.
NEELIX: Not unless you tell me why you're bothering Captain Janeway.
Q: Captain Janeway? Now that's a subject I want to discuss. Tell me, what are some of her favourite things. Chocolate truffles? Stuffed animals? Erotic art?
NEELIX: You can't bribe Captain Janeway.
Q: Oh, no? Isn't that what you do?
NEELIX: What are you talking about?
Q: I understand that you acquire things for her, create little interesting diversions, prepare little tasty treats. After all, why else would she be so fond of your fur-lined face?
NEELIX: Do you want to know what Captain Janeway likes about me? I'll tell you. I am respectful, loyal and most of all, sincere. And those are qualities which someone like you could never hope to possess.
[now in "Ready room"]
ANNOTATION: (Janeway hears the whimpering of a small canine and goes to investigate. The cocker spaniel puppy is in a basket under her desk.)
JANEWAY: This isn't going to work, Q.
Q: How can you ignore that face?
JANEWAY: He's adorable. But this has to stop.
Q: Please, accept him as a small token of my affection.
JANEWAY: No.
Q: Suit yourself. May we talk? Just talk.
ANNOTATION: (Q sits on the bench below the windows, cradling the puppy. Janeway reluctantly joins him.)
Q: I'm afraid that I haven't been sincere. When you first asked why I wanted to have a child with you, I made jokes, bragged about my prowess, engaged in sexual innuendo. I was using all that to cover up my true feelings.
JANEWAY: And I suppose you want to share your true feelings with me now.
Q: I'm lonely.
JANEWAY: Lonely?
Q: Oh, I know it's hard to believe, but I've been single for billions of years. It was fun at first, gallivanting around the galaxy, using my omnipotence to impress females of every species. The fact of the matter is, it left me empty. I want someone to love me for myself. I guess what I'm saying is, I want a relationship. I just thought if you and I had a child, it would give me that kind of stability and security that I've been missing.
JANEWAY: Sorry, Q. I'm not buying it.
ANNOTATION: (He passes over the puppy.)
Q: Oh. All right. Let's see if you buy this. You're stuck out here, thousands of light years from home, and you aren't getting any younger, are you? All your hopes for home, hearth and family grow dimmer every day. Admit it, Kathryn, you're lonely too. And you wonder if you will ever have a child.
JANEWAY: You're right. I would like to have a child someday. But not with you.
Q: Why not?
JANEWAY: I'm just not the right kind of woman for you, Q.
FEMALE Q: Truer words were never spoken.
ANNOTATION: (A tall, sarcastic redhead in Starfleet uniform.)
Q: Q! How did you find me?
FEMALE Q: Never mind that. What are you doing with that dog? I'm not talking about the puppy.
Q: Can't you see I'm busy here? Stop stalking me.
FEMALE Q: You should be back in the Continuum.
JANEWAY: Excuse me, but who are you exactly?
Q: Kathryn Janeway, may I present Q.
FEMALE Q: Not just any Q. His Q.
Q: We were involved for a while.
FEMALE Q: About four billion years. And now you desert me to pollute the Continuum with the DNA of this narrow little being.
Q: I never said it was exclusive.
FEMALE Q: Stay away from him.
JANEWAY: Look, Miss Q, I'll save you a lot of trouble. I have zero interest in him.
Q: Oh! Now you see what you've done? And I was finally making progress.
CHAKOTAY: Bridge to Janeway. You'd better come in here, Captain.
JANEWAY: On my way.
JANEWAY: A star going supernova is an event that occurs once every century in this galaxy. Now we're about to witness our third in less than three days, all in the same sector. Why do I suspect you have something to do with this?
FEMALE Q: She maybe a member of an intellectually challenged species, but she's right. Your irresponsible behaviour is continuing to have cosmic consequences.
Q: Will you stop overreacting? Always nagging. Now you see why I left her.
JANEWAY: Are you causing these supernovas?
Q: Well, not exactly.
JANEWAY: What's that supposed to mean?
PARIS: It's no use, Captain. the shock wave is too fast for us.
CHAKOTAY: Sixteen seconds to impact. I'm not sure if the shields will hold.
JANEWAY: Do something, Q.
Q: Well, if you insist.
ANNOTATION: (Q snaps his fingers, and he and Janeway disappear.)
FEMALE Q: That two-timing toad!
JANEWAY: Q? Where have you taken me?
ANNOTATION: (She tries the doors and they are locked. Then Q enters dressed as a US Civil War Union Army officer.)
Q: Well, I must admit, your gown is very becoming.
JANEWAY: I don't have time for your little fantasies. Return me to Voyager.
Q: This is no fantasy. You're in the Q Continuum.
JANEWAY: The Continuum?
Q: That's right. I'm simply allowing you to perceive it in the context your human mind can comprehend.
JANEWAY: The last time you brought me here, it looked like some sort of way station on a desert road.
Q: It was awfully drab, wasn't it? But this, this is a much more colourful representation for a human of American descent, don't you think? An elegant manor house, a beautiful Southern belle, a dashing Union officer determined to win her affections despite her hatred for Yankee interlopers.
JANEWAY: Enough. The only thing that interests me right now is the welfare of my ship and crew.
Q: Well, I'm sure your first officer, Chuckles, is it? I'm sure he's got everything under control for the moment.
JANEWAY: I'd like to make sure of that myself, if you don't mind.
Q: This has gone way beyond your ship. It's even gone beyond you and me. This is about the future of the Continuum itself.
JANEWAY: Stop speaking in riddles, and tell me what's going on.
Q: I'll do better than that. I'll show you.
ANNOTATION: (He opens the shutters on the French windows. Fires burn in the distance, and there is the sound of cannonfire.)
Q: The Continuum is burning. The Q are in the middle of a civil war.
JANEWAY: Start explaining.
Q: Do you remember our friend, Quinn?
JANEWAY: The Q who committed suicide aboard Voyager?
Q: Do you recall what I said might happen if he were allowed to take his own life?
JANEWAY: You said it would represent an interruption to the Continuum. That it could have dire consequences.
Q: I'd say a civil war is pretty dire, wouldn't you?
JANEWAY: His death caused this conflict?
Q: It caused chaos and upheaval. Because even though he was gone, his calls for freedom and individualism continued to echo in the ears of those who believed in his teachings, myself among them. I sounded the trumpet and carried the banner. Naturally, others followed. The forces of the status quo tried to crush us once and for all, but we fought back. And now there's a cosmic struggle for supremacy, and the battle is spreading, causing hazardous repercussions throughout the galaxy.
JANEWAY: Oh! The supernovas.
Q: You might call them galactic cross fire. It's terrible, isn't it? But it's also a wonderful opportunity.
JANEWAY: I fail to see anything wonderful about a war.
Q: War can be an engine of change. War can transform a society for the better. Your own Civil War brought about an end to slavery and oppression.
JANEWAY: But our Civil War came at a time before mankind had learned to resolve disputes without bloodshed. Surely the Q have evolved to a point where you can find a non-violent way to resolve a conflict.
Q: That's where you come in.
JANEWAY: What do I have to do with any of this, Q?
Q: I want you to help me transform the Continuum in the same way your Civil War transformed a nation.
JANEWAY: By mating with you?
Q: I know. It's brilliant, isn't it?
JANEWAY: I don't see how a baby is going to end a war being fought by a race of omnipotent beings.
Q: It's simple. Mating will create a new breed of Q, which will combine my omnipotence and infinite intellect with the best that humanity has to offer.
JANEWAY: You believe human DNA is going to restore peace?
Q: Precisely. What the Continuum needs right now is an infusion of fresh blood, a new sensibility, a new leader, a new messiah. Think of it, Kathy. Our child will be like a precious stone tossed into the cosmic lake, sending endless ripples of human conscience and compassion to wash up on every distant shore of the universe. What greater contribution could a being of your limited power ever hope to make? What is more important to humanity than peace? I'm offering you the opportunity to be the mother of peace.
ANNOTATION: (Gunshots break the window glass. Q pulls Janeway to safety on the floor.)
Q: Well, what's it going to be? Oh!
JANEWAY: Q! You're bleeding.
ANNOTATION: (Bullets continue to smash glass as Q stares in disbelief at the red on his hand.)
TUVOK: May I remind you, madam, that this rickety barge and its half-witted crew are your only hope at the moment.
[now in "Q Continuum - Colonial Manor House"]
ANNOTATION: (Q and Janeway are taking shelter behind a settee whilst she tears strips off her petticoats to staunch Q's wound.)
Q: Ow! That hurts.
JANEWAY: Be still. I never thought a Q could be injured.
Q: As I said, this is only a perception of what is happening. I can assure you, those are not mere cannonballs and lead charges being fired at us.
JANEWAY: So they're some sort of Q weapons?
Q: You'd be surprised what innovative munitions can be created by one immortal being who's set his mind on killing another.
COLONEL Q: Hold your fire. Hold your fire! You're surrounded, Q. Surrender now. We'll be merciful.
JANEWAY: Call a truce. Talk to them. Maybe you can resolve this peacefully.
COLONEL Q: What's your answer, Q?
ANNOTATION: (Q draws his revolver and totters over to the windows.)
Q: Ill never surrender! You know that!
ANNOTATION: (He shoots at the people outside.)
COLONEL Q: Resume fire. Resume fire!
Q: Get the rifle in the corner and take the other window.
JANEWAY: This is your fight, Q, not mine.
Q: If that's how you feel about it. But if their weapons can make me bleed, what do you think they'll do to you?
ANNOTATION: (A cannonball lands, knocking Q down.)
JANEWAY: Q! Come on. Come on.
ANNOTATION: (Suzie Plaxton also played K'Ehleyr, Worf's wife, in Next Generation, after being a Vulcan doctor.)
[now in "Q Continuum - Union army camp"]
ANNOTATION: (Janeway wipes Q's head with a damp cloth. He wakes.)
Q: Where are we?
JANEWAY: One of your faction's encampments.
Q: How?
JANEWAY: I pulled you out of the mansion and managed to hide you from the enemy patrols. Then I spotted some of your people retreating from the battle. From the look of them, I'd say you're not on the winning side.
Q: You saved my life.
JANEWAY: And now it's time to end all this.
Q: I knew you'd come around.
JANEWAY: I've been thinking about what you said, that creating a new Q could bring an era of peace.
Q: Oh, my wild, sweet Kathy. I promise you won't regret it.
JANEWAY: Oh, you're not going to have a child with me. You're going to mate with that charming lady friend of yours that appeared on my ship.
Q: Mate with another Q? Ridiculous.
JANEWAY: It sounded to me like you and she had a very long term relationship.
Q: Yes, but it was never physical. I mean, the Q are way beyond sex. It's never been done.
JANEWAY: Really? Then how exactly did the Q come into existence in the first place?
Q: The Q didn't come into existence. The Q have always existed. Besides, I can only mate with a species capable of copulation, like you.
JANEWAY: But I don't love you, Q.
Q: Yes, but what does that have to do with it?
JANEWAY: Everything. It's the foundation of a family. I could never have a child with someone I didn't love, much less give it up to the Continuum.
Q: Dearest Kathy, I would never dream of having you give it up. I mean, who would raise it? Who would look after it? I'm really not cut out to be a wet nurse.
JANEWAY: Oh, so you're not willing to do the hard work?
Q: I'm an idea man. Hard work isn't my forte.
JANEWAY: I'd change specialties if I were you, because the kind of trouble you're in needs more than a quick fix. You can't just sprinkle a little human DNA into the Continuum and make everything all right.
Q: Why not?
JANEWAY: Those best qualities of humanity you talked about aren't a simple matter of genetics. Love, conscience, compassion.
ANNOTATION: (She fits him with a sling.)
Q: Ow.
JANEWAY: They're attributes that mankind has developed over centuries. Values that have passed from one generation to the next, taught by parents to their children. Creating a new kind of Q is a noble idea, but it will take more than impregnating someone and walking away. If you want your offspring to embrace your ideals, you're going to have to teach them yourself.
Q: Yes, but that's exactly why I want you here, to nourish and guide the little tyke. Think of the opportunities here in the Continuum. The entire universe would be our child's playground. Together the two of you could explore dimensions you've never even imagined. Fess up. Isn't it even slightly tempting?
JANEWAY: I'd be lying if I said no. What explorer wouldn't be intrigued by the idea of seeking out whole new dimensions. But I have other responsibilities, and I won't just abandon them.
Q: Ah, yes. The crew of the intrepid starship Voyager. Perhaps you'd be interested in sending them home.
JANEWAY: You've tempted me with that prospect before. But frankly, your credibility is more than a little suspect. My crew and I will get home. We're committed to that. But we're going to do it through hard work and determination. We are not looking for a quick fix.
Q: Even if I wanted to mate, I wouldn't know how. It's totally unprecedented.
JANEWAY: You'll figure something out. You are omnipotent, after all.
Q: I need time to think about it.
JANEWAY: Time's up, Q. You've got to stop this war before it destroys the Continuum. Now I'm taking this white flag, and I'm going over to the enemy camp, and I'm going to tell them you're ready to talk about terms for a ceasefire.
Q: Kathy, don't be a hero.
JANEWAY: I'm going, Q. So if I were you, I'd start working on a way to set that precedent. First Officer's log, supplemental. We've laid in a course for the point in space where the female Q says we can enter the Continuum and find the Captain.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (The female Q is in the Captain's chair.)
COLONEL Q: Fortunately, we won't be needing your assistance.
JANEWAY: I told you, he's willing to negotiate. Let him go.
Q: She's right. I've had a change of heart.
COLONEL Q: Grovel all you want, Q. I've been waiting for this moment for an eternity. Put them both in chains.
JANEWAY: Wait! What are you charging me with?
ANNOTATION: (Q and Janeway are lead out.)
JANEWAY: Why won't you listen to me? I told your Commander last night we can resolve the situation peacefully.
Q: If it's any consolation, there are those in the Continuum who will remember us as martyrs.
JANEWAY: I'd rather skip that particular honour.
ANNOTATION: (They are tied to stakes.)
Q: Still, you have to admit, there's something romantic about going to our deaths together.
COLONEL Q: Do you have any last words?
JANEWAY: I won't plead for my own life. From your perspective I know it seems insignificant. But what is not insignificant is the fact that the Q, as an omnipotent race, have an opportunity to be a positive force to set a higher standard for other beings in the galaxy. I implore you all, don't go through with this. Don't allow yourselves to continue using violence to resolve your differences.
COLONEL Q: Q, do you have anything to add?
Q: Today I sacrifice my existence for the principles of freedom and individuality that I have fought for so long. But this woman is innocent. What's more, she saved my life, and she tried to save us from each other. Kill me if you must, but let her go.
COLONEL Q: A very touching speech, Q. But as usual, your rhetoric fails to compensate for your irresponsibility.
ANNOTATION: (A drum roll, and the firing squad line up.)
COLONEL Q: Ready! Aim!
Q: I'm sorry.
JANEWAY: I know.
COLONEL Q: Fire!
ANNOTATION: (Gunfire. Q tenses.)
Q: I'm hit! I'm dying! Oh!
ANNOTATION: (Janeway looks down at herself, then sees the squad taking up defensive positions.)
JANEWAY: Q!
Q: What?
JANEWAY: They're not firing at us.
Q: They're not?
ANNOTATION: (There are familiar faces amongst the boys in blue.)
CHAKOTAY: Harry, get to the Captain!
KIM: Captain, are you all right?
JANEWAY: I'm fine.
Q: (to Female Q) Oh, darling, I knew you'd come for me. Aren't you going to untie me?
FEMALE Q: How do I know you wouldn't run off with the next bipedal female that catches your eye?
Q: Well, it just so happens I have a proposal which will reassure you of my devotion.
ANNOTATION: (Kim and Janeway move away. Sergeant Paris has made his way around the rear of the Confederates.)
PARIS: (to Colonel Q) Put down the gun.
ANNOTATION: (The female Q unties Q.)
Q: Think of it, Q. We'd be visionaries, innovators, the parents of peace.
FEMALE Q: Oh, that does have a ring to it.
PARIS: Captain, what should I do with him?
PARIS: Hold your fire!
KIM: Put down your weapons!
Q: So, darling, have you given any thought as to how we might accomplish this historic act of procreation?
FEMALE Q: I've thought of nothing else since you suggested it.
Q: Oh!
FEMALE Q: As a matter of fact, I
ANNOTATION: (Whisper, whisper.)
Q: Oh. Oh. Oh! I love it when you talk dirty.
JANEWAY: Why don't I give you two some privacy?
Q: Oh, Kathy, don't you like to watch?
ANNOTATION: (The two Qs touch right forefingers, which glow briefly.)
Q: Oh! I was good, wasn't I?
FEMALE Q: Very good.
JANEWAY: That was it?
Q: You had your chance. Don't go crying about it now.
ANNOTATION: (Snaps fingers.)
[now in "Bridge"]
JANEWAY: Lieutenant Paris, what's our position?
CHAKOTAY: Aye, Captain.
JANEWAY: I'll be in my ready room.
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: Yabba dabba doo.
ANNOTATION: (Q is dandling a toddler in uniform on his knee.)
JANEWAY: Q!
Q: He's got my cheekbones, don't you think?
JANEWAY: He's adorable. I'd say fatherhood agrees with you.
Q: Well, I'll admit, I look at the universe in an entirely different way now. I mean, I can't go around causing temporal anomalies or subspace inversions without considering the impact it'll have on my son.
JANEWAY: I'm glad to hear you intend to set a good example.
Q: By the way, did I tell you how smart he is? I've already taught him how to knock small planets out of orbit.
JANEWAY: And I thought you were going to teach him about love and conscience.
Q: Oh, that's why we want Auntie Kathy to be the godmother now, don't we?
JANEWAY: I'm honoured.
Q: Yeah, well, wait until we ask you to baby-sit. Can't leave the little guy alone for a nanosecond. Well, it's time to be going. The old ball and chain really hates it when we're late. (to Baby Q) Say bye bye. Bye bye.
JANEWAY: Janeway to Security. Don't bother. I trapped your crew in a temporal loop. They keep experiencing the last thirty seconds over and over. Almost as monotonous as drone boy's essay. Who are you?
ANNOTATION: (Daddy is sitting behind her desk.)
Q: I know he's grown since you last saw him, Kathy, but don't tell me you can't see the family resemblance. This is my son, Q. I'm a little hurt you didn't recognise Junior. You are his godmother, after all.
JANEWAY: The last time I saw him, he was an infant.
JUNIOR: Four years ago, in human time. You called me adorable.
JANEWAY: You remember?
JUNIOR: I may have looked like an infant, but I was still a Q. Maybe you should have picked a better godparent.
Q: I wonder if it's too late to ask Jean-Luc?
JANEWAY: What do you want, Q?
Q: Well, Junior's taking a little vacation from the Continuum. I recommended he spent it with you.
JANEWAY: Why?
Q: Oh, he's always been fascinated by the old man's stories about humanity. I thought it was time he had some first hand experience.
JANEWAY: I am flattered that you would entrust me with your first born, but I really don't have time.
Q: He's as quiet as a Zizznian church mouse. You'll forget he's even here.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears.)
JANEWAY: Well, if you're going to stay, we'll need to lay down a few ground rules.
ANNOTATION: (Borg beam in. Tuvok shoots one. Another is about to assimilate Janeway when - flash! The Borg are gone and Q is there, looking furious.)
JUNIOR: We were just getting to the good part!
Q: If the Continuum's told you once, they've told you a thousand times. Don't provoke the Borg! Now, I want you to give Aunt Kathy your word you won't do it again.
JANEWAY: Oh, he won't do it again because he's leaving. Now.
Q: Excuse us, son. The grown-ups need a moment in private.
ANNOTATION: (Q and Janeway vanish.)
[now in "Ready room"]
Q: He isn't so bad once you get to know him. He's just misunderstood.
JANEWAY: He tried to kill my crew.
Q: No one was hurt, I repaired the damage to your ship. I even gave your pet Talaxian his vocal cords back. Everything's exactly as it was.
JANEWAY: And how long do you think it will take your son to come up with another way to amuse himself? If you knew he was dangerous, why did you send him here? Ah, is this another lesson for humanity?
Q: It's supposed to be a lesson for him. Think back to my last visit. I made you the offer of a lifetime.
JANEWAY: Asking me to mate with you was hardly the offer of a lifetime.
Q: If you hadn't turned me down, I wouldn't have been forced to mate with that other Q.
JANEWAY: Oh, get to the point.
Q: My point is, Junior was suppose to inspire peace and compassion. But instead of order, he's brought chaos. He's been starting wars among innocent species, tampering with primordial gene pools, punching holes in the fabric of space time.
JANEWAY: Where's his mother been during all this?
Q: She's been so humiliated by his antics she's disowned him. She's blamed me for everything. I've managed to undo most of the damage, but that wasn't good enough for the Continuum. They're hounding me to straighten the boy out. That's why I brought him here. In hopes that your vaunted Starfleet ideals would rub off on him. Obviously, that hasn't happened.
JANEWAY: You can't just dump your child on someone and hope he learns something.
Q: I can't?
JANEWAY: He needs to be parented.
Q: And how exactly am I supposed to do that? Q is the first child born in the Continuum, which makes me the first parent. I don't even know where to begin.
JANEWAY: You could start by spending time with him.
Q: Urgh.
JANEWAY: Parenthood is more than just cleaning up your child's messes. You need to set an example. It's the only way he'll learn.
Q: Of course. Once he begins to know me better, he'll idolise me. Then he'll do anything I say. Kathy
ANNOTATION: (He kisses her.)
Q: You're a genius.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears.)
[now in "Bridge"]
PARIS: I've made a full sensor sweep. There's no sign of any more Borg vessels.
JANEWAY: I am going to my quarters. You have the bridge.
[now in "Janeway's bathroom"]
ANNOTATION: (Janeway is relaxing in a mountain of bubbles when Q appears fully dressed at the tap end.)
Q: I take it back. You're not a genius. I should have known better than to take the advice of a human.
JANEWAY: Q!
Q: Your brilliant plan didn't work. I smothered the boy with attention, spent every waking moment with him. But things only got worse.
JANEWAY: You've been gone for less than ten minutes.
Q: On your temporal plane, maybe. But in Q time we've spent years together. Now he's embarrassed to be seen with me, and it's all your fault.
JANEWAY: My fault?
Q: Tell me how you plan to rectify the situation.
JANEWAY: What happened after you left Voyager?
Q: Q got away from me and rearranged to tectonic plates on Bozel Prime.
JANEWAY: Did you punish him?
Q: Well, I tried to get him to apologise to all sixteen billion Bozelians, but he got angry and stopped talking to me.
JANEWAY: So you gave in to him.
Q: I told him he could shift as many continents as he liked as long as no one got hurt.
JANEWAY: You're not going to do your son any favours by indulging him. You need to make him understand that there are consequences to his actions.
Q: Consequences? Hmm. Kathy, I take it back. You are a genius.
ANNOTATION: (He leans forward for a kiss, and gets offered the sole of her foot. It gets a kiss.)
[now in "Sickbay"]
ANNOTATION: (Q is holding up an agar dish.)
Q: I think that's long enough.
ANNOTATION: (He snaps his fingers and Junior appears.)
JUNIOR: What was that for!
Q: What's wrong? You didn't enjoy life as an Oprelian amoeba?
JUNIOR: No. I was shapeless and slimy. The only thing to eat was paramecia.
Q: Sounds unpleasant. I'm sure you'll do whatever you can to avoid returning to that Petrie dish.
JUNIOR: What are you talking about?
Q: The Continuum and I have come to an agreement about your future. Either you become an upstanding citizen of the cosmos, or you'll be sentenced to eternity as a amoeba. How's that for consequences?
JUNIOR: You'd turn your own son into a microscopic lifeform?
Q: You have one week to change your ways. I suggest you make the most of it.
JUNIOR: Fine, I'll see you in seven days.
ANNOTATION: (Junior snaps his fingers, but nothing happens. He keeps trying.)
Q: We've temporarily relieved you of your powers, to ensure that you're on your best behaviour with the captain.
JUNIOR: You're leaving me here?
JANEWAY: I though we agreed that you were going to take a more active role.
Q: I'd like to, Kathy. But we both know that you're a million times the parent I am.
JANEWAY: I'm not a parent.
Q: Maybe not in the biological sense, but you're certainly a mommy to this crew. Just look how quickly you house-broke that Borg drone.
JANEWAY: It's taken years for Seven to become an individual. You're asking me to change your son in one week?
Q: I'm sure you'll think of something.
JUNIOR: What if she doesn't?
Q: Then it's single-cellular city for you, my boy.
ANNOTATION: (Q throws him the dish and disappears.)
JUNIOR: I'm getting off this ship.
ICHEB: Hear what?
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (The turbolift door opens.)
Q: Going up?
JANEWAY: I'll catch the next one.
ANNOTATION: (Janeway closes the door on him and walks on.)
Q: Oh, you can't get away from me that easily.
JANEWAY: It's only been five days. Why are you back?
Q: Oh, I thought I'd just pop in and check on Junior. I'm not an entirely uninvolved father, you know.
JANEWAY: Well, he got off to a pretty shaky start, but he's made some progress since then.
Q: Really?
JANEWAY: He's been working extremely hard.
Q: We're talking about the same Q?
JANEWAY: If you don't believe me, maybe you should see for yourself.
[now in "Ready room"]
ANNOTATION: (Junior is reading his essay.)
JUNIOR: The Continuum has been perceived in a variety of ways. A dreary desert road, a blood-soaked battle ground. But with the help of Voyager's crew I've begun to perceive it in another context. A home. I look forward to the day when I return there and make that perception a reality.
JANEWAY: Well? What did you think?
Q: Oh, it's very nice.
JANEWAY: Nice?
Q: Yes. I especially liked the part about the Continuum.
JANEWAY: The entire essay was about the Continuum.
Q: Yes, and it's very nice.
JUNIOR: I'm late for my temporal mechanics lesson.
ANNOTATION: (Junior slams the PADD down on the desk and leaves.)
JANEWAY: Q.
Q: Well, if there's nothing else, I'll be on my way.
JANEWAY: He worked so hard on that paper, the least you could have done was tell him you were proud of him.
Q: But I'm not.
JANEWAY: Oh.
Q: And frankly, it's a little hard to be impressed with any of the boy's accomplishments. He's been here for five days and what have you taught him? How to scribble essays and play with holograms? What's next, basket weaving?
JANEWAY: Whether you're willing to admit it or not, your son has made progress here. He has the potential to be a better Q than you will ever be.
Q: Potential isn't going to be enough for the Continuum.
JANEWAY: Then what will be enough?
Q: The boy needs to demonstrate nothing less than exemplary Q-ness.
JANEWAY: And what exactly is Q-ness?
Q: Oh, it's impossible for your miniscule mind to comprehend. But I know Q-ness when I see it. And this
ANNOTATION: (Q picks up the PADD.)
Q: Is not it.
[now in "Junior's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Doorbell.)
JUNIOR: Come in.
Q2: Yell at me later. We need to get Icheb to Sickbay.
[now in "Sickbay"]
DOCTOR: His cells are being necrotised by some form of omicron radiation. But I can't treat his injuries without knowing more about the weapon that caused them.
Q: Is this a bad time?
JANEWAY: Tell him.
JUNIOR: Icheb stole a shuttle from Voyager. I tried to stop him but he kidnapped me. And he started a fight with another ship.
JANEWAY: He stole the shuttle and he attacked the other vessel.
Q: Is that true, son?
JUNIOR: Please, Q, just save him.
Q: Don't be absurd.
JUNIOR: You're not going to help him?
Q: Like Aunt Kathy said, you're never going to learn anything if you don't face the consequences of your actions. If your little playmate has to die to teach you a lesson, so be it.
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears.)
JUNIOR: I know you can hear me, Q. Come back! Q!
ALIEN: Well done, Junior. I'm proud of you.
ANNOTATION: (The alien snaps his fingers and flash! It's Q on the screen)
Q: Surprise!
ANNOTATION: (Another flash and he's on the Flyer, laughing.)
Q: I wish you could see the look on your faces. Oh, wait. You can.
ANNOTATION: (He gives them mirrors.)
JUNIOR: We don't have time for your games. We need to find the real people I attacked.
Q: You just did. I was the Chokuzan you fired on.
JANEWAY: What kind of horrible joke
Q: Not a joke, a test. I knew the pathetic little exercises you had him performing would not impress the Continuum. So, when he escaped your clutches I devised a real test. It was touch and go there for a moment, but you passed with flying colours.
JANEWAY: What about Icheb?
Q: Your Doctor will discover he's made a miraculous recovery. Now then, if we're all finished here it's Judgment Day for Junior.
[now in "Mess hall"]
ANNOTATION: (The tables and chairs have vanished. Junior, Q and Janeway appear in front of three Q judges.)
Q: We're ready, your Honour.
JUDGE: In the case of the Continuum versus Q, we the Continuum find that Q has not made sufficient progress to warrant the reinstatement of his powers.
Q: Objection. What about my test?
JUDGE: What about it?
Q: Q was willing to sacrifice himself to save his friend. Surely that counts for something?
JUDGE: It was Q who endangered the boy's life in the first place. However, in deference to the aforementioned act of contrition, the defendant will not be transformed into an Oprelian amoeba. Instead, he will suffer the next worst fate. Remaining human. Court is adjourned.
ANNOTATION: (The tribunal disappears)
Q: This is an outrage! They can't do this to me!
ANNOTATION: (Q disappears.)
[now in "Ready room"]
ANNOTATION: (Doorbell.)
JANEWAY: What about your father?
JUNIOR: You don't honestly believe we'll see him again, do you? He obviously doesn't want me around. Why else would he have left me here? Twice.
Q: The question you should be asking is why I keep coming back. Now, I'm sorry I left so abruptly, but the Continuum's verdict demanded an immediate appeal. I told them I refused to belong to any Continuum that wouldn't accept my son as a member. We're a package deal.
JUNIOR: You left the Continuum for me?
Q: Oh, don't be ridiculous. I'm the only one holding that place together. And when they realised they might lose me, they crumbled like a Gelbian sand sculpture.
JUNIOR: They're going to return my powers?
Q: They already have.
ANNOTATION: (Junior conjures up a large bouquet of roses.)
JUNIOR: For you, Captain. For all your help.
JANEWAY: Thank you.
ANNOTATION: (Then she notices the room is full of roses.)
Q: Now that you're a Q again, I thought we might spend some quality time together. I want to show you the cosmos the way it was meant to be seen.
JUNIOR: We've tried that already.
Q: Things'll be different this time. I promise. Now run along. I'll meet you on Golos Prime (wink) after I've had a few moments alone with the captain.
JUNIOR: I'll see you soon, Aunt Kathy.
JANEWAY: I certainly hope so.
ANNOTATION: (Junior disappears.)
JANEWAY: So, the Continuum crumbled like a Gelbian sand sculpture?
Q: Yes. Some of them even got on their knees and begged me to stay. It was pathetic. If you must know, I had to agree to a few minor conditions.
JANEWAY: Oh? Such as?
Q: Eternal custody of the boy. Wherever the little brat goes, I go with him.
JANEWAY: I hope he won't spoil too much of your fun.
Q: Oh, before I leave.
ANNOTATION: (Q gives her a PADD.)
Q: I did a little homework for you. Consider it a thank you for everything you did for Junior.
JANEWAY: Not that I don't appreciate it, but this will only take a few years off our journey. Why not send us all the way?
Q: What sort of an example would I be setting for my son if I did all the work for you?
ANNOTATION: (Eight red dots shoot out from the stern)
PICARD: Begin countdown. Mark.
DATA: Starship separation in six, five, four, three, two, one.
ANNOTATION: (Gracefully, the huge saucer lifts away from the body of the ship)
DATA: Separation is successful, sir.
ANNOTATION: (The main body does a hand-brake turn and heads back to their pursuer. The torpedoes detonate.)
YAR: Torpedoes have detonated, sir.
PICARD: Let's come to a stop. Reverse power.
DATA: Reverse power. Decelerating.
PICARD: Dead stop. We'll hold this position and wait for them.
TROI: That will bring them here in just minutes, sir.
Q: Captain, you may find you are not nearly clever enough to deal with what lies ahead for you. It may have been better to accept sentence here.
[now in "Battle Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien is unaware the four were ever away)
DATA: What is present course, conn?
OBRIEN: It's what it's been all along, sir. Direct heading to Farpoint Station.
DATA: Confirm. We are on that heading, sir.
OBRIEN: Know anything about Farpoint Station, sir? Sounds like a fairly dull place.
PICARD: We've heard that we may find it rather interesting. Personal log, Commander William Riker. Stardate 41153.7. The USS Hood has dropped me off at Farpoint Station, where I await the arrival of the new USS Enterprise to which I have been assigned as First Officer. Meanwhile I have been asked to visit the Farpoint Administrator's Office, in the old city.
RIKER: Or did we step from one Bridge onto another Bridge?
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (Everything suddenly comes back on)
DATA: We've regained ship's communication, sir.
HASKELL: (a red shirt who has suddenly replaced Wesley) Captain, I have a star fix.
PICARD: On screen.
HASKELL: It's an opening, sir.
DATA: Confirm, sir. Navigation is possible.
HASKELL: Should I set a course?
PICARD: Transporter room, do you have a fix on the away team?
HASKELL: Captain, the star fix is fading.
PICARD: DATA, lock on to the Yamato with a tractor beam. We leave together.
DATA: I cannot make the lock, sir.
HASKELL: Captain, the star fix is almost gone.
PICARD: Let it go.
PICARD: Lieutenant Commander Data.
SCHOLAR: It is a pleasure to meet such a unique individual.
DATA: Thank you.
PICARD: Lieutenant La Forge.
LAFORGE: It is my pleasure to meet you, sir.
PULASKI: Medical research is sometimes a risky business. It's all part of being human. Shall we proceed?
DATA: Ready to transport.
[now in "Transporter room"]
DATA: You have the coordinates, Chief O'Brien.
OBRIEN: Shuttlecraft, maintain your position and stand by.
DATA: Standing by.
[now in "Science lab"]
OBRIEN: Transporter control, what's our status?
[now in "Transporter room"]
CREWMAN: We have a green panel, sir.
PICARD: Quickly, please.
OBRIEN: Shuttle One, hold your position.
[now in "Shuttlecraft"]
DATA: Holding.
ANNOTATION: (Pulaski gives herself a painkilling hypo)
OBRIEN: Stand by to transport.
PICARD: Tell us what you need, Doctor.
PULASKI: There's nothing you can do, Captain. I'm not going to make myself an exception to the Darwin quarantine. Shuttle One out.
DATA: What is your condition, Doctor?
PULASKI: Not exactly up to factory specs. I'm sorry. The pain is tolerable, thank you.
DATA: Shall I set course for Darwin Station?
PULASKI: We're already under quarantined. What do we have to lose?
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: We can no longer consider the Darwin Station crisis our most immediate concern, although Doctor Pulaski's condition is inseparably linked with that emergency. Her safe return and that of Commander Data must take priority, please.
OBRIEN: You may step down, sir.
PICARD: Data, tell me if. It's good to see you again.
DATA: Thank you, sir.
PICARD: Now, quickly. If the changes in Doctor Pulaski's DNA were reversed, would it be possible
DATA: It is not reversible, sir. The subtle molecular transposition of
PICARD: Yes, yes, yes. But say if it were undone, would she be normal again?
DATA: As normal as ever, sir.
PICARD: You said that the transporter could be modified to filter out the changes in Doctor Pulaski?
OBRIEN: Yes, sir, but we were unable to locate her trace pattern.
PICARD: Well, what if we used a sample of her DNA, say from a blood test taken before she was exposed to the disease? Could that be used to filter out the genetic changes?
OBRIEN: Well, I'd have to get into the biofilter bus to patch in a molecular matrix reader. That's no problem. But the waveform modulator will be overloaded without the regeneration limiter in the first stage circuit.
DATA: Interesting. However, theoretically,
PICARD: Data.
DATA: Yes, sir.
PICARD: Can you do the modifications?
OBRIEN: I think so, sir.
OBRIEN: Captain, wait.
ANNOTATION: (He taps his board and she becomes younger, and solid. Picard and Pulaski embrace.)
DATA: Doctor.
LAFORGE: Good to see you, Doctor.
PICARD: Welcome back, Doctor. Come.
OBRIEN: Acknowledged, Captain.
PICARD: Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
DATA: Aye, sir.
[now in "Transporter room"]
OBRIEN: Good luck, Commander.
RIKER: Thanks, O'Brien.
ANNOTATION: (Pulaski, La Forge, Data (wearing a dealer's shade) O'Brien and Riker are sitting down for an evening's entertainment)
OBRIEN: Hold it, that's my chair. My luck is always lousy unless I start on the dealer's right.
DATA: That would seem to be superstition.
OBRIEN: Bitter experience has taught me it's a fundamental truth.
RIKER: Okay, the game is five card stud, nothing wild. Ante up.
DATA: This game is exceedingly simple. With only fifty two cards, twenty one of which I will see, and four other players, there are a limited number of winning combinations.
LAFORGE: There's more to this than just the cards, Data.
DATA: Of course. The bets will indicate of the relative strength of each hand.
OBRIEN: Time to pluck a pigeon.
ANNOTATION: (Kate starts the betting)
PULASKI: Five.
LAFORGE: I'm in.
DATA: I too.
RIKER: Call.
ANNOTATION: (The first lot of face up cards are dealt)
RIKER: A seven, and a six, and the ace.
DATA: I bet ten.
OBRIEN: See that.
RIKER: Call.
LAFORGE: Yeah, me too. I'm out.
ANNOTATION: (Another deal. Riker is showing the ten, Jack and five of hearts. Data has two Queens and an Ace)
DATA: I bet five.
OBRIEN: Same.
RIKER: Your five. And five.
RIKER: No help.
ANNOTATION: (He gives himself the four of hearts. Ooo's all round)
DATA: I bet ten.
RIKER: Your ten and ten.
ANNOTATION: (We discover that Data has a third Queen. He looks at Riker)
DATA: Is that what is known as a poker face?
RIKER: Are you playing or not?
DATA: I fold.
ANNOTATION: (Riker's hole card was the two of spades. Busted)
DATA: You had nothing!
LAFORGE: He bluffed you, Data.
DATA: It makes very little sense to bet when you cannot win.
RIKER: But I did win. I was betting that you wouldn't call.
DATA: How could you tell?
PULASKI: Instinct, Data, instinct. The game is seven card high/low with a buy on the last card. And just to make it more interesting, the man with the axe takes all.
[now in "Starbase 173"]
ANNOTATION: (Enterprise is docked at a space station. You can see her from the window) (Picard is relaxing in the coffee lounge when he sees a woman at the top of the stairs)
PICARD: Not, I think, today, Commander.
[now in "Transporter room"]
PICARD: Bridge, Picard.
DATA: Yes, Captain.
PICARD: Take us out of here. The Romulan ship is set to auto-destruct and they can't deactivate it.
RIKER: Wait, sir. Open hailing frequencies.
OBRIEN: Find anything yet?
LAFORGE: Not yet.
DATA: There is nothing to find.
OBRIEN: No harm in checking, I guess.
LAFORGE: Really? How would you like them to give the transporter operation a little once-over?
OBRIEN: No problem. We're totally ship-shape.
LAFORGE: You're missing the point. It's just the idea that they even suspect a malfunction.
DATA: If I were not a consummate professional, and an android, I would find this entire procedure insulting.
LAFORGE: Thanks, Data.
ANNOTATION: (Another part of Engineering, where Wesley is talking to Guy)
KYLE: And I'm no spring chicken, I know. Don't worry. He's never been able to beat me.
[now in "Holodeck"]
ANNOTATION: (A forbidding setting, lit with red light. There is a channel between two raised platforms)
DATA: Computer, is this it?
COMPUTER: Correct. Klingon Rite of Ascension Chamber.
LAFORGE: Is this really necessary?
WESLEY: If we want to get Worf through his problem, it is.
DATA: Computer, please give us Klingon personnel appropriate to this event.
ANNOTATION: (Four warriors stand on each side of the channel, with metre-long painstiks)
DATA: These images are specifically programmed for Ascension rites.
LAFORGE: Cute bunch.
WESLEY: And they use those?
OBRIEN: Right, sir. I'll just standing over here, dozing off.
RIKER: Data, you've got ten minutes. That's it. If you meet anybody but Sarjenka
DATA: I will signal for immediate beam out.
ANNOTATION: (Data is beamed down)
PICARD: Commander Riker to the Bridge.
SARJENKA: Where are we going? (Data points upwards) To the stars?
[now in "Transporter room"]
OBRIEN: There's going to be hell to pay.
DATA: Where is Commander Riker?
OBRIEN: On the Bridge. Where are you going?
DATA: To the Bridge.
OBRIEN: And you're going to take that?
SARJENKA: Don't leave me here. Please don't leave me.
DATA: Quite impossible.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard is pacing back and forth)
WORF: Sir, three minutes to resonator launch.
DATA: Commander, away team reporting in. Lieutenant Worf standing by.
RIKER: This is Riker. Go ahead, Lieutenant.
WORF: The archeologists have identified the markings in these caverns. This planet was apparently once home to a race known as the Koinonians.
PICARD: What do we know about them, Data?
DATA: The Koinonians were an intelligent culture which became embroiled in a war that lasted for several generations. Our best evidence indicates they destroyed themselves.
WORF: We have completed our survey of the third tunnel and will proceed into the ceremonial chamber.
RIKER: Affirmative. Enterprise out.
PICARD: Destroyed themselves, Data?
DATA: According to historical records. This will be the first opportunity for a Federation team
TROI: Captain! Beam them up quickly!
WORF: Captain. Emergency beam up! Enterprise, emergency! Severe injuries.
OBRIEN: Locked on to the main bridge, Captain.
RIKER: You're certain about the atmospheric conditions, Data ?
DATA: There is adequate oxygen for life support, Commander.
PICARD: It is exactly as they left it, Number One. In the bottle. The ship in the bottle. Good Lord, didn't anybody here build ships in bottles when they were boys?
WORF: I did not play with toys.
DATA: I was never a boy.
OBRIEN: I did, sir.
PICARD: Thank you, Mister O'Brien. Proceed.
BOCHRA: Will that be difficult?
LAFORGE: No, not with your help.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Scanners are showing a window, Captain.
PICARD: Expected duration?
DATA: Nine minutes, forty seconds, sir.
WESLEY: No change in the neutrino beacon signal, sir.
WORF: Romulan ship approaching. Bearing three fifty four mark two eight seven.
RIKER: We can't transport him with the shields up.
WORF: If we lower our shields, the Romulan will strike.
DATA: The electromagnetic window on the planet is closing, sir. Three minutes remain.
PICARD: Transporter room, lock onto the neutrino beam and stand by.
OBRIEN: Standing by, Captain.
DATA: The window is allowing intermittent sensor readings. There are still numerous ghost images, but I believe we are picking up two life forms near the beacon.
RIKER: Another Romulan?
DATA: I cannot say. The electromagnetic interference prevents an accurate reading.
PICARD: But it's a likely hypothesis, Number One. If Commander La Forge has located a second survivor. Lieutenant, hail the Romulan vessel.
WORF: Aye, sir. They're ignoring our hail, sir.
DATA: I am afraid the prisoner has eluded us, sir.
[now in "Angosian Senate"]
PICARD: Eluded the Enterprise?
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: We followed procedures precisely, Captain. Scanners indicated no life forms present in the drive section. I cannot explain how he escaped.
WORF: Incoming message from the Angosian Prime Minister.
PICARD: On screen.
WORF: Sir, the Angosians have no cloaking technology.
RIKER: Unless he's borrowing one. If he's hanging over the planet's pole, the magnetic field would confuse our sensors.
DATA: Commander, I believe I can recalibrate our sensors to read through the electromagnetic interference over the poles.
RIKER: Let's try it. Mister Crusher, realign for polar orbit.
WESLEY: Aye, sir.
DATA: There he is, Commander. You were correct.
RIKER: This guy knows all the tricks, doesn't he.
DATA: There are still no life form readings coming from the vessel.
LAFORGE: Could it be the magnetic interference, Data?
DATA: I have compensated. Still no readings.
PICARD: We'll have an answer shortly. Lock on tractor beam, Mister La Forge.
LAFORGE: Tractor beam locking on, sir.
DATA: He is coming about, sir.
RIKER: He's out of his mind!
WORF: Sensors detect a massive power build up in his aft thrusters.
PICARD: On main viewer.
LAFORGE: He's making a suicide run.
DATA: Shields have been automatically activated. Tractor beam disengaged.
WESLEY: He bounced off the shields.
RIKER: That's an interesting twist.
PICARD: Mister Crusher, fix coordinates onto that vessel. We'll just beam the whole thing to a shuttlebay if we have to.
DATA: I do not believe that will be necessary, Captain. He is no longer in the drive section.
PICARD: What?
DATA: I anticipated that diversionary tactic based on his pattern to date. We are picking up a cylindrical object approximately seven metres in length and three metres in diameter.
WORF: On screen.
PICARD: Magnify.
WESLEY: An escape pod.
LAFORGE: This guy's incredible.
DATA: Yet there are still no life form readings.
PICARD: Transporter room four, prepare to beam aboard from inside that shuttle anything large enough to be a humanoid adult.
OBRIEN: Aye, sir.
PICARD: I shall want an answer to that. I'm sure the Tanugans will too.
OBRIEN: Yes, sir.
DATA: Captain, the radiation and debris are consistent with an overload of the station's reactor core.
PICARD: Were there any indications of reactor core problems while you were on the station?
LAFORGE: No, sir.
OBRIEN: I'm deactivating it.
RIKER: Welcome back, Mister Data. Are you all right?
DATA: Yes, Commander. Please arrange to take Kivas Fajo into custody on charges of murder, kidnapping, theft.
RIKER: The arrangements have already been made.
DATA: A Varon-T disruptor. It belongs to Fajo.
RIKER: Mister O'Brien says the weapon was in a state of discharge.
DATA: Perhaps something occurred during transport, Commander.
[now in "Brig"]
FAJO: Oh, have you come to see me to repent? Is this your final satisfaction? Want to see me beg for mercy? You're not going to get any of that from me.
DATA: I expected nothing.
OBRIEN: The Borg have adapted their electromagnetic field to prevent main transporter functions, sir.
RIKER: As expected. Mister Data, Mister Worf, proceed as we discussed.
DATA: Aye, Captain.
ANNOTATION: (They switch on devices on their arms)
[now in "Battle bridge"]
CREWMAN: Channel open, sir.
RIKER: Riker to Data.
[now in "Data's lab"]
RIKER: What's your status?
DATA: The initial cybernetic connection into Captain Picard's neural net pathways has been established. Mister O'Brien is ready to process the Borg signal through the transport pattern buffer.
RIKER: Make it so. With dispatch, Mister Data.
DATA: Proceeding immediately, sir. Data out.
ANNOTATION: (Data has part of his hair removed to show various ports and flashing lights in his head. Picard is on the same platform Lal used. He is naked except for some tubes and implants)
DATA: The neural link will be established in three stages. Doctor, I suggest you closely observe Captain Picard's lifesigns, while at each stage Chief O'Brien monitors my positronic matrix activity. Counsellor, hopefully, you will be able to determine whether I am reaching Captain Picard.
OBRIEN: At what point should I shut it down if there's a problem?
DATA: I do not know. I have never done this before. Initiating first neural link.
CRUSHER: The Captain's vital signs are stable.
OBRIEN: Positronic activity unchanged.
DATA: First neural connection is confirmed. I cannot report any significant access to the Borg consciousness.
ANNOTATION: (And Troi shakes her head)
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (The cube is met by three ships, which are immediately destroyed)
RIKER: Slow to impulse. Time to intercept?
WESLEY: Twenty-three minutes, fourteen seconds, sir.
[now in "Data's lab"]
DATA: Second neural connection is confirmed. I still cannot report any significant access. Proceeding with the final link.
CRUSHER: Significant increase in premotor area and hypothalamus activity. His heartbeat is accelerating rapidly.
OBRIEN: Sir, your submicron matrix activity is increasing exponentially.
DATA: Neural connections complete. I have access to the Borg subspace signals. Processing. Processing.
TROI: Data!
DATA: Stand by. Processing. Processing. Fascinating. The Borg group consciousness is divided into subcommands necessary to carry out all functions. Defence, communication, navigation. They are all controlled by a root command implanted into each
ANNOTATION: (Picard wakes up and tries to get out. Data restrains the mechanical arm, then pulls off the working 'hand' component.)
CRUSHER: Data, I'm picking up increased neural activity in Captain Picard, localised in the prefrontal and parietal lobes.
OBRIEN: The Borg might be trying to terminate their link with him.
DATA: Negative. The subspace signal configuration is unchanged. What is causing the increased neural activity is unclear.
TROI: No, it's not. It's him. It's Picard.
ANNOTATION: (Picard reaches out with his organic arm and takes hold of Data, gently)
WORF: No, no, that's too close.
[now in "Transporter room"]
RIKER: This has gone far enough, Data.
DATA: Computer, three metre cross seal.
ANNOTATION: ((Riker O'Brien and a guard are trapped behind a forcefield. Riker pulls his phaser)
OBRIEN: I wouldn't advise that, sir. The phase coils don't take well to ricochets.
PICARD: Nine point six.
[now in "Transporter room"]
OBRIEN: Aye, Captain.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: We are now entering the Turkana system, sir.
PICARD: Slow to impulse.
DATA: Visual contact.
RIKER: Get them out of there, O'Brien.
ANNOTATION: (There's a bright flash on the viewscreen)
RIKER: Status, O'Brien?
OBRIEN: There's nothing to lock onto, Commander.
DATA: I am reading an ion trail characteristic of a freighter escape pod.
WORF: Unable to establish contact.
PICARD: It could have been damaged by the explosion. They may have been able to maintain orbit.
RIKER: Let's hope they stay clear of the colony.
DATA: That is exactly where the ion trail is leading, Commander.
PICARD: Hail the colony.
WORF: I've been trying to, Captain. No response.
RIKER: They haven't been able to maintain reliable communications since their government fell apart.
DATA: The last Federation vessel to make contact was the Potemkin, six years ago. They were warned that anyone transporting down to the colony would be killed.
PICARD: Number One, ready an away team.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. We are in orbit above Turkana Four, an Earth colony that severed relations with the Federation nearly fifteen years ago. I am concerned about sending an away team, but if we are to discover the fate of the two missing Federation crewmen, I see no alternative.
[now in "Transporter room"]
DATA: The surface settlement appears to be all but destroyed. Sensors show that the colonists now live in structures that extend nearly three kilometres beneath the city.
RIKER: Have you located the escape pod's landing point, Chief?
OBRIEN: Yes, sir. Three hundred metres beyond the colony perimeter.
DATA: What do you wish to talk about?
[now in "Transporter room"]
ISHARA: I did what I had to do. I'm sorry if I hurt you in the process.
DATA: I am an android. It is not possible for me to be injured in that fashion.
OBRIEN: Whenever you're ready.
ISHARA: You know, Data, I wasn't always lying to you. That time we spent talking, that was the closest thing to friendship I've ever had. If that means anything to you.
DATA: Energise.
[now in "Riker's quarters"]
RIKER: Come in.
ANNOTATION: (Data enters)
KEIKO: Yes. He'll probably be just as relieved as I am. Data, you introduced us to each other. You mean a lot to both of us. I would really appreciate it if you would tell Miles for me.
DATA: If you wish.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
DATA: My friend Chief O'Brien often says that above all else, he wants to make Keiko happy. Since cancelling the wedding will make her happy, I must conclude the Chief will be pleased at her decision. I have good news.
OBRIEN: Oh?
DATA: Keiko has made a decision designed to increase her happiness. She has cancelled the wedding.
OBRIEN: She what? Cancelled the wedding? Today? Without even a word? Of all the childish, selfish, irresponsible things to do!
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien storms out)
LAFORGE: Next time, maybe I should break the good news.
DATA: Commander Maddox, it would appear that my programme designed to predict the emotional responses needs adjustment. Second Officers personal log, supplemental. This is the one thousand five hundred fiftieth day since the Enterprise was commissioned. Besides the arrival of Ambassador T'Pel, other events occurring today include four birthdays, two personnel transfers, a celebration of the Hindu Festival of Lights, two chess tournaments, one secondary school play, and four promotions. Overall, an ordinary day.
[now in "Transporter room"]
TECHNICIAN: The Zhukov is ready for transport, sir.
DATA: Energise. Welcome aboard the Enterprise, Ambassador.
ANNOTATION: (one look cuts him off)
PICARD: Thank you, Mister Data.
[now in "Data's quarters"]
DATA: Feline supplement seventy four.
ANNOTATION: (he puts the bowl down and a hairy ginger cat eats it)
DATA: Computer, run fluidic sensor diagnostic.
ANNOTATION: (the cat jumps on his lap, and he strokes it)
COMPUTER: Diagnostic complete. All systems functioning within normal parameters.
DATA: Come in.
OBRIEN: Am I intruding, Commander?
DATA: No. Would you care to sit down? When one of my friends is distraught, I have learnt that the thoughtful thing to do is to attempt to make him feel more comfortable.
ANNOTATION: (But O'Brien can't settle)
DATA: May I offer you some refreshment, Chief?
OBRIEN: No, thank you, sir. First of all I'd like to apologise for this morning in Ten Forward
DATA: There is no need to apologise. I was not offended. Would you like a pillow or a more comfortable chair to sit upon?
OBRIEN: No, sir. Thank you, sir.
DATA: Perhaps you would like some music? Brahms? Aurelia?
OBRIEN: No, really, sir I'm fine. I came to ask for your help. It's about Keiko. I'd like you to talk to her. Convince her to go through with the wedding.
DATA: Would Counsellor Troi not be a more appropriate choice to speak with Keiko?
OBRIEN: She already has. It didn't help. You've known her longer than I have. I just thought she might listen to you. She won't even talk to me
DATA: I do not know what to say to her.
OBRIEN: Just talk with her. Make her see reason. She's going off half-cocked, not thinking this through. You've worked with her for a long time. She respects your opinion.
DATA: Perhaps she has not fully analysed her decision. I will try.
OBRIEN: Thank you, sir. I won't forget this.
DATA: Commander Maddox, I noted that Keiko was quite calm and rational when she informed me of her decision this morning. Therefore, I can predict that she will respond to an objective analysis of the situation based on the available facts. It is fortunate that she has not let emotional considerations cloud her judgement. It should make my task much simpler.
[now in "Arboretum"]
KEIKO: What?
DATA: I believe you made an incorrect analysis of the facts at hand.
DATA: I will. Thank you, Doctor. Computer, create dance partner. Female. Begin music.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: And just as the headsman swings his axe, the blade is about to fall (cannot hear above Data's thoughts)
DATA: Commander Riker's easy going manner and sense of humour is fascinating to me. I believe it to be one reason he is so popular among the crew. It may also be partly responsible for his success in matters of love. There may be a correlation between humour and sex. The need for more research is clearly indicated. Commander.
RIKER: Picard to the Bridge. All stop.
HELM: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Picard and T'Pel enter)
DATA: Sir, we have reached the designated coordinates.
PICARD: Hold this position. Long range scan.
DATA: Captain, I am detecting a ship in the Neutral Zone. Configuration, Romulan warbird.
PICARD: Yellow alert. Hail the Warbird, Mister Worf.
WORF: Aye, sir. They are responding. Text only. We are to proceed to the agreed coordinates.
OBRIEN: Transporter emergency! I'm losing her signal!
WORF: Boosting power to autosequencers.
DATA: Engaging computer override.
RIKER: O'Brien, what happened down there?
OBRIEN: I'm losing the pattern. Trying to re establish. I'm sorry, sir. I wasn't able to retrieve the signal. The Ambassador's dead. Second officer's personal log, supplemental. The risks aboard a starship are accepted by all who serve, but I have never failed to observe a deep emotional response to the loss of a comrade. It is at times like this that I greatly miss the ability to share human feelings.
[now in "Transporter room"]
OBRIEN: The signal lock wasn't broken, sir. I had just entered the transfer sequence when the Ambassador's pattern began to break up. I tried to switch to emergency manual control, but the pattern deteriorated too quickly and
DATA: Captain, there is no prior record of this type of accident occurring aboard a starship. Backup systems and safeguards are designed to prevent just such an occurrence.
LAFORGE: I can't find any system flaws in the unit, Captain. The Engineering status reports were all normal. None of the backups were activated and the autosequencers were all functioning normally.
PICARD: Any prior malfunctions on this transporter unit?
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. With the Phoenix in close formation, we are proceeding directly to Starbase two one one.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Mister Data, how long until we clear Cardassian space?
DATA: At our present speed, three hours, twenty minutes, sir.
PICARD: Mister Worf, send a message to Admiral Haden at Starfleet. Inform him of our projected time of arrival.
WORF: Aye, sir.
DATA: Captain, the Phoenix has changed course.
MACET: What is he doing?
PICARD: Ensign, change course to pursue. Mister Worf, will you hail Captain Maxwell?
WORF: No response, sir.
RIKER: Data, project his new course.
DATA: Sir, the Phoenix is heading directly for a Cardassian vessel point one two light years from our location.
MACET: He'll attack that ship just as he did the others.
PICARD: Continue the hail, Mister Worf. Priority one message. Do you know what that ship might be?
WORF: The Phoenix still does not respond, sir.
PICARD: Ensign, warp eight. Overtake him.
DATA: Captain, the Phoenix has accelerated to warp nine. We will not be able to reach him before he intercepts the Cardassian ship.
PICARD: Ensign, warp nine.
ENSIGN: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Get him up here.
ANNOTATION: (a short time later, O'Brien enters)
DATA: Sir, the Phoenix has dropped out of warp. They have reached the Cardassian vessel.
RIKER: Slow to impulse.
WORF: Vessels are within visual range.
PICARD: On screen.
RIKER: Has the Phoenix activated its weapon systems?
DATA: Negative, sir. Their phaser banks are not armed.
RIKER: What about the Cardassians?
DATA: Our sensors are unable to determine status of the Cardassian defensive systems. Their ship is running with a high powered subspace field.
PICARD: Mister O'Brien, your former Commander, a Federation Captain, is about to place me in the position of firing on his ship. I need your knowledge of the man. How he thinks, what he's capable of doing.
OBRIEN: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (transmission ends)
OBRIEN: Sir, Captain Maxwell, if he feels his back is to the wall, he'll strike.
DATA: Captain, the Phoenix is transferring power to its shields.
WORF: They're arming phasers and loading forward torpedo bays.
PICARD: Red alert. It seems you were right, Mister O'Brien. Ready phasers, load torpedoes.
PICARD: Proceed.
DATA: We will have to draw power from the life-support systems in order to discharge the collectors. This is Acting Captain Data. All personnel will report to designated shelter areas
[now in "Ten Forward"]
DATA: Immediately. Life support systems will continue only in emergency shelter areas.
GILLESPIE: Hear that? Get us jammed into shelter areas. We sit and wait to die. Nobody'll ever find us.
GUINAN: Relax, Gillespie. Everybody relax. Ten Forward is a designated shelter area. Relax.
OBRIEN: I've run a level one diagnostic. As far as I can tell, the unit hasn't been tampered with.
LAFORGE: This has to be the transfer point.
DATA: Perhaps the perpetrator reprogrammed the memory chips to erase any record.
OBRIEN: You're talking about thirty or forty chips in half a dozen different control systems.
WORF: Which members of the crew could have accomplished that?
WORF: Procedure requires that I ask each of you where you were at eleven twenty three hours.
OBRIEN: I was with Keiko, in the Arboretum.
DATA: I was on the Bridge at my station.
LAFORGE: I was in my quarters.
WORF: Was anyone with you?
LAFORGE: Maybe we should run a level one diagnostic on those phase transition coils.
OBRIEN: Right, Commander.
DATA: Data to La Forge.
[now in "Shuttlebay"]
DATA: Report, please. Geordi.
[now in "Cargo bay"]
DATA: Please respond.
ANNOTATION: (Miles and Keiko embrace)
MILES: Really wonderful.
DATA: Is anything wrong?
JENNA: My tempo was way off. I felt like I was rushing through the whole piece.
DATA: I do not believe that is so. Your rhythmic control has improved markedly. I heard no fluctuations during the performance.
JENNA: Well, maybe, but I ruined the coda. I got confused with the phrasing again. I kept breathing at the wrong times.
DATA: The contrapuntal nature of the composition is most demanding. We will give more attention to the rhythmic patterns at our next rehearsal. However, I am quite certain the audience was oblivious to such nuances. They seemed to enjoy the performance thoroughly.
JENNA: Thank you, Data. You're very generous.
ANNOTATION: (later, at a table)
OBRIEN: And a very good job she does of it, too.
JENNA: Keiko, you sound just like Data. He came over to my quarters the other day to give me a music lesson, and he said the funniest thing. How did you put it, about the mess?
DATA: I believe I observed that you seem to have an aversion to orderliness. But it was not intended as a humourous remark.
JENNA: So, before we started, he gallantly offered to help me straighten up.
DATA: And a very good job of it I did of it, too.
ANNOTATION: (and Jenna hangs onto his arm, and gazes at him like Keiko gazes at Miles)
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Report, Mister Data.
DATA: Possibly. If you augment the thruster sequencing so that the inertial dampening fields
PICARD: Bearing two seven, make that two eight five, mark two five five!
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Commander, the shuttle is out of control.
RIKER: Mister O'Brien do you have the Captain's signal?
OBRIEN: I'm having trouble locking on, sir.
DATA: Sir, the shuttle's inertial dampeners have failed. It is breaking up.
RIKER: Let's get him out of there.
[now in "Shuttle"]
ANNOTATION: (suffering under multiple g-force)
PICARD: I'm a little dizzy, Number One, but none the worse. I'm on my way.
RIKER: Acknowledged, sir.
DATA: Commander, we are nearing the perimeter. One million kilometres away.
RIKER: All right, let's make a run for it.
MCKNIGHT: Aye, sir.
OBRIEN: There's a disruption in the tachyon detectors! It's localised to this segment of the net.
PICARD: Open a channel to the Sutherland.
DATA: Data here, sir.
PICARD: We're reading a disruption of the tachyon net in your area.
DATA: Yes, sir. The Romulans have released a high energy burst. The net is no longer effective in a radius of ten million kilometres around the Sutherland.
PICARD: That's where they're going through. Send a signal to the fleet. All ships to fall back and rendezvous at Gamma Eridon. We'll re-establish the net there.
OBRIEN: Aye, sir.
KEIKO: Right there.
RIKER: He's going to be a hell of a gymnast.
DATA: May I?
KEIKO: Sure. There, feel it? When he's not turning, he's kicking and punching. When I want to sleep, he wants to wake up. At this point, I just wish it were over.
OBRIEN: I have to go. I've got a transporter simulation on the bridge. Bye-bye, Michael.
OBRIEN: This way!
TROI: What happened?
DATA: He would not move to a polar orbit.
TROI: You couldn't wait? The Captain would have done it for me.
[now in "Turbolift"]
OBRIEN: Deck thirty six. Engineering.
WORF: They're in turbolift four. Engaging override controls now.
[now in "Turbolift"]
ANNOTATION: (the lift jerks to a halt)
DATA: They've trapped us.
TROI: What deck is this?
OBRIEN: We're on deck ten.
TROI: Do you know how to deactivate this?
OBRIEN: The computer will not allow us to override an emergency forcefield command.
DATA: My entity's artificial substructure may be useful.
ANNOTATION: (Data smashes a wall panel and short-circuits the forcefields)
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: They've broken through a security field, deck ten, section two.
CREWMAN: Attempting to lock on, sir.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
OBRIEN: You were correct. They're attempting to engage their transporters. But I know how to shut them down.
DATA: Do it.
[now in "Transporter room"]
CREWMAN: Bridge, the entire transporter array has been taken off line and placed into diagnostic mode.
[now in "Bridge"]
CREWMAN: I can't override. It'll take a couple of hours to complete the cycle.
CRUSHER: On my way.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
TROI: What are you doing now?
DATA: I can reverse the polarity of their forcefields to isolate this room.
TROI: Good.
OBRIEN: Their communicators. Now they will learn nothing but what we tell them.
OBRIEN: And what would you tell him to do?
TROI: I would help him find a way to secure our trust.
DATA: What are you looking at? You, Klingon. Attack me. (Data throws his phaser to Miles) Are you afraid?
WORF: I have no fear of death.
DATA: And I have no fear of killing you.
TROI: Stop it!
PICARD: Please respond, Ten Forward. Are there any members of my crew who require medical assistance?
RIKER: Yes, sir.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
ANNOTATION: (Molly is still upset)
DATA: Silence that child!
OBRIEN: I know you. I know who you are. And I know who this is.
KEIKO: She's frightened. Why don't you just let us go?
PICARD: End this, and I will give you whatever help you need.
TROI: No. You don't trust us. And I can't risk trusting you.
DATA: It is taking too long. We should have been there by now. He is manipulating you.
TROI: Captain Picard has every right to be curious.
DATA: He will try to delay until a rescue attempt is possible.
TROI: I know that. I also know that he will make every effort to protect the lives of his people. Since our demands are not excessive, Captain, I hope you will see that it will be simpler to accede than to risk further injuries.
PICARD: What do you want?
PICARD: I assure you, Mister Worf, these are not jat'yIn. Our job is to find out exactly what they are and then to determine how to deal with them.
ANNOTATION: (Data comes over and separates them)
DATA: Right, That's enough. Sit down, both of you. You over there, you there. Down.
OBRIEN: I gave you that. In a place called McKinley Park. Green grass. Tall trees.
KEIKO: Please don't.
TROI: I wish you were truly as open-minded as you say, Picard.
PICARD: If you don't release the hostages, I won't cooperate.
DATA: You will cooperate, Captain. You will cooperate or someone will die. Who shall it be? How about the Klingon? Get another one.
OBRIEN: You.
ANNOTATION: (Another woman takes Molly)
OBRIEN: Come on. Come on, come on.
DATA: Pick one to die, Captain, or I kill them both.
[now in "Jefferies tube"]
RO: They're all in range. I have to do it now.
LAFORGE: I'm only going to be able to shut down the forcefield for about seven seconds before the computer compensates.
OBRIEN: They're lying.
PICARD: On the contrary, we've had a difficult time with transporters since we arrived here. That's why we had to send down the shuttle. You should all have been aware of that fact.
DATA: We must be able to use the transporters.
PICARD: Mister O'Brien was the one who safely executed the return of the away team. He's the most qualified person on board to operate the transporters under these circumstances.
TROI: Can you do it from here?
OBRIEN: No. I'd have to use a transporter pad.
PICARD: I could give you safe passage to a transporter pad in one of the cargo bays.
DATA: It's a trick. He is trying to divide us.
TROI: We must not be separated.
PICARD: I can give you all safe passage.
DATA: Why are you suddenly being so helpful?
PICARD: Because I assume that if you choose go to the cargo bay, then you won't to take all of the hostages. Their safety is my chief priority.
TROI: What are the risks when we leave this room?
DATA: Without the protection of the forcefields, we are completely vulnerable.
OBRIEN: They could use the transporter against us. Once the forcefield is down, they could beam us back to the surface. But there is a way to neutralise that threat. Bridge, transfer all transporter functions to Ten Forward.
RIKER: In order to do that
RIKER: Almost had them, Ensign. Nice try. Ten Forward. Our mistake. Remaining transporter functions are being transferred to you.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
OBRIEN: Once we create our own access code, we can prevent anyone using the transporter against us. We can go to the cargo bay.
DATA: What about the weapons?
TROI: We will each take a hostage for protection.
DATA: Klingon.
TROI: Picard, you are mine.
KEIKO: Please, let her stay.
OBRIEN: We are still in control of these three bodies. We will not let them go.
PICARD: Are you prepared to sacrifice the lives of the others? They'll all die when the cargo bay hatch is blown.
DATA: You will die too, Picard.
KEIKO: I would die to save the life of my child.
WORF: To die defending one's ship is the hope of every Klingon.
ANNOTATION: (Picard goes to a wall console and Data enters)
OBRIEN: We have to realign the entire power grid. We'll all be burning the midnight oil on this one.
DATA: That would be inadvisable.
OBRIEN: Excuse me?
DATA: If you attempt to ignite a petroleum product on this ship at zero hundred hours, it will activate the fire suppression system, which would seal off this entire compartment.
OBRIEN: That was just an expression.
DATA: Expression of what?
OBRIEN: A figure of speech. I was trying to tell him that we'd be working late.
DATA: Ah. Then to burn the midnight oil implies late work?
OBRIEN: That's right.
DATA: I am curious. What is the etymology of that idiom? How did it come to be used in contemporary language?
OBRIEN: I don't know, sir.
PICARD: Commander Data, welcome on board. It's so very good to see you.
DATA: It is good to see you, too, sir.
PICARD: I could use your help with the infuser array.
DATA: Certainly.
PICARD: As you can see, we're having difficulty with the plasma conduits.
DATA: This will need a completely new field induction subprocessor. It appears that we will be required to ignite the midnight petroleum, sir.
CRUSHER: Jean-Luc, what's going on?
[now in "Doctor's office"]
PICARD: It happened again.
OBRIEN: We're nearing the coordinates you gave me, sir.
PICARD: Is there anything unusual in the vicinity, Mister Data?
DATA: How would you define unusual, sir? Every region of space has its own unique properties that cannot be found anywhere else.
PICARD: There should be a barrier of some sort nearby. A large plasma field, highly disruptive.
DATA: Nothing, sir.
PICARD: This is the right time, the right place. He should be here now.
OBRIEN: Who, sir?
DATA: They would annihilate one other, causing a rupture in space. I believe this is what happened in the Devron system. The rupture may be sending out waves of temporal energy which are disrupting the normal flow of time.
PICARD: Data, what could have caused this collision of time and anti-time?
[now in "Past - Bridge"]
DATA: Anti-time, sir?
PICARD: I believe that if you modify the deflectors to send out an inverse tachyon pulse, then you'll find that the anomaly is a rupture between time and anti-time.
DATA: That is a fascinating hypothesis. How did you formulate
PICARD: I don't have time to discuss it now, Mister Data. Do the modifications and send out the pulse. Then try working on a theory as to what caused this rupture. Mister O'Brien, how large is this anomaly?
OBRIEN: Approximately four hundred million kilometres in diameter, sir.
Q: Congratulations.
[now in "Past - Engineering"]
PICARD: Let's concentrate on how this anomaly was initially formed. Speculation?
DATA: Our tachyon pulse has been unable to completely penetrate the anomaly. If we had information on the centre of the phenomenon, we might have a basis for speculation.
PICARD: Is there any way that we can scan the interior?
OBRIEN: I've tried everything I know. There's just too much interference. There's nothing on board that'll do the job.
PICARD: Do you know what could?
DATA: In theory, a tomographic imaging scanner capable of multiphasic resolution would be able to penetrate this much interference. The Daystrom Institute has been working on such a device, but it is still only theoretical.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (at the science station)
PICARD: Data do we have a tomographic imaging scanner on board?
DATA: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Is there any change in the anomaly?
[now in "Past - Bridge"]
DATA: No, sir.
PICARD: Disengage the tachyon pulse.
OBRIEN: but e haven't finished the scan, sir.
PICARD: I know that. But it is imperative that you disengage the tachyon pulse immediately.
DATA: Aye, sir. Disengaging.
PICARD: Why isn't the anomaly being affected?
OBRIEN: Why would it be, sir?
YAR: Shields up, maximum strength.
WORF: Boosting field integrity to the warp nacelles. We may encounter shearing forces once we enter the anomaly.
DATA: I am preparing to initiate a static warp shell.
OBRIEN: Course laid in, sir.
TROI: All decks report ready, sir.
RIKER (OC): Bring out the prisoner!
PICARD: Mister Worf, I always knew this day would come. Are you prepared to face the charges?
TROI: Answer him!
WORF: I am prepared.
RIKER: 'We, the officers and crew of the U.S.S. Enterprise, being of sound mind and judgment, hereby make the following charges against Lieutenant Worf. One. That he did knowingly and wilfully perform above and beyond the call of duty on countless occasions. Two. Most seriously, that he has earned the admiration and respect of the entire crew.'
RIKER: Look alive there!
ANNOTATION: (the holodeck arch appears on the deck and Picard reads the message)
TROI: Here. Take the wheel. ...Captain, are you all right?
PICARD: Yes. I'm fine. ...Excuse me. Computer. Exit.
RIKER: Mister La Forge. Set the royals and stunsails.
RIKER: Maybe they're not out there.
PICARD: They're just trying to decide whether a twenty year-old Klingon Bird-of-Prey can be a match for the Federation flagship.
TROI: Perhaps they're on the surface.
WORF: Sir, according to my calculations, a solar probe launched from either the Klingon ship or the planet's surface will take eleven seconds to reach the sun. However, since we do not have an exact point of origin, it will take us between eight and fifteen seconds to lock our weapons onto it.
RIKER: That's a pretty big margin of error. Much too big.
RIKER: Begin separation sequence. Full impulse power once we're clear. Warp core is going critical.
DATA: Separation complete.
TROI: Engaging impulse engines.
DATA (OC): Core breach in progress.
COMPUTER VOICE: Primary stabilisers off-line. Engaging secondary systems.
RIKER: Report!
TROI: Helm controls are off-line!
DATA: Oh, shit...
ANNOTATION: (on the viewscreen Data has realised the saucer section is hurtling towards the planet)
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 48650.1. Three Starfleet vessels have arrived in orbit and have begun to beam up the Enterprise survivors. Our casualties are light but unfortunately the Enterprise herself cannot be salvaged.
[now in "Enterprise-D cargo bay"]
DATA: It has been extremely difficult, Counselor.
TROI: Then why did you decide not to remove the emotion chip?
DATA: At first I was unprepared for the unpredictable nature of the emotions. However having experienced two hundred and sixty-one distinct emotional states, I believe I have learned to control my feelings. They will no longer control me.
TROI: Well, I hope you're successful, Data. ...Data, over here, I've found something. ...One life sign, very faint.
DATA: Spot! ...I'm very happy to see you, Spot.
TROI: Another family reunited. ...Data, ...are you all right?
DATA: I am uncertain, Counselor. I am happy to see Spot, and yet I am crying. Perhaps the chip is malfunctioning?
TROI: I think it's working perfectly.
DATA: Hello, Spot.
[now in "Enterprise-D ready room"]
RIKER: Is this it?
DATA: Difficult? Simply solve the mystery of Farpoint Station.
PICARD: As simple as that.
TROI: Farpoint Station. Even the name sounds mysterious.
PICARD: It's hardly simple, Data, to negotiate a friendly agreement for Starfleet to use the base while at the same time snoop around finding how and why the life form there built it.
DATA: Inquiry. The word snoop?
PICARD: Exactly, yes.
DATA: Glide, creep, skulk, pussyfoot, gumshoe.
TROI: Captain, I'm sensing a powerful mind.
ANNOTATION: (Collision alert sounds)
TORRES: Something strange on the detector circuits.
ANNOTATION: (A massive barrier appears in front of them in space)
DATA: It registers as solid, Captain.
TROI: Or an incredibly powerful forcefield. But if we collide with either it could be very
PICARD: Shut off that damned noise. Go to Yellow Alert.
WORF: Shields and deflectors up, sir.
ANNOTATION: (And the helmsman is frozen solid, phaser in hand)
PICARD: Data, call medics.
TROI: He's frozen.
PICARD: He would not have injured you. Do you recognise this, the stun setting?
Q: Knowing humans as thou dost, Captain, wouldst thou be captured helpless by them? Now, go back or thou shalt most certainly die.
YAR: Fight, or try to escape.
PICARD: Sense anything, Commander?
TROI: Its mind is much too powerful. Recommend we avoid contact.
PICARD: From this point, no station aboard, repeat no station, for any reason will make use of transmitted signals or intercom. We'll try and take them by surprise. Let's see what this galaxy class starship can do. (to Worf) Lieutenant, inform engine room to prepare for maximum acceleration.
WORF: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Worf makes his trip to Engineering and back)
WORF: Engine room ready, sir.
TROI: The board shows green, Captain. All go.
PICARD: Stand by. Engage.
ANNOTATION: (They swoop along and past the barrier, which then turns into a ball and chases them)
WORF: We're now at warp nine point three, sir, which takes us past the red line, sir.
PICARD: Continue accelerating. Counsellor, at this point I'm open to guesses about what we've just met.
TROI: It it felt like something beyond what we'd consider a life form.
PICARD: Beyond?
TROI: Very, very advanced, sir, or certainly very, very different.
WORF: We're at nine point four, sir.
YAR: Hostile is now beginning to overtake us, sir.
DATA: Reverse power. Decelerating.
PICARD: Dead stop. We'll hold this position and wait for them.
TROI: That will bring them here in just minutes, sir.
YAR: Will we make a fight of it, Captain? If we can at least damage their ship we'll have a chance
PICARD: Lieutenant, are you recommending we fight a life form that can do all those things? I'd like to hear your advice.
OBRIEN: All forward motion stopped, sir.
PICARD: Thank you, conn. Commander, signal the following in all languages and on all frequencies. We surrender. State that we are not asking for any terms or conditions.
TROI: Aye, sir. All language forms and frequencies.
ANNOTATION: (The ball reaches them and surrounds them with it's barrier. The ship shakes)
[now in "Courtroom"]
ANNOTATION: (The crew find themselves in a room with a noisy audience. One of the future soldiers that Q pretended to be, fires his machine gun for silence. An Oriental man takes charge)
PICARD: Mid twenty first century. The post-atomic horror.
BAILIFF: All present, stand and make respectful attention to honoured Judge.
TROI: Careful, sir. This is not an illusion or a dream.
PICARD: But these courts happened in the past.
TROI: I don't understand either, but this is real.
SOLDIER: Get to your feet, criminals!
ANNOTATION: (From the distance, a spotlight reveals a figure approaching, dressed in red, and sitting on a throne carried on hydraulics for effect)
YAR: I must! Because I grew up on a world that allowed things like this court. And it was people like these that saved me from it. This so-called court should get down on its knees to what Starfleet is, what it represents.
ANNOTATION: (Q freezes Tasha)
TROI: You barbarian! This woman
BAILIFF: Criminals keep silence!
PICARD: You've got a lot to learn about humans if you think you can torture us or frighten us into silence. Will she live?
CRUSHER: You are asking for trouble, Wes. We'll see what we can do.
[now in "Market place"]
YAR: Recommend that someone could begin by examining the underside of the station, sir.
TROI: Our sensors do show some passages, sir. Perhaps you and I?
RIKER: Tasha, you and the Counsellor. And, Geordi, I want your eyes down there. (to Data) You and I will start with topside.
ANNOTATION: (As the three explore underground)
YAR: Pain again?
RIKER: Troi, you've been at it enough.
TROI: No, I feel close to an answer of some kind.
DATA: Commander, something down here is shielding our communicators.
TROI: Yes, that's exactly the feeling I've been reading. As if someone doesn't want us to be in touch with our ship.
RIKER: Come on, let's get to the surface.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: There is no computer record of any such vessel, sir. Nothing even close.
ANNOTATION: (The ruined and empty city is being smashed by purple blasts)
[now in "Passageway"]
ANNOTATION: (The away team can hear the blasts)
TROI: Those stairs are where we entered down here, sir.
LAFORGE: At this point, it becomes ordinary stone, sir. Matching what's above.
YAR: My God! Was that a phaser blast?
DATA: Negative. But something similar.
RIKER: You, Tasha, and Geordi will beam up to the ship. Now, come on, I want to see exactly what's happening.
TROI: Don't. If you should be hurt
RIKER: You have your orders, Lieutenant. Carry them out.
TROI: Yes sir, I'm sorry, sir. Enterprise, three to beam up.
[now in "Zorn's office"]
ZORN: Enterprise, Enterprise, come in! Help us, please! What shall we do?
[now in "Bridge"]
ZORN: Enterprise, help us, please!
YAR: How does this ship run?
RIKER: What is it, Troi? Is it the same as you felt down there?
TROI: No. This is much more powerful. Full of anger! Hate!
YAR: Toward us?
TROI: No. It's directed down toward the old Bandi city.
DATA: Most intriguing again, sir. The place that this vessel was firing upon was not the Farpoint starbase, but the home of those who constructed. Sorry, sir. I seem to be commenting on everything.
RIKER: Good. Don't stop, my friend.
Q: You'll do whatever I say?
PICARD: It seems I did make that bargain.
TROI: The agreement isn't valid, sir. It wasn't Q that saved us.
Q: Save yourself. It may attack you now.
RIKER: It was that which sent us back, Captain.
TROI: Yes sir. It is not merely a vessel, sir. Somehow it is alive.
Q: She lies. Destroy it while you have a chance. Make phasers and photon torpedoes ready.
PICARD: No! Do nothing he demands.
Q: He lies, Captain. Shouldn't you let his people die?
PICARD: Transmit the message, leave Farpoint Space Station immediately.
TROI: Then it was a pair of creatures I was sensing. One down there in grief and pain, the other up here, filled with anger.
DATA: And firing not on the new space station, but on the Bandi and their city.
PICARD: Attacking those who had captured, capture its mate.
PICARD: Only enough to keep it alive, so that you could force it to shape itself into whatever form you needed!
ANNOTATION: (The second jellyfish takes off, and the two touch tendrils, lovingly, before leaving)
TROI: Sir! Wonderful! A feeling of great joy. And gratitude. Great joy and gratitude, from both of them.
PICARD: Why do you use other lifeforms for recreation?
Q: If so, you've not provided the best.
RIKER: We've noticed you're intrigued with her having security responsibilities. But these things are not at all unusual with us.
HAGON: With us, it is the duty of women only to own the land, and the duty of men to protect and rule it.
TROI: Much the same has happened in human history too.
YAR: I'd like to do it, sir. As a sign of respect, perhaps.
PICARD: Very well.
DATA: It reads similar to early Starfleet efforts but uses the Heglenian shift to convert matter and energy in different. (turns) Which is actually not important at this time.
PICARD: This is Captain Picard of the Enterprise with a message to Lutan, whom I have so far acknowledged as a friend. But you have now committed what our laws regard as an attack upon us. Since you have visited our vessel, you most certainly know the power of it. We insist that you reply to this message. Opinion, Counsellor. Will they injure Lieutenant Yar?
TROI: I believe not, sir. They seem mainly curious. In the case of Lutan, however, I did feel other needs.
RIKER: What kind of needs?
TROI: Some sexual attraction from all the males. Lieutenant Yar is physically very attractive. But with Lutan I felt something else. Something more like avarice or ambition.
PICARD: Other comments?
DATA: If I may, sir. One of the things about them in the briefing studies was their respect for patience.
LAFORGE: Sir?
PICARD: Is the whole ship deaf?! Sit down over there, young man. Temporarily.
TROI: Captain, we have more information from the briefing studies on Ligon.
PICARD: Excuse me. Doctor Crusher, some of this may interest you. Lets hear the analysis.
DATA: It is a highly structured society in which people live by strict codes of honour. For example, what Lutan did is similar to what certain American Indians once did called counting coup. That's from an obscure language called French. Counting coup
DATA: Yes, sir. Counting coup could be as simple as touching an enemy with a stick in battle, or taking something from him and escaping. It was considered extremely heroic.
RIKER: And under these circumstances Lutan considers himself heroic, risking literally everything in the face of our superior power.
TROI: And it fits Lutan's personality profile as well. He has an abnormally high need for achievement. Self image to him is a function of what he thinks he's achieved. Those who set their standards too high can kill to meet them.
CRUSHER: Why Tasha?
TROI: As a Starfleet Security Officer, she may have represented his riskiest prize.
DATA: Transmission from the planet surface, sir, Main viewer on.
PICARD: Well, Lutan, what do you want?
PICARD: What is required is an image of Lieutenant Yar, well and
LUTAN: Are you making demands, Captain?
TROI: Sir. According to the Ligon Code of Honour, Lutan has done what he set out to do, achieve recognition for being daring and bold.
RIKER: We've studied this in some depth now, sir. The proper thing for you to do now is to ask to get Tasha back.
PICARD: Ask for her?
LUTAN: Then come visit us, Captain, and we will return her to you.
ANNOTATION: (a little later)
TROI: Commander.
RIKER: Commander? That's quite formal.
TROI: So is this request, sir. We believe it would be preferable if the Captain led this away party.
DATA: Agreed, sir. Their customs concerning guests make it much preferable.
RIKER: And I'm very much against that idea. Lutan is clearly a liar, and devious. Counsellor Troi has admitted she believes he's capable of killing. It is my duty to keep the Captain from danger, sir.
DATA: Except that Ligonian custom makes it clear that a visiting leader becomes an honoured guest. Not us, not second in command, him.
TROI: And the custom requires that Lutan should die rather than violate that.
RIKER: Yes, it seems reasonable put that way. But I warn you, if you get hurt, I'll put you on report, Captain.
[now in "Centreplace"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard and Troi beam into a colonnaded area with a water feature)
LAFORGE: Aye, sir.
DATA: From any particular point of view, sir?
TROI: From the perspective of Lieutenant Yar using them in combat with Lutan's wife.
DATA: Most interesting. Could this be human joke number six hundred sixty three?
LAFORGE: Negative, Data. That's a Captain's order.
DATA: understanding the Prime Directive, sir.
PICARD: That is, ironically, what this is about. By our standards, the customs here, their code of honour, is the same kind of pompous, strutting charades that endangered our own species a few centuries ago. We evolved out of it because no one else imposed their own. I'm sorry, this is becoming a speech.
TROI: You're the Captain, sir. You're entitled.
PICARD: Not entitled to ramble on about something everyone knows. Carry on. Ship's log, Commander William Riker reporting. Continuing our appraisal of Ligonian technology. The Captain has made it clear he wants Lieutenant Yar beamed immediately to safety if her life should become endangered, and I fervently hope the rules of that contest make it possible.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Riker to Transporter Chief. Do we have our people on sensors yet?
YAR: In my world, it's a greater honour to refuse
YAREENA: You are on our world!
[now in "Picard's room"]
TROI: Captain, I'm your Counsellor. You brought me with you to Ligon to be of help.
PICARD: Then help me, please. What is a way out of this?
TROI: With the vaccine? None.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi and Data enter)
LAFORGE: The weapons in that room, Captain, are surprisingly flexible, durable, and deadly.
RIKER: Who's getting married?
TROI: I am.
[now in "Ready room"]
TROI: I was certain it would never happen, Captain. The years I'd spend on this mission, the distance it has taken me away from home. As you must have heard, genetic bonding is a Betazoid tradition. Steven Miller was my father's closest friend.
RIKER: Your father was human, Deanna. The Millers are human
PICARD: Will you and your husband be staying with the ship, Counsellor?
TROI: No, sir.
PICARD: Then I'll just say congratulations for now, Deanna. You'll excuse me?
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
TROI: Bill, more than anything else in the world, anything, you want to be a starship captain. True?
RIKER: That's not all I want, Deanna.
TROI: I can feel that. I know you care, within those limits. Did you hear what I said?
RIKER: Every word. This whole thing is still bizarre. I'm sorry.
TROI: Come dance at my wedding.
RIKER: I'll try.
ANNOTATION: (Riker leaves as Data enters)
VICTORIA: My family and I are living on Earth now.
LWAXANA: So, that's why you want that backward ritual. Terrible, Captain, to see a woman go downhill like this.
TROI: Mother!
VICTORIA: Downhill?
LWAXANA: The matter is settled. Mister Homn will conduct the joining.
LWAXANA: You did know he's attracted to me, didn't you?
STEVEN: Untrue! I don't.
TROI: Stop this petty bickering, all of you! Especially you, Mother!
ANNOTATION: (Troi storms out, knocking over the gong on her way)
DATA: Could you please continue the petty bickering? I find it most intriguing.
RIKER: Captain!
ANNOTATION: (The viewscreen crackles into life, and it's a face Troi recognises)
TROI: It's the woman in Wyatt's drawings.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 41294.6. Orbiting Haven with the Tarellian vessel locked in our tractor beam. Question. What strange of circumstances has caused a woman out of someone's imagination to appear on the plague ship?
LAFORGE: Enterprise to Tarellian vessel, are you receiving us?
ANNOTATION: (Kosinski leaves)
PICARD: Comment is invited. Counsellor?
TROI: He's convinced he's right. I have no doubt of that.
WORF: Captain, can you allow a man who has made one mistake back into a position where he may make another?
LAFORGE: Captain, what are our options really? I mean, if this guy can't get us back, who will?
LAFORGE: Warp one point five, retroactive two six one mark three one, sir.
PICARD: Bridge to Engineering. Stand by.
TROI: I feel such an abundance of well being on the ship. It feels like, quite wonderful.
RIKER: Engineering to Bridge, we're ready.
PICARD: On my order, Mister Data, Mister La Forge. Engage.
RIKER: It's impossible they could be draining all power from all systems.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: I'm sensing nothing from them Captain. Which could mean they can shield their thoughts and emotions from others.
PICARD: It still makes it our move.
TROI: Sir, they may know as little about us as we do about them.
RIKER: Except that they know they've got us in deep trouble.
PICARD: If so, the question becomes how will they use that knowledge? Data, do you have any information touching this on any file?
LAFORGE: They can do that?
DATA: And more, perhaps.
TROI: Captain, if I may recommend? With our attention on the Ferengi vessel, we have ignored the planet.
PICARD: Data, consult the charts on this planet. See what we've got on it. Conference evaluation.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: So, while we still have some power left, it is time for difficult decisions. Opinions please.
RIKER: I wonder, Captain. I'm not usually one for distrust at first sight, but this may be an exception.
DATA: Especially in view of the fact the image he transmitted, sir, was somehow distorted.
TROI: I sensed the same thing, Captain. He's hiding something.
RIKER: With this power drain we can't delay. Now, I'd like some additional help in case we run into trouble. Can you spare Worf?
PICARD: Take him. And be careful, Number One.
CRUSHER: I feel someone else. There's someone else who's there. Not alone. Get out. Get out of my mind.
TROI: (to Worf) That's almost exactly what you said. As though there was something else inside you.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: Which confirms the feeling of duality that I sensed earlier in both of them.
PICARD: Why didn't you report it?
TROI: Because, sir, I assumed at first it was the kind of duality we Betazeds feel in all of you. Even you, sir. When you approach a decision and ask yourself which way to go, who are you talking to?
PICARD: Your hypnotism revealed another form of duality?
TROI: Yes, sir. I believe something invaded them.
CRUSHER: It seems the only possible conclusion.
PICARD: Data, let's proceed without the pipe.
RIKER: But we're behind schedule for Parliament already.
PICARD: I believe a very important scientific discovery awaits us on this heading.
TROI: Perhaps you'd like to share your reasoning on that, sir?
DATA: Yes, since we obtained only minimal information on our sensor pass of it.
PICARD: Right, Data. We must go back to learn more. Counsellor, do you believe a ship Captain should explain every order?
TROI: Of course not, sir.
[now in "Corridor"]
ANTICAN: I demand to see the Captain.
OBRIEN: (as a security guard) Stop! Return to your quarters.
DATA: A mere change of direction hardly justifies mutiny.
CRUSHER: Exactly what do you believe you're sensing from him?
TROI: It's just a feeling that he's, well, that he's closed part of his mind to me. I just feel that the Captain has become, perhaps dangerous.
RIKER: If he's dangerous. If.
LAFORGE: Then he'd have to be relieved of command. Which you could do, Doctor, but it's beaucoup trouble if you're wrong.
CRUSHER: I'd need a medical log citing clear evidence of incapacity. You could do it without that problem.
RIKER: Only if all command officers agreed it vital to do so. But he has not been showing any overt unusual behaviour.
TROI: Ultimately, I believe he will.
CRUSHER: As second in command, it's still in your corner. I'll order medical and psychiatric exams. You'll have to back me up somehow. First Officer's log, supplemental. After meeting with the senior officers, Doctor Crusher and I decided to approach the Captain regarding his recent behaviour.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Yes?
RIKER: Shall we begin the scientific tests you wanted, sir?
PICARD: Oh, they're already underway. I have an announcement for the entire Bridge. As many of you suspected, when our ship passed through the edge of this, it accidentally carried away a sentient being. Much like these energy patterns we're seeing here. A terrifying experience for any intelligent being. As if a great claw had reached down and scooped one of you from your home world. Drawn into the energy circuits of this vessel, it found its way to you, Worf. Frantic at being carried from its home world, and recognising you as sentient beings, it pleaded for help, but in ways you couldn't understand. Desperately going from person to person, and then discovering the computer intelligence in this ship's memory circuits. Oh, simplistic intelligence, but it furnished it enough to slow this Enterprise thing that had captured it. And it very much regrets the accidental death of Engineer Singh.
TROI: Captain, do you exist in combination with this entity?
RIKER: Is it in control of you, sir?
PICARD: Very soon after we combined we had learned much about each other. A passion for exploration, for the unknown. We found we had similar dreams, and it offered your Captain a way to realise them beyond human expectations.
DATA: Sir, I see no way for you to journey with an energy form.
PICARD: Isn't there?
TROI: He's planning to beam himself and the entity into that cloud.
PICARD: The transporter need not pattern your Captain into matter. We'll beam energy only, and we will become a combined energy pattern of our life forms. A resignation from this command and from Starfleet has been appropriately recorded.
RIKER: I refuse to allow this, sir.
RIKER: Security! Red Alert! Restrain the Captain!
YAR: Where is he?
TROI: This is blinding me.
WORF: Captain! I'll help you if you'll let me.
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves the Bridge as the crew are still transfixed by the blue energy)
RIKER: Mister La Forge, it's time to set a course for Parliament. Warp eight.
LAFORGE: We're really leaving him?
TROI: Commander, wait! It's the Captain. But only the Captain. He's out there alone!
RIKER: The entity, has it abandoned him?
TROI: No, but the combination wasn't possible out there. He's in trouble, sir. We have to beam him back.
RIKER: Beam him back as what? He's nothing but energy now.
DATA: Sir, the entity was caught in the ship's circuitry. The Captain might try to get in the same way if he's in trouble.
LAFORGE: Moving in, sir, but where?
RIKER: There's no way to know. Let's hope he can come part way himself. Troi, is there any way you can get a message to him?
TROI: I wish I could.
LAFORGE: Sensors monitoring the perimeter, ship's circuitry, sir. Nothing.
RIKER: Bring us right into the edge of it, La Forge.
LAFORGE: Aye, sir.
WORF: Sir? On my sensor controls.
TROI: There's something's here. I feel it.
DATA: Just as before, going to Worf first.
LAFORGE: Something crazy on my panel. Commander Riker. (blue energy) Static?
PICARD: What the devil am I doing here?
RIKER: Sounds like our Captain.
TROI: But confused. This Picard pattern was formed before he went out there.
PICARD: What's happening to me, Number One? I was preparing to beam out to somewhere. And I remember there was talk of an entity? But it all seems so vague.
DATA: I believe the Captain is now his separate self, sir. Much of what happened is naturally missing.
ANNOTATION: (Wesley is sitting next to Troi)
PICARD: Riker says the planet's life forms are almost identical to us.
TROI: He's very enthusiastic.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher enters)
CRUSHER: Captain? Sorry, Troi.
TROI: The Doctor has something very important to tell you, Captain.
PICARD: You've been talking about it for days. Shore leave for the crew.
CRUSHER: Establishing that colony has been exhausting for the entire crew, Captain. We're not a supply vessel. Settling all those people has been a strain on everyone. I'm tired myself.
KAZAGO: No price?
PICARD: For what purpose? What (clutches his head in pain)
TROI: I just felt something too, Captain.
BOK: Perhaps it is his conscience?
RIKER: Bridge to Sickbay.
PICARD: No, no. I'm fine
TROI: It felt as if it were something from your past.
PICARD: It's right. I'm fine. What is this all about?
BOK: It is about the battle I mentioned, Captain. A gift, in honour of that occasion. Look at that ship closely.
YAR: No clue who they were?
PICARD: No names, no reason. Can you identify them, Vigo? If they come in a second time with our shields damaged
TROI: Sir? Who's Vigo?
PICARD: He's my weapons officer on the Stargazer. I'm getting quite caught up in this.
RIKER: Your shields were failing, sir.
RIKER: How was it, Captain?
PICARD: Very strange, Number One. Like going back to the house you grew up in, but no one's home, except the phantoms of the past.
TROI: It has troubled you?
PICARD: Not half as much as this damn headache. Take over, Number One.
RIKER: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
RIKER: What's wrong?
TROI: I wish I could say.
[now in "Picard's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (The trunk has been delivered. Picard goes to lie down on his bed) VOICES [OC] Shields weakening, Captain. Torpedoes armed. Where are they? Oh my god, sir! Fire! Fire!
[now in "Ready Room"]
RIKER: What is it, Data? Why all the mystery?
WORF: His chest from the Stargazer, sir? Just where I had left it. He hadn't yet unpacked.
CRUSHER: So, he may not have even known it was there. And if this is able to pick up or magnify thought-altering transmissions
TROI: It could have prepared him for whatever is happening now.
RIKER: Let's find out, or try to. Contact the Ferengi vessel, Lieutenant.
YAR: Hailing frequencies open, sir.
PICARD: Who are they? Identify them!
VOICE: They're coming for a third pass at us, sir! We can't take another hit, Captain!
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Sir, I now feel anger from our Captain. Fury over whatever it is he is reliving out there.
LAFORGE: The Battle of Maxia, sir. That's what it is.
RIKER: The Picard Manoeuvre. What is the defence against that, Data?
DATA: Mordan has had peace for five years. They have finally come to a state of productivity which satisfies their planetary needs, but no more than that. Perhaps the dissidents feel the Federation could provide them with more.
JAMESON: I have negotiated many treaties on many planets, Picard. I've found that peace, or the appearance of it, is often a prelude to war.
TROI: Admiral, are you suggesting the terrorists want arms and weapons?
JAMESON: They may. I am suggesting Karnas is the last man to give them such weapons.
TROI: I see. You believe that Karnas would not negotiate on that point, and so the terrorists demanded an outside negotiator.
JAMESON: I know Karnas. He is a warrior. He lives for challenge. These people have insulted his honour by taking the embassy staff hostage. I'll negotiate, but I'll have to be very careful in dealing with Karnas. He'll want revenge for that insult.
[now in "Jameson's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Anne is unpacking)
PICARD: Real. The subject of this meeting is the Jaradan rendezvous. Mister Riker, will you go ahead with the briefing.
RIKER: This is primarily a diplomatic mission. The Jaradan are strategically important to the Federation. Previous attempts have failed because they are so easily irritated. A slip in the pronunciation of the greeting caused a twenty year rift.
TROI: The Captain has to recite the entire greeting without making any mistakes.
LAFORGE: Simple as that, huh?
DATA: Yes. If, on the other hand, the Captain makes even the slightest error
TROI: The Captain is well aware of the gravity of the situation, Commander.
DATA: We are all aware of the tape of the last Federation starship to come in contact with the Jaradan. It graphically demonstrates what happened when that Captain offended them.
TROI: Captain Picard is familiar with that, Data.
DATA: Should we not rerun it?
PICARD: It's not necessary, Mister Data. Meeting adjourned.
PICARD: Starfleet are adamant that we maintain excellent diplomatic relations with this planet. Mister Data, is there any other pertinent information before we reply?
DATA: Angel One has evolved into a constitutional oligarchy. It is governed by a parliamentary body consisting of six elected Mistresses, and headed by a female they refer to as The Elected One.
TROI: It sounds like my own planet.
WORF: Klingons appreciate strong women.
PICARD: How current is this information, Mister Data?
DATA: A Federation vessel last visited this planet sixty two years ago, Captain.
PICARD: Counsellor, as this is a female dominated society, you might wish to make the initial contact.
TROI: Thank you, sir.
PICARD: Open hailing frequencies.
YAR: Hailing frequencies open, sir.
TROI: This is Counsellor Deanna Troi from the USS Enterprise.
BEATA: [OC]
TROI: The Federation has neglected to visit to your planet for far too long. With your permission, we would like to correct that oversight.
BEATA: [OC]
TROI: We also come in search of possible survivors from one of our freighters.
BEATA: [OC]
YAR: They've broken off transmission.
YAR: Yes. Tricorder doesn't show any listening devices or anything else of a threatening nature.
RIKER: Good. Troi?
TROI: There was much fear in that room.
RIKER: Paranoia, I'd say. But of what?
TROI: I cannot say. But their fear was not focused. I sensed that all were not concerned for the same reason. Undoubtedly there are survivors from the Odin on this planet.
RIKER: I agree. Otherwise, why would they be so circumspect?
YAR: As Mistress Beata is so fond of saying, good question.
ANNOTATION: (Data has found an atomiser, and gives himself a face-full)
DATA: Interesting. An alcohol-based synthetic, artificially reproducing a floral scent.
TROI: It's called perfume, Data.
DATA: The purpose of which is?
YAR: Certain cultures consider perfume an aphrodisiac.
ANNOTATION: (She goes through gauze curtains into another room)
[now in "Guest quarters"]
YAR: Set phasers to stun.
TROI: I wish they weren't necessary.
DATA: A justified precaution, Counsellor. Mistress Beata observed that Mister Ramsey and his men are dangerous.
YAR: Lieutenant Yar to Enterprise.
YAR: Where are the other survivors, Mister Ramsey?
RAMSEY: Oh, they're nearby. They're packing, as a matter of fact, since we can no longer remain here.
TROI: Seven years on an alien planet, and I sense no anticipation, no excitement at being rescued.
RAMSEY: What is it that you think you're rescuing me from? My shipmates and I have all taken wives. A few even have children. You can't rescue a man from a place that he calls his home.
[now in "Beata's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Beata has slipped into something more comfortable)
YAR: None of which is your concern any longer, Mister Ramsey. Call the others in, please. It's time to leave.
RAMSEY: Despite their problems, Lieutenant, we happen to like it here on Angel One. We're not going anywhere.
TROI: But Mistress Beata
RAMSEY: Mistress Beata be damned! Her wish is not my command, and neither is yours. You can't force us to go.
DATA: Mister Ramsey is correct, Counsellor. The Odin was not a starship, which means her crew is not bound by the Prime Directive. If he and the others wish to stay here, there is absolutely nothing we can do about it.
YAR: Some show of force. The Enterprise could fly on autopilot, but with that virus knocking down our crew, we're going to be in sorry shape if things turn ugly.
RIKER: I think it's time we to leave this place.
TROI: It doesn't feel right to leave while Beata is determined to execute those people.
RIKER: She has to find them first. Ramsey and his bunch have been fugitives for years. I suspect he's pretty good at evading capture.
TROI: Something's wrong.
ANNOTATION: (Beata enters, with Trent)
BEATA: Before you go back to your ship, there's something I want you to see.
BEATA: Will you also include those from this world who unwisely choose to follow Ramsey and his group?
RIKER: Yes. All of them.
[now in "Holding area"]
TROI: Mistress Beata is willing to give you a second chance. We're prepared to take your entire group with us.
RAMSEY: That's very kind of you, but we're not going.
YAR: Haven't you been paying attention, Ramsey? You're scheduled to be executed tomorrow.
DATA: This is Data, standing by to beam up.
ANNOTATION: (He beams away)
TROI: What of them?
RIKER: I don't know, Deanna.
[now in "Guest quarters"]
TRENT: Mistress Beata invites you to witness this morning's reaffirmation of Angel One's moral imperative.
TRENT: The Elected One will not look fondly upon
DATA: [OC]
TROI: They're still here!
RIKER: Riker here. Data, I gave you direct orders to get to Neutral Zone immediately. Explain the delay.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: To be precise, Commander, you ordered me to reach the Neutral Zone before it is too late.
ANNOTATION: (Beverly greet the arrivals with an injection)
CRUSHER: Welcome home.
TROI: It's good to be back.
RIKER: Are they recovering?
CRUSHER: Slowly, but yes.
RIKER: And the Captain?
PICARD: (hoarse) The Captain is fine, thank you. Mister Data has been briefing me on the away team's comportment, Number One.
TROI: We improvised, sir.
PICARD: I look forward to your reports.
RIKER: Don't we have a call to pay on the Romulans, Captain?
LAFORGE: Entering standard orbit now.
PICARD: It takes very special people to live in such desolation.
TROI: Visionaries who don't see this planet as it is, but as it will be.
RIKER: I've always wanted to see terraforming in operation.
PICARD: Lieutenant Yar, hailing frequencies.
PICARD: Terraform Command has asked us to see how you were getting along.
MANDL: We were a little behind, but we're back on schedule. I'd like to hope we'd be allowed to maintain that schedule.
TROI: We alarm him for some reason.
PICARD: Your staff is all well, I presume, Director?
MANDL: Understandably tired. We're working very hard, Captain.
MANDL: No disrespect, sir, but we cannot afford the time.
COMPUTER: Channel closed.
TROI: His fear is escalating.
MANDL: If you will excuse me, sir, I really must get back to work.
TROI: I sense deliberate concealment, sir.
PICARD: Of what?
TROI: I don't know, but it's intense.
PICARD: (channel open) Director Mandl, we've heard of your remarkable achievements in terraforming. My crew would very much appreciate looking around.
MANDL: This is not really the best time. We are at a very critical phase just now.
MANDL: I'm trying not to be rude, sir, but this is really very inconvenient.
ANNOTATION: (channel closed)
TROI: He is concealing something. It's more than just being too busy. Your announcement about coming down has sent him almost to a point of panic.
PICARD: Well, whether he wants us or not. (channel open) Director Mandl, unless you're absolutely refusing permission for us to land at your station, prepare to receive our away team.
MANDL: As you wish.
PICARD: Counsellor, perhaps you'd better go along as well.
TROI: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Someone that tense could be very unpredictable. Stay on your toes, Number One.
[now in "Control room"]
ANNOTATION: (The team beam into the Terraforming base control room)
DATA: Theories, reports, but nothing first-hand.
LUISA: Oh, wonderful. Let me show you what we do. Newcomers find this
TROI: The other two are secretive, but she is as open as she appears.
LUISA: What we're doing is so exciting, so inspiring. We take a lifeless planet and little by little transform it into an M class environment, capable of supporting life. Terraforming makes you feel a little god-like. The first phase involves selecting the planet. That's very important. It must have the right mass and gravity, the correct rate of rotation, and a balanced day and night. The planet must also be without life or the prospect of life developing naturally. The Federation determines if that's so. Then, we take over. This station is phase two. Phase Three involves water. Usually we create basins using hydraulic landscaping, but the water on this planet is subsurface, and extremely high in salt content. We are just about to begin pumping and filtering the water, removing the salt, oxygenating and replacing. Next, we introduce micro-organisms, and when the process is complete eventually, we'll have a lush, arable, biosphere.
ANNOTATION: (in 30-35 years according to her display)
ANNOTATION: (Mandl enters)
MANDL: I'm Director Mandl, and I'm sorry about having been so abrupt during our initial contact. Being isolated, one tends to forget the social graces. Are you seeing everything that you want?
TROI: What you're doing here is miraculous.
MANDL: What we are doing here is working a difficult and demanding timetable, and there will be no miracle unless Malencon here gets the hydraulic probes back on line. We are set to step up to full conversion immediately. Shouldn't you be in the hydraulic chamber, Arthur?
MALENCON: Now?
RIKER: Incredible. It's planned month by month, decade by decade?
MANDL: Every single thing is specific and exact. You see grand, romantic concepts. I see unyielding rock under an ocean of sand.
TROI: Commander!
RIKER: What is it, Deanna?
TROI: Malencon. He's in trouble!
MALENCON: Help! Help! Argh!
ANNOTATION: (Screams and bangs. They run to the hydraulics room door)
VOICE: Ugly bags of mostly water, we try at peace. You still do not listen. Bags who drill in sands of home have to die.
RIKER: It killed Malencon.
TROI: We see and hear you now. We didn't know you were there. You are beautiful to us. All life is beautiful.
VOICE: Bag in dome did know. Caused much death. Made us kill. War is now with you.
DATA: The translator is now offline, sir.
PICARD: In time, Mister Data. When we're better prepared.
MANDL: I wanted to create a place where living things could thrive, and all the while I was about to destroy the life that is there.
TROI: Our apologies.
PICARD: And respects. Lieutenant Yar.
YAR: Co-ordinates set, sir.
YAR: What a wonderful fairy tale.
DATA: Scanners still show nothing, sir.
TROI: Scanners may show nothing, sir, but I'm sensing something very strong. Thousands of minds.
PICARD: From where?
TROI: Very close.
PICARD: All stop, and hold this position.
LAFORGE: Aye, sir. All stop, and hold.
RIKER: Now we know who placed the bread crumbs. We're not here by accident.
PICARD: Counsellor, do you sense anything?
TROI: They want something from us, something we value greatly. So much, that they're afraid we won't part with it.
RADUE: We are ready to receive you, Commander Riker, and two of your colleagues?
ANNOTATION: (Riker, Troi and Crusher disappear)
CRUSHER: Yes, Captain, and they're responding very well to the treatment.
PICARD: The legend will die, but the people will live.
TROI: And we know they'll make good parents.
ANNOTATION: (Wesley enters with Alexandra)
PICARD: Wesley!
PICARD: Tell me about him.
RIKER: Able. A good officer.
TROI: How would he react under stress?
RIKER: Paul Rice is confident to the point of arrogance, he but carries it well because he's usually right. He's a risk taker.
PICARD: Really?
PICARD: That's taking a risk.
RIKER: And it paid off. He received the top grade and now that same test has four options.
TROI: In a difficult situation a man like that would act aggressively.
RIKER: Agreed.
WORF: Commander, weren't you offered the Drake?
RIKER: At the time I thought it would be more advantageous for me to do a tour on the Enterprise.
DATA: Captain, readings correspond with the findings of the probe. No signs of intelligent life forms. Vegetation and animal life only.
TROI: What happened to all the people?
WORF: War?
DATA: Disease?
DATA: The planet is Vagra Two, sir, in the Zed Lapis sector. Uninhabited.
PICARD: Lieutenant, report!
TROI: This is Counsellor Troi. I'll relay, sir. The pilot is busy. We've lost most of our impulse power.
PICARD: Engineering, status report.
[now in "Engineering"]
LYNCH: Working on it, Captain. Three minutes.
PICARD: Status report.
WORF: All systems operational, sir.
TROI: Captain, the level of tension on the ship is mounting.
PICARD: Understandable. Mister Data?
DATA: If we are to investigate, sir, we must get closer.
DATA: Not very much, sir. The only recorded contact with the Delos system was over two hundred years ago. A scout ship reported two inhabited planets, one of which was on the verge of acquiring space travel.
LAFORGE: Odd that in two centuries neither civilisation advanced much further.
TROI: Sir, I find it strange that none of our visitors feels much remorse about the two freighter passengers who perished. Yet that barrel of cargo is a source of great anxiety to them.
PICARD: Yes. Let's pay a call, get some answers. Number One, Mister Data. Mister La Forge, you have the Bridge.
LAFORGE: Aye, sir.
PICARD: I knew of him. He was teaching at the University when I was in Paris, but I didn't have the pleasure. I must change. Number One, inform me half an hour before we reach those co-ordinates. Keep trying to determine if the time distortion was specifically located on the Enterprise.
RIKER: Yes, sir.
TROI: Captain? Excuse me.
PICARD: Yes, what is it, Counsellor?
TROI: I think you would prefer to discuss this in private.
PICARD: That's not necessary. Go on.
TROI: When Professor Manheim's name was mentioned, you reacted with intense emotion.
PICARD: Yes. Please get to the point.
TROI: I don't want to interfere with your personal life, but unresolved strong emotion can affect judgement.
PICARD: Well, thank you for your concern.
TROI: As Ship's Counsellor, I offer my assistance.
PICARD: What do you suggest?
TROI: Confronting deep personal issues is not easy for you. You tend to suppress them. There are a few hours until we arrive. Perhaps you should use this time to analyse your feelings and put them into perspective.
PICARD: Thank you, Counsellor. If I should need you further, I'll let you know.
[now in "Turbolift"]
ANNOTATION: (After returning to the gymnasium and cleaning his sword, he gets changed)
LAFORGE: Aye sir. Full impulse.
RIKER: Do you think anyone would object to our arriving ahead of schedule?
TROI: I know I won't. I've been really looking forward to a nice swim.
DATA: You are aware, Counsellor, that the holodeck can be programmed to recreate an oceanic environment.
TROI: Data, it's just not the same. Have you ever been for a real moonlight swim?
DATA: One can swim in moonlight?
TROI: How about you, Mister Worf?
WORF: Swimming is too much like bathing.
DATA: Commander Riker. I am receiving a Code Forty Seven.
RIKER: Verify.
DATA: It is a Code Forty Seven, sir. Starfleet emergency frequency.
TROI: Code Forty Seven. Captain's eyes only.
[now in "Picard's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard is in bed, asleep. That pillow cum bolster looks very uncomfortable)
RIKER: Captain, I'm sorry to disturb you.
RIKER: They seem normal enough.
PICARD: On the surface. Counsellor, any thoughts?
TROI: Hard to say. Someone is hiding something, but I can't tell who or what.
RIKER: I must say I'm not overjoyed to see Remmick again.
LAFORGE: Considering what we've done, their response has been pretty temperate.
RIKER: Baby? This is a surprise.
ANNOTATION: (Deanna is sitting alone at the end, somewhat embarrassed)
TROI: More so for me.
PULASKI: This pregnancy is unlike anything I have ever encountered. Since she came to me a few hours ago, I have done two complete examinations of Counsellor Troi. (goes to wall screen) This is from the first examination. The foetus is about halfway through the first trimester, about six weeks old. Now, understand we believe conception took place eleven hours ago.
RIKER: What?
PULASKI: It gets better. This is the second exam one hour later. Now, it's consistent, except for the fact that it appears the foetus is several weeks older. At this growth rate, Counsellor Troi will have her baby in about thirty six hours. The normal gestation rate for a Betazoid is ten months.
RIKER: I don't mean to be indelicate, but who's the father?
TROI: Last night, while I slept, something which I can only describe as a presence, entered my body.
PICARD: A life form of unknown origin and intent is breeding right now inside Counsellor Troi. Our purpose here is to determine what is to be done about this very unusual situation. Discussion.
RIKER: No, wait. Let me get this straight. Deanna was impregnated by by what? Doctor, what do the tests show? Is it a humanoid? An alien?
WORF: If the foetus is aborted, laboratory analysis is still possible.
RIKER: Doctor, is there any health risk to Counsellor Troi if the foetus is aborted?
TROI: Captain, do whatever you feel is necessary to protect the ship and the crew, but know this. I'm going to have this baby.
PICARD: Then it seems that the discussion is over.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. We have finally arrived at 'audet Nine, where we will pick up the specimens of plasma plague for transport to Rachelis. It is only because so many lives are at stake that I am willing to put this ship and crew at such great risk. Meanwhile, Counsellor Troi's pregnancy continues to progress at an astonishing rate.
DATA: Aye, sir.
[now in "Corridor"]
TROI: Data, will you help me get to Sickbay.
[now in "Pulaski's office"]
TROI: It's time.
PULASKI: Oh, you bet it is. Let's get you to Maternity.
DATA: Worf, assemble your security team in Sickbay.
PULASKI: Well, it's strange to need armed guards in a delivery room. This way.
[now in "Sickbay"]
PULASKI: How frequent are your contractions?
TROI: Very close together.
PULASKI: In my other deliveries, except for a couple, the father was always present.
TROI: Difficult under the circumstances.
DATA: Perhaps I could serve in that capacity.
PULASKI: Counsellor Troi is going to need the comfort of a human touch, not the cold hand of technology.
TROI: Doctor, I think Commander Data will do very nicely.
PULASKI: Your choice.
ANNOTATION: (A little later, Deanna is in the birthing chair, almost upright)
TROI: You don't have to do anything, Data. Just be with me.
PULASKI: There is nothing to be nervous about.
DATA: Nervous? I find this very interesting. Although I understand, in technical terms, how life is formed, there is still a part of the process which eludes me. The child inside you, are you able to access his thought process? Does he have thoughts? You are aware of him. Is he aware of you? And when does that awareness begin?
TROI: It's happening.
DATA: How does it feel?
TROI: Data!
DATA: Yes?
TROI: Now!
DATA: Now? Now! Doctor! Doctor! Doctor!
PULASKI: This is an impatient baby. He's eager to make his appearance. Do you want something for the pain? It will in no way diminish the experience.
TROI: I have felt no pain.
PULASKI: None?
TROI: No, none at all.
ANNOTATION: (Worf and two guards enter)
PULASKI: Have your Security men stand back. I understand the importance of having you here, but keep out from underfoot. Foetal position?
ANNOTATION: (Baby crying)
PULASKI: (cleaning him off) There, there. That's a good boy. It's okay. Oh, my, he's beautiful. (hands him to Troi) Are easy births the norm for Betazoids?
TROI: Not according to my mother.
PULASKI: (to Worf) You can come in the rest of the way now. There's no threat, Lieutenant. You and your men can relax. It's just a baby.
ANNOTATION: (Worf looks and leaves)
DATA: Thank you for allowing me to participate. It was remarkable.
PULASKI: Do you have a name?
TROI: Ian Andrew, after my father.
ANNOTATION: (Riker comes forward)
TROI: Were you hear all along?
RIKER: Yes. He's beautiful, Deanna. Just like his mother.
PULASKI: How do you feel?
TROI: Fine. Wonderful. Thank you, Doctor, for everything.
PULASKI: Amazing.
[now in "Bridge"]
PULASKI: Captain.
ANNOTATION: (It's Ian's bed time)
IAN: I can feel that some of the people are very worried.
TROI: Yes. I feel it too, but don't you worry.
IAN: It's me, Mommy. I'm the reason.
TROI: What?
IAN: It's me.
TROI: You?
IAN: Yes. I have to leave you now, or it'll be very bad for everyone.
TROI: What are you saying?
IAN: I have to leave now.
TROI: Leave? You are going to die. No, you can't! Sickbay, this is Counsellor Troi, I need the Doctor in my quarters now! Ian! Ian, no. Ian.
ANNOTATION: (Pulaski arrives with Data and Riker)
TROI: It's Ian. Hurry.
PULASKI: What happened? Did he eat anything? Did he fall?
TROI: No.
DATA: Commander, the child is the source of the unusual radiation.
TROI: Ian said he's the reason the ship is in danger.
DATA: That analysis is correct.
PULASKI: I'm losing life signs.
TROI: You must save him.
PULASKI: I'm sorry.
ANNOTATION: (As Troi weeps by the bed, Ian turns into a ball of light which she can hold in her hands. She calms and smiles, then it flies out into space)
LAFORGE: Commander Riker, the containment field has stabilised.
RIKER: Thank you, Lieutenant.
TROI: Then Ian was right. He was the cause.
RIKER: Apparently so.
TROI: He is a life force entity. When we passed each other in space, he was curious about us, so he decided the best way to learn was to go through the process. To be born, to live as one of us and in that way to understand us. He never meant any harm.
RIKER: There was a moment when you smiled.
TROI: He said, thank you. I told him we will miss him. And I will.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (approaching a space station)
PICARD: Standard station orbit, Mister Crusher.
WESLEY: Captain, if this were any ordinary kind of hole in space wouldn't we be able to see what's behind it?
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: I know what you're asking, but I feel nothing from it.
RIKER: Data, is there any record anywhere of any occurrence even vaguely similar to this?
DATA: Accessing. Negative, sir. There is no record of any Federation vessel encountering anything remotely like this.
RIKER: This game is now wearing very thin.
PICARD: Let's just hold this position. Counsellor? You have said you sensed no intelligence in all of this. You haven't changed in that belief?
TROI: I'm not certain of that now, Captain. I do sense something unusual.
PICARD: Perhaps a different level of consciousness?
TROI: Yes. Perhaps an intelligence so vast it eluded me.
PULASKI: Rats in a maze.
TROI: Exactly!
PICARD: Explain.
PULASKI: Everything we've been through reminds me of a laboratory experiment. As if something was testing our responses to stimuli.
PICARD: I've had enough of being led about this way.
RIKER: Agreed, Captain. Hold present position.
TROI: Good. Don't satisfy its curiosity.
ANNOTATION: (A face appears in the void)
WORF: Captain, look.
NAGILUM: To understand death, I must amass information on every aspect of it. Every kind of dying. The experiments shouldn't take more than a third of your crew, maybe half.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, Stardate 42194.7. It is obvious that whatever we have met sees no value in our kind of life form. How do we fight something that both is and is not there?
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: I know this much. We are unimportant to it.
WORF: In a battle for survival, Captain, thirty to fifty percent casualties
PULASKI: Would be appalling.
WORF: But within acceptable limits.
RIKER: This is not a battle, Worf.
TROI: No. A laboratory experiment would be the closest comparison.
PICARD: Is there any reason for not believing this Nagilum?
TROI: No.
DATA: All evidence indicates it is willing and able to do what it proposes.
PICARD: Agreed. Under the circumstances, I think there is only one decision. I will not stand by while half of my crew is slaughtered.
PICARD: Come.
ANNOTATION: (Troi enters)
TROI: Our destroying ourselves won't change its mind, Captain. I would feel that.
PICARD: You didn't mention you were that certain.
TROI: I was wrong not to tell you, Captain. And your decision may also be wrong.
ANNOTATION: (Door bell)
PICARD: Yes. Come in, please.
DATA: Which do you believe, sir?
PICARD: Considering the marvellous complexity of our universe, its clockwork perfection, its balances of this against that, matter, energy, gravitation, time, dimension, I believe that our existence must be more than either of these philosophies. That what we are goes beyond Euclidian and other practical measuring systems and that our existence is part of a reality beyond what we understand now as reality.
TROI: We should not let ourselves die, Jean-Luc.
DATA: I agree with her, Jean-Luc.
TROI: If only half of us live, then I'd rather take my chances on being one that does.
DATA: Yes. It is wrong of you to force us.
TROI: It is wrong.
PICARD: Yes. This is very wrong. Neither of you should be reacting in this way. Computer, locate Commander Data for me.
COMPUTER: Commander Data is on the Bridge.
DATA: All navigational systems confirm we are at warp six on course, sir.
PICARD: Counsellor Troi?
TROI: Captain, it has gone. I no longer feel its presence.
COMPUTER: Twenty seconds to auto-destruct. Ten seconds to auto-destruct.
RIKER: Captain.
PICARD: Doctor Pulaski?
RIKER: The particle beam will tear apart human flesh as well.
TROI: Captain, I'm sensing something from the holodeck. It's as if a unifying force or a single consciousness is trying to bring it all into focus.
DATA: There can be only one explanation. In programming Moriarty to defeat me, not Holmes, he had to be able to acquire something which I possess.
PICARD: Exactly what?
OKONA: I'm the owner and operator of this craft and since we both know that you've already scanned it, you know I'm alone and empty, which is truly a rare occasion for a man of my charm and talent.
PICARD: Mute main viewer. Counsellor?
TROI: His emotions suggest that he's mischievous, irreverent and somewhat brazen. The word that seems to best describe him is rogue.
DATA: Rogue? Ah. Cad, knave, rake, rascal, villain, wild element.
TROI: Yes, Data, but there is no malevolence or ill will.
PICARD: Audio on. You have a burn-out in your guidance system, Captain.
OKONA: Whoa. Since you're able to diagnose my problems, how about helping me fix them?
WORF: Mute.
PICARD: What do you think, Counsellor?
TROI: He believes what he's saying. His anger is genuine.
PICARD: Open. What crimes are you referring to?
DEBIN: Neither important nor necessary. I want Okona now!
LAFORGE: Data?
DATA: Geordi? Is Counsellor Troi with you?
TROI: Yes, I'm here, Data. Geordi said you wanted to see us.
DATA: Indeed. Or, stated more correctly, I wanted you to see me.
LAFORGE: Can we come in?
LAFORGE: Did you damage your face, Data?
DATA: It is a beard, Geordi. A fine, full, dignified beard. One which commands respect and projects thoughtfulness and dignity. Well? Opinions?
TROI: It's er, very different.
DATA: When I stroke the beard thusly, do I not appear more intellectual?
TROI: I'm sorry, I have to go now. Goodbye.
ANNOTATION: (Troi leaves, quickly, laughing)
DATA: Why was she laughing?
TROI: Now wait a minute. I don't understand
[now in "Living room"]
RIKER: You do now.
TROI: This might sound crazy, but for a moment I thought I was stuck in that wall.
WORF: For a moment, you were.
DATA: Data to Enterprise.
WORF: No need, Commander.
KAREEN: You heard me. Thank God. I'm Kareen Brianon, Doctor Graves' assistant.
TROI: We're from a ship called the Enterprise. We monitored your distress call but then you never acknowledged our response.
KAREEN: I'm sorry, I couldn't take the chance.
TROI: Chance? What chance?
ANNOTATION: (A door opens and a crotchety old man enters)
GRAVES: The chance that I might find out someone was coming. Kareen knew full well that I would not be pleased, to put it mildly.
SELAR: I am a doctor. Lieutenant Selar.
GRAVES: No offense, but I don't want you touching me in any way. It's no secret that I don't like people much, and I like doctors even less.
TROI: That's funny, I thought most doctors were people.
GRAVES: Then you're wrong. Ask any patient. Although I will admit, for a doctor you're not a bad looking woman. Well, well, well, what have we got here? Another lovely specimen of womanhood.
TROI: I thought you didn't like people.
GRAVES: Women aren't people. They're women. (he kisses her hand)
TROI: I'm Deanna Troi. It's an honour to meet you, Doctor Graves.
GRAVES: Yes, of course it is. This is one of the truly great moments of your life.
KAREEN: Excuse me, sir. Are you a Romulan?
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
RIKER: Do you know what that was all about?
TROI: Jealousy. Intense, burning jealousy. A human emotion, and it was coming from Data.
[now in "Ready room"]
ANNOTATION: (Data is preening himself in the reflection in the window)
DATA: If you wish to apologise, I am prepared to listen.
PICARD: You will wait for me in the corridor. (Data leaves) His insubordination is growing by leaps and bounds. I could use discipline, but I'd rather try and help him.
LAFORGE: I wish I knew what to suggest. I'm damned if I can find a thing wrong with him.
TROI: Perhaps we're looking in the wrong place.
PICARD: Meaning?
TROI: Well, if Data's physical health is unimpaired, perhaps his mental health needs to be addressed.
LAFORGE: What, are you saying that Data is losing his mind?
TROI: With your permission, Captain, there is one way to find out.
[now in "Data's quarters"]
TROI: Now, Data, you remember the psychotronic stability examination. We all had to take it before graduating from the Academy.
DATA: It was a waste of time then and it is a waste of time now.
TROI: It will just gauge your psychological reactions to the images it projects. Watch the screen and let your mind go blank. The device will do the rest.
ANNOTATION: (She puts cortical monitors on his forehead and a series of images flashes on a screen, including a waterfall, Kareen, fire, Graves, Tasha, Kareen again, Picard and other crew members. They get faster and he gets more tense)
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: It's safe to say that you're his best friend. Is it possible to speculate about what's happening to him?
WOMAN: Thank you.
ADONIS: Perhaps, if it is not inconvenient, Counsellor Troi could escort me. With your permission.
TROI: This way.
ANNOTATION: (Troi leaves with Riva and the Adonis)
RIKER: What about you?
RIKER: A total surprise. Apparently a member of one of the factions didn't like the idea of peace.
PICARD: I don't understand what you're trying to say. Counsellor?
TROI: Riva, go slowly. Slowly.
PICARD: Can you write it out? I am so sorry that your friends were killed. I'm sorry, I don't know what you are trying to tell me. We have to find some way to communicate with him. Data, he knows some kind of gestural language. Find our which one and learn it.
DATA: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Pulaski enter)
PICARD: How's our mediator.
TROI: The same. He's withdrawn. He's very frightened. All of his life he's been in control, and now for the first time he doesn't have any answers. The doctor gave him a complete medical examination.
PULASKI: His condition is hereditary. His brain cannot receive auditory information. So all the prosthetics and surgical techniques I can use wouldn't work.
TROI: I don't know what we can do to help him.
PULASKI: I can't do anything.
TROI: It's up to him, and he's stopped cooperating.
PICARD: Counsellor, couldn't you?
TROI: Confidence is faith in oneself. It can't easily be given by another.
PICARD: You're right, of course. (doorbell) Come.
ANNOTATION: (Data enters)
PICARD: We have been contacted by the factions on Solais. They want to renew negotiations.
DATA: I cannot. I will not.
TROI: Don't turn away. You have a chance to make some good come out of this tragedy. This could be the catalyst which binds them together.
DATA: Someone else will have to speak with them, not me. Not after what I allowed to happen/ How could I?
PICARD: But Data can understand you. Use him. Let him explain your words.
DATA: When Data speaks for me, can you hear my anguish, my despair? Data is a fine machine, but he cannot take the place of my chorus. It took years to develop a communication. That cannot be easily replaced.
TROI: The Solari need you.
DATA: I cannot help them. Captain, please take me back to Ramatis.
PICARD: That is regrettable. A lot more people are going to die.
LAFORGE: Well, this is a lot to think about. I'll get back to you, Doctor. Thank you.
[now in "Guest quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Data enter. Data speaks for Riva)
TROI: The Captain is going to take you to Ramatis. But first, he's given me permission to attempt to settle the conflict down on Solais. Yes. We've come so far, and paid such a terrible price, I must try. Help me.
DATA: You would be better off without my help.
TROI: I have never attempted anything like this before. When dealing with two factions so diametrically opposed, so entrenched in their positions, where do you start?
DATA: You want to know if I had some special technique?
TROI: I want to know anything you can tell me that could help.
DATA: There is no trick. I had no magic.
TROI: What about your Chorus?
DATA: Yes, my Chorus was special. They allowed me to combine different perceptions.
TROI: So there was a trick.
DATA: Not really. My technique was to look for some thing, no matter how small, that was common to both groups, and then to begin a process where one person or one group expresses themselves to each other.
TROI: That's very hard to accomplish.
DATA: Yes, but what is even more difficult is to get each side to listen, really listen to each other, and to understand.
TROI: This isn't going to be easy for me.
DATA: You are very good with people.
TROI: But what I do is different.
DATA: The real secret is turning disadvantage to advantage.
TROI: Why can't you do that? Why can't you turn your disadvantage into an advantage?
DATA: That is an interesting. It would give them something in common. (to Troi) I do not understand, Counsellor. To what is he referring?
ANNOTATION: (Riva kisses Troi on the cheek, and thanks Data)
DATA: You may leave whenever you choose. I will send out a message when I am ready to go.
RIKER: Deanna, I don't understand what he's going to do. How can he mediate without his interpreters? He won't even be able to talk to them.
TROI: Riva is going to teach them sign language.
DATA: Yes, it is turning a disadvantage into an advantage. Learning sign will be a part of their process of learning how to live together in peace.
TROI: While they are learning how to communicate with Riva, they'll be learning how to communicate with each other.
DATA: And that is the first and most important aspect of any relationship. Counsellor, it took me only moments to learn sign language. It will take them months.
TROI: Time well spent.
DATA: These people have been fighting all of their lives. They know only hatred, suspicion, and fear. Even with my Chorus, I could not have changed their attitudes in a day. We have a chance. They want the talks to be successful.
RIKER: I'm still not comfortable leaving you here alone.
PICARD: Come.
ANNOTATION: (Troi enters)
TROI: You wanted to see me, Captain?
PICARD: Yes, Counsellor. Come, sit down. Counsellor, you've had the opportunity to observe Doctor Pulaski for some time now. How would you evaluate her as a Chief Medical Officer?
TROI: I've never met a more dedicated physician. I would say she has a passion for her work.
PICARD: Yes, of course. I entirely agree. Is it possible that such consuming dedication could interfere with her judgement?
TROI: I feel your concern, Captain, but I don't share it. Perhaps because I've had the opportunity to spend more time with her and get to know her better.
PICARD: Yes, perhaps you're right.
DATA: Captain, we are picking up a faint distress signal on an open subspace frequency. It appears to be coming from an adjacent sector.
DATA: No life signs, Captain.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: Nothing, Captain.
RIKER: What else have we got in the neighbourhood?
WESLEY: No other vessels of any kind within two parsecs.
ANNOTATION: (The planet on the viewscreen is a pale mustard colour)
PICARD: Magnify, Mister Worf. Hardly an inviting planet, even for a research establishment.
TROI: I would have thought the inhabitants of Daled Four would send a future leader to a more hospitable environment.
WORF: For some, security is more important than comfort.
TROI: Yes, but sixteen years.
WORF: Captain, we're being hailed.
PICARD: Hailing frequencies, Mister Worf.
SALIA: Thank you for checking on us, Captain. I only hope our quarters on Daled Four will be this luxurious.
PICARD: Please feel free to contact me at any time. Picard out.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: What I sensed before hasn't changed.
DATA: What puzzles me, Captain, is how she is expected to bring peace to Daled Four. Its inhabitants have been fighting throughout their recorded history.
PICARD: What do we know about the cause of these wars?
WORF: Mute.
PICARD: Comments.
TROI: She's extremely anxious.
WORF: Understandable if she just destroyed a Federation starship.
RIKER: Your scan was inconclusive. We don't know what happened to the Yamato.
TROI: Our presence in the Neutral Zone is provocative. It could force her to respond.
WORF: Open.
PICARD: We will comply when I have determined the cause of the destruction of the Yamato, and when I am fully satisfied that you were not responsible. Picard out.
PICARD: Pull any personnel you can use.
ANNOTATION: (The men leave)
TROI: If we have established that the Romulans were not responsible for the destruction of the Yamato, would it not be prudent to withdraw?
PICARD: If it is a design flaw, we're better to stay where we are and give Geordi time to work on it. Or what happened to the Yamato could happen to us.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Computer, access Captain Donald Varley's personal log. Search parameter. Locate entries containing words Romulan and or Iconia.
PICARD: No, no. No Earth ship of that time could have travelled out this far.
DATA: Nevertheless, that is what our tests indicate. And the markings we discovered are consistent with this hypothesis.
TROI: Any indication of what destroyed it, Data?
DATA: That is even more significant than the object itself, Counsellor. On several of its surfaces, the molecules seem to have disintegrated
RIKER: Disintegrated? How?
ANNOTATION: (The second Picard is wheeled away)
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: I have never felt anything quite like this before, so it's difficult to put into words. That person is you.
PICARD: No.
TROI: He is as much Jean-Luc Picard as the person I am standing next to. Beyond that, there is very little I can be sure of. I will have to wait until he regains consciousness before knowing more.
PICARD: Data, I need to know what's on the shuttle's logs.
DATA: Yes, sir.
PICARD: Transfer Engine control to the Bridge.
LAFORGE: On my way, Captain.
TROI: Captain, there is a consciousness here. Not thought, more like instinct.
PICARD: What do you think, Number One?
RIKER: I think we're being probed.
DATA: The beam is coming from the centre of the vortex. Sensors show it to be only a mass of energy.
PICARD: What is it trying to learn?
TROI: I think it's trying to determine if we are a life force.
PICARD: We'll stay and investigate.
RIKER: Agreed.
RIKER: I think that's an option we should be considering.
LAFORGE: Consider it considered, and rejected.
TROI: If there is a cosmic plan, are we not a part of it? Our presence at this place at this moment in time could be a part of that fate.
LAFORGE: Right, and it could be part of that plan that we interfere.
RIKER: Well that eliminates the possibility of fate.
PICARD: Mister Data, kindly assume your station. Counsellor, will you escort her to Sickbay.
SARJENKA: No, Data, no. I'm scared. Don't make me go.
TROI: It's all right, no one's going to hurt you.
SARJENKA: No!
TROI: We'll just go and get a treat, and then
SARJENKA: No.
DATA: Captain, I will see to it that she is not in the way.
WORF: One minute to launch.
TROI: Come on, it'll be all right.
SARJENKA: No. Just leave me alone. I want Data.
DATA: Counsellor, allow me. Please. Sarjenka, no one will harm you. These are my friends.
LAFORGE: I think I'll go check out Engineering.
SONYA: I'll go with you.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Where's the Captain?
RIKER: In his quarters?
TROI: Captain, this is Counsellor Troi.
RIKER: Computer locate Captain Picard.
COMPUTER: The Captain is not on the ship.
BORG: (many voices speaking as one) We have analysed your defensive capabilities as being unable to withstand us. If you defend yourselves, you will be punished.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: We're not dealing with an individual mind. They don't have a single leader. It's the collective minds of all of them.
PICARD: That would have definite advantages.
TROI: Yes, A single leader can make mistakes. It's far less likely in the combined whole.
Q: Picard. Picard, are you sure you don't want me as a member of your crew?
WORF: Captain, the Borg have locked on to us with some form of tractor beam.
REGINOD: He is smart.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (The Bridge crew are watching everything on the viewscreen)
TROI: Commander? Lieutenant La Forge is on an alien ship?
RIKER: Yes. We're rendering assistance to some curious throwbacks.
DATA: How they ever mastered the rudiments of space travel is a genuine curiosity.
TROI: Commander. Those aliens. What they feel is not helplessness. Lieutenant La Forge is in great danger! He's in danger, great danger.
RIKER: Can you be more specific, Counsellor?
TROI: It's not our help they want.
RIKER: Well, our help is all they're going to get. They can't force us into anything, can they?
TROI: You think they're weak.
RIKER: Look at them. They're certainly not Jarada or Romulans.
DATA: Our Betazoid Counsellor is often aware of things beyond our perceptive abilities.
WESLEY: But Starfleet Academy
PICARD: It takes more. Open your mind to the past. Art, history, philosophy. And all this may mean something.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: It's all deception. Nothing the Pakleds have said or done has been sincere.
DATA: Intensified scan shows their guidance system to be perfectly intact, as is their power generator.
RIKER: Then what was Geordi repairing?
DATA: They seem to have made some technological leaps forward, Commander.
RIKER: Why would they go through the charade of needing our help?
TROI: For the sole purpose of making Lieutenant La Forge their prisoner. Captain's personal log, stardate 42779.5. We have arrived at Starbase Five One Five. I'm still quite uneasy, despite assurances that this medical procedure poses little risk.
[now in "Starbase 515 Medical Complex"]
PICARD: I hope you won't be late for your exams.
WESLEY: I still have some time, sir.
SURGEON: This will be a secondary cardiac procedure with mid-line entry and excision of the early model unit. I anticipate no complications, as the patient has had positive primary results and exhibits extraordinary physical condition. We'll all be home in time for dinner. Tissue mitigator.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
DATA: There's limited information available on Pakled culture, but the eclectic range of their equipment suggests their technology was borrowed from others.
TROI: And now they have become militant.
DATA: So it would seem.
RIKER: Rationale?
TROI: They are unwilling to wait for the timely evolution of their species' intellectual capacity. They want instant knowledge, instant power and gratification.
PULASKI: The more they get, the more they want.
RIKER: And the more aggressive and dangerous they become. I think it's time we set some limits.
PULASKI: But how?
RIKER: Perhaps Geordi should give them something they want. Something important. Then we simply create the right moment for him to take it away, and get him the hell out of there.
TROI: Would you be suggesting a ruse of some sort?
RIKER: I would.
PULASKI: But what if we fail? What'll happen to Geordi then?
PULASKI: Do you think he understands?
RIKER: He'd better.
TROI: He's afraid.
RIKER: We all are, Counsellor.
[now in "Pakled ship"]
GREBNEDLOG: You are smart.
WORF: Starbase requests we proceed to base at warp nine
PULASKI: We've got to go.
TROI: Yes. the Captain needs our help.
RIKER: We can't leave Geordi behind. I want the Pakleds on that screen and I want them now.
DATA: Forced spectrum communications are spotty at best, sir.
DATA: The stellar flares are increasing in magnitude and frequency. Computer projections indicate they will brush the planet in three point six hours.
WORF: Evacuation will be difficult. We can lower our shields for transport only between the flares.
TROI: Captain, these people have been isolated for three hundred years. They could be very unsophisticated. The shock of suddenly being transported onto a spaceship could frighten them, to say the least.
PICARD: Your point is well taken, Counsellor. Number One, you're going to have to go down there.
RIKER: On my way.
GRANGER: Splendid. Please, come down, and allow us to extend our hospitality to you and your crew.
PICARD: Thank you. Form an away team, Number One.
TROI: I would urge caution.
RIKER: Caution? What's wrong?
TROI: He's hiding something.
RIKER: We'll check it out. Mister Worf. Doctor Pulaski, join us in Transporter room three for an away detail.
[now in "Reception"]
ANNOTATION: (a very modern looking building, and clothing style)
PICARD: Your point is well taken, Mister Data. I'm sure that to the Antedeans, we are equally unattractive.
WORF: Captain, we are being hailed by a small transport vessel, just coming into range.
TROI: Oh, my God.
PICARD: What's the problem?
TROI: What's she doing here?
WESLEY: On screen, Captain.
PILOT: Starship Enterprise, come in.
PILOT: Enterprise, I have a passenger. A VIP passenger who I'm ordered to
LWAXANA: Oh, let me talk to them. I'm sure I'm more articulate than that.
TROI: Mother.
DATA: Captain, we are receiving Starfleet orders granting a Lwaxana
LWAXANA: Lwaxana Troi, daughter of the Fifth House, Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx, Heir to the Holy Rings of Betazed.
RIKER: It looks like it's back into that dress uniform, sir.
DATA: And yours as well, Commander. She is listed as representing the Betazed government at the conference.
TROI: Mother, please, don't do this to me.
LWAXANA: Do what to you, Little One? Oh, Jean-Luc. What naughty thoughts. But how wonderful you still think of me like that.
[now in "Transporter room"]
TROI: It's so like my mother to do the unexpected.
ANNOTATION: (Deanna enters)
LWAXANA: Deanna, darling. Thank the Four Deities you're here.
TROI: I hope I'm not interrupting.
PICARD: No, I must, as a matter of fact, be getting back to the Bridge.
DATA: Captain. Perhaps I should remain and further entertain our guest.
RIKER: Us?
LWAXANA: You don't mind if I let our ship's crew know first, do you, William? Friends. Dear friends. You are all invited to a prestigious occasion on the planet Pacifica.
TROI: No.
LWAXANA: There, on the shores of the Western Sea, in a traditional Betazoid ceremony, your Commander Riker and I will be joined in the union of matrimony.
WESLEY: Married?
LWAXANA: I know how you feel, dear. You're overwhelmed with excitement. Believe me, I understand. We'll talk about the details later. Right now, there are preparations to be made.
ANNOTATION: (Lwaxana and Homn leave)
TROI: Why did you stop me? Someone needs to set her straight!
RIKER: I think I'll leave that to the Captain.
TROI: Coward.
DATA: Commander. Are you planning on going into the holodeck?
RIKER: I thought I might. Would you like to join me?
RIKER: Why us? Wouldn't a Klingon ship be a better choice?
KEHLEYR: A Klingon ship, the P'rang, is on its way, but it's two days behind us. That may be too late.
TROI: Why too late?
RIKER: When the T'Ong crew awakens it will be within striking range of several Federation outposts.
DATA: There are thirteen colonies with minimal defences in that sector.
KEHLEYR: Nice, ripe targets for a Klingon warship.
TROI: And you believe you can convince these Klingons that the humans are now their allies?
KEHLEYR: No, not a chance. If you ask me, talking will be a waste of time. Klingons of that era were raised to despise humans. We'll try diplomacy. But I promise you it won't work. And then you'll have to destroy them.
PICARD: No.
KEHLEYR: No. Captain, these Klingons are killers. You'll have no choice.
PICARD: We shall find another choice. I want options and I want them before we encounter the Klingon ship. Lieutenant, I'm assigning you to help the Emissary. Dismissed.
TROI: I will escort you to the guest quarters.
KEHLEYR: Captain.
ANNOTATION: (All leave except Picard and Worf)
LAFORGE: We can beam an away team onto the T'Ong and override the cryogenic controls, sure.
KEHLEYR: Then we await the arrival of the Klingon ship P'rang.
TROI: So that when the T'Ong's crew awakens, they're surrounded by their fellow Klingons.
RIKER: That would be ideal.
KEHLEYR: But there's the second possibility. That the crew of the T'Ong has already revived.
LAFORGE: They realise they're in Federation territory and attack the nearest outpost.
TROI: They could have been on a scientific voyage.
KEHLEYR: Klingons of that ear doing research for its own sake?
RIKER: The point is, they may be reasonable.
DATA: Doctor, there are other ways to challenge oneself.
PULASKI: Perhaps, but they all lack a certain thrill.
TROI: Data, humans sometimes find it helpful to have an outsider set the standard by which they're judged.
DATA: To avoid deceiving oneself.
PULASKI: Maybe you should challenge Kolrami to Strategema.
WORF: Computer. Actuation positions for Strategema. Ready? Begin.
LAFORGE: Come on, Commander, come on now.
TROI: Will.
LAFORGE: You can do it. You can get him. Come on, Commander. Come on, you got him, you got him, watch out. Here you go.
ANNOTATION: (And the score at the top of the board reads - Riker 023, Kolrami 100)
ANNOTATION: (The two contestants are being set up like before)
DATA: In the present context, what did she mean by bust him up?
TROI: In her own way, Doctor Pulaski was instructing you to take the shortest route to victory.
DATA: As opposed to what?
BURKE: Ready? Begin.
ANNOTATION: (General babble of delight as Data seems to keep pace with Kolrami, right up to when he lost 081 to 100)
PULASKI: I can't believe it. The computer beaten by flesh and blood.
TROI: You advanced quite far against such a worthy opponent.
KOLRAMI: Thoroughly enjoyable, Mister Data. I am at your disposal for a rematch.
DATA: Thank you, but what would be the point?
PICARD: The test is if a crew will follow where Commander Riker leads. His joviality is the means by which he creates that loyalty. And I will match his command style with your statistics any time.
[now in "Data's quarters"]
DATA: Come in, please.
TROI: Data.
DATA: Counsellor. Is something wrong?
TROI: That was going to be my question.
DATA: With my repository of knowledge, I expected to perform better against a humanoid life form.
TROI: You know, some of our greatest advances have come from analysing failure. While it can be ego-bruising
DATA: But Counsellor, I do not have an ego.
TROI: Yes. Well, a loss can be disheartening.
DATA: But Counsellor, I do not have a
TROI: Data. You can handle defeat in two ways. You can lose confidence, or you can learn from your mistakes.
DATA: That is what troubles me. I made no mistakes. I have conducted a diagnostic check of all of my programs. I am cross-checking with the ship's computer.
TROI: Is that all necessary?
DATA: I believe so. I have proven to be vulnerable. At the present time, my deductions should be treated with scepticism.
TROI: That is why you haven't been on the Bridge.
DATA: Yes. The Captain would be ill advised to rely upon my judgement.
TROI: I think you're really over-reacting. I'm sure you're all right.
DATA: I, however, am not sure.
[now in "Hathaway Engineering"]
ANNOTATION: (Wesley's experiment id bring put into the a wall panel)
PICARD: And Data, will you leave your hesitation and self-doubt here in your quarters.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
DATA: I have several examples of Commander Riker's battle technique. At the Academy, he calculated a sensory blind spot on a Tholian vessel and hid within it during a battle simulation. And as a lieutenant aboard the Potemkin, his solution to a crisis was to shut down all power, and hang over a planet's magnetic poles, thus confusing his opponent's sensors.
TROI: And from these specifics, what general conclusion can you extrapolate?
DATA: Only twenty-one percent of the time does he rely upon traditional tactics. So, the Captain must be prepared for unusual cunning. Counsellor, Commander Riker will assume we have made this analysis, and knowing that we know his methods, he will alter them. But, knowing that we know that he knows that we know, he might choose to return to his usual pattern.
TROI: Wait, wait. You're over-analysing, Data. One cannot deny human nature. What kind of a man is Commander Riker?
DATA: A fighter?
TROI: Yes.
DATA: The weaker his position, the more aggressive will be his posture.
TROI: And he won't give up.
DATA: Then despite whatever options he is given, he must be
TROI: The man that he is. Exactly.
DATA: Is that a failing in humans?
TROI: You'll have to decide that for yourself.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: On screen. The hunt begins, Number One.
RIKER: We're ready. Just remember, Enterprise. Captain Riker has never lost.
ANNOTATION: (The apparatus is removed from Riker's head and he wakes properly)
RIKER: You're still here?
TROI: I could ask you the same question.
PULASKI: How do you feel?
RIKER: Beat. You wouldn't believe the dreams I was having.
TROI: Oh yes we would.
PULASKI: You'll be pleased to know that we've terminated the infection.
RIKER: Great work, Doctor. Now, if I can get out of here, I'd like to get back
RIKER: That's hard to accept.
DATA: The system automatically provides for self-correction, Captain. There has not been a systems-wide technological failure on a starship in seventy nine years.
TROI: Excuse me, Captain, but Doctor Stubbs is waiting outside.
ANNOTATION: (Stubbs has walked in)
STUBBS: Captain, I'm sure you have everything under control. I'd just like to know what's going on.
STUBBS: I would rather die than leave.
PICARD: I don't believe you speak for the majority of the crew.
TROI: Doctor Stubbs, I know how much this means to you.
STUBBS: My dear Counsellor, no insult intended but please turn off your beam into my soul. I will share the feelings I wish to share. Well, if we do not leave in time, so be it. It's one sure way into the record books, eh?
ANNOTATION: (Stubbs leaves, hands in pockets)
TROI: His nonchalance is studied and practised.
PICARD: Even my sensory perception picked that up.
TROI: He's put his entire self-worth on the line with this experiment. He is telling the truth when he says he'd rather die than leave.
[now in "Engineering"]
LAFORGE: Call up the cross-section of computer core processor four five one. I want to see elements zero two hundred through zero three hundred.
CREWMAN: Aye, sir.
RIKER: Open a frequency to Colony Operations.
DATA: No response. Rana Four is emissions quiet.
TROI: Captain, there are eleven thousand inhabitants in this colony. At this range, I should be sensing something. I'm not.
PICARD: Mister Data, put the planet on the main viewer. Magnify.
ANNOTATION: (a scene of bare devastation)
DATA: Sensors are scanning ninety degrees of longitude as we orbit. I am detecting no bodies of water, no vegetation, no artificial structures.
WORF: Life form readings are negative.
TROI: Could the colonists have escaped?
DATA: That is highly unlikely. Rana Four possessed no interstellar spacecraft.
RIKER: Who would cause devastation on that order?
LAFORGE: A hologram generator. Oh, a duck blind. Right. They're anthropologists.
PICARD: Who are studying an extended family of Mintakans at close range from a camouflaged observation post.
TROI: According to Doctor Barron's preliminary reports, the Mintakans are proto-Vulcan humanoids at the Bronze Age level. Quite peaceful and highly rational.
PICARD: Which is not surprising, considering how closely their evolution parallels Vulcan.
WORF: Captain, incoming transmission from Mintaka Three.
DATA: Correct, sir.
CRUSHER: Captain, if he is still alive, he needs medical attention. We must send an away team to locate him.
TROI: But our presence must not interfere with the cultural development of the Mintakans.
PICARD: Agreed. Further contamination must be prevented.
RIKER: I have a suggestion. First officer's log, Stardate 43174.2. Counsellor Troi and I are beaming down to Mintaka Three to locate Doctor Palmer and to determine the extent of the cultural contamination. Doctor Crusher has temporarily altered our features and skin colour. She's also implanted subcutaneous communicators so that any transmissions we receive will be inaudible to the Mintakans.
RIKER: Riker to Enterprise. Do you hear me?
DATA: Perfectly, Commander. I will be monitoring you continuously.
TROI: Mintakan emotions are quite interesting. Like the Vulcans, they have highly ordered minds. A very sensible people. For example, Mintakan women precede their mates. It's a signal to other women.
RIKER: This man's taken, get your own?
TROI: Not precisely. More like, if you want his services, I'm the one you have to negotiate with.
RIKER: What kind of services?
TROI: All kinds.
RIKER: They are a sensible race.
[now in "Assembly hall"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Riker enter as Liko is telling his experience to a grey-haired man)
PICARD: She believes the Picard is a magical figure. I'm going to show her how the magic works. I'm going to bring her aboard.
[now in "Assembly hall"]
DATA: Counsellor, sensors indicate five Mintakans in your immediate vicinity. Four are motionless. The fifth is eight meters away, proceeding south. Is Nuria one of these five?
TROI: Mmm hmm.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Was that intended to be an affirmative?
RIKER: Yes, Data, it was.
DATA: Is Nuria the closest of the five?
TROI: Uh un.
RIKER: Negative.
[now in "Assembly hall"]
DATA: Is Nuria the one in motion?
TROI: Mmm hmm.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Lock sensors on Nuria.
DATA: Locked on. We can beam Nuria aboard at will.
PICARD: Destroyed themselves, Data?
DATA: According to historical records. This will be the first opportunity for a Federation team
TROI: Captain! Beam them up quickly!
WORF: Captain. Emergency beam up! Enterprise, emergency! Severe injuries.
PICARD: Transporter Room!
PICARD: Indeed? Full scan.
DATA: Inconclusive, Captain.
TROI: Sir, I', sensing a presence on the planet. Very vague.
PICARD: Life form?
TROI: I can't be sure. The emotions of the crew are particularly strong right now. It's difficult to filter them out.
PICARD: Data, scan analysis on main viewer.
ANNOTATION: (Something looks as if it is streaming off the planet)
DATA: A possibility.
LAFORGE: Captain, I'm getting an unusual magnetic flux reading from the anti-matter containment pods.
TROI: My God.
[now in "Jeremy's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Jeremy is back to his happy memory movies)
JEREMY: Wait a minute, wait a minute. Okay, you've got ten seconds more, Mom. No peeking. Come on, Patches, in here. Shh. Okay, Mom, we're ready.
LAFORGE: All systems are functioning normally. Still, there's this fluctuation in the containment field. I can't account for it.
RIKER: Data, is this possibly related to the energy fields on the planet?
TROI: Captain
DATA: There is a beam of highly charged particles emanating from the planet, sir, but I cannot pinpoint the location yet.
TROI: Captain, there's a presence on the Enterprise.
PICARD: An alien presence?
DATA: No intruder noted by the sensors, sir.
TROI: There is a presence.
RIKER: Security, all decks yellow alert. Possible intruder.
[now in "Jeremy's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Jeremy recoils from Marla's attempt to stroke his hair)
PICARD: Proceed.
RIKER: Deanna, stand by.
TROI: Standing by.
[now in "Aster home"]
TROI: Jeremy, it's time for this to end. It's not real and it's over now.
MARLA: Jeremy, I'm not going to leave you ever again.
DATA: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Riker have big grins on their faces)
TROI: I'm sorry, Captain, it's just a rare pleasure to meet this side of your personality.
PICARD: Mister Crusher, set course for the original coordinates.
WESLEY: Yes, sir.
ANNOTATION: (transmission ends)
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: There's great hostility behind his smile. He'll stop at nothing to complete his mission.
RIKER: Including the Neutral Zone border.
WORF: Captain, I see no reason to return the Romulan to his ship. He should be held and interrogated.
WORF: Phasers locked and ready.
WESLEY: Captain, the signal pattern from the neutrino beacon is modulating.
TROI: It's Geordi.
RIKER: We can't transport him with the shields up.
WORF: If we lower our shields, the Romulan will strike.
ANNOTATION: (We follow the followers leaving their masters)
RIKER: Any insights?
TROI: Brull's ready to negotiate. He just wants privacy so that he won't appear weak in front of the other Gatherers.
YUTA: You are of the clan Lornak.
VOLNOTH: (an old man) What of it? I've seen you before.
PICARD: In a few hours, I'll be turning him over to the Angosians, and I'll be happy to do it.
TROI: I understand.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Data, do we have a link up to the Angosian central computer?
DATA: Yes, Counsellor. We are copying records for Federation inspection pursuant to their application for admittance.
TROI: Can I see a police record on Roga Danar?
ANNOTATION: (search negative)
DATA: There is no police record.
TROI: That's impossible. He's been in prison.
DATA: Lunar Five is a military prison facility.
TROI: Military? He's a soldier ?
DATA: That may provide an explanation for the tactics he was able to use against us when we tried to capture him.
TROI: It doesn't say here what he was arrested for. Call up his military record.
DATA: He served in many campaigns during the Tarsian War, received two promotions, to the rank of Subhadar. A very honourable tour of duty
TROI: What was this man's crime?
[now in "Brig"]
TROI: I've learned you are a soldier.
ROGA: I was a soldier.
TROI: So it started with the war?
ROGA: It started the day I volunteered, Counsellor. The day I began training. The day I met my first instructor. And he also called himself a counsellor.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: Roga Danar was an idealistic young man who answered his people's call to service. He joined the military to fight for the Angosian way of life. What he didn't realise was that by doing so he would have to give up that way of life for ever. He's not the same man who left home to go to war. He's been through intense psychological manipulation and biochemical modifications.
CRUSHER: At Troi's request I examined him. His cell structure has been significantly altered. They used a combination of cryptobiolin, triclenidil, macrospentol and a few things I can't even recognise.
RIKER: Was he a prisoner of war? Who did this to him?
TROI: His own government. He's been programmed to be the perfect soldier. He can be absolutely normal, but when a danger is perceived, the programming clicks in and takes over. Memory, strength, intelligence, reflexes, all become enhanced. He's conditioned to survive at any cost.
CRUSHER: One of the new substances in his cellular structure even shields electrical impulses.
DATA: Perhaps that would explain why our sensors did not detect him.
PICARD: Why was he assigned to the Lunar Five facility?
TROI: He committed no crime. He says he was ordered there with others like him. When the first soldiers returned to Angosia, they had trouble. The rules changed too quickly. A lost temper could result in murder.
DATA: Counsellor, did no one try to adjust their programming?
TROI: They were just exiled to Lunar Five.
PICARD: Lunar Five, an orbiting gulag.
[now in "Brig"]
ROGA: What do you want?
ROGA: Why, then I envy you.
ANNOTATION: (Picard and Troi enter)
TROI: Roga, this is Captain Picard.
ROGA: Captain.
PICARD: Mister Danar, I'm transferring you to Angosian security. They're en route. They will arrive shortly. I wanted to tell you I have no choice. The Prime Minister insisted and we have no right to refuse.
ROGA: You would be foolish to consider it otherwise, Captain, for they are very correct. I am dangerous. There is no place for me in a civilised society.
TROI: I do not believe that.
DATA: Nor do I.
PICARD: I respect my officers' judgements. I wish I could help further. If a way appears to me, I will.
DATA: I too.
ANNOTATION: (Data leaves)
TROI: Perhaps when this planet becomes a member of the Federation, we'll be able
ROGA: I will not be there to see it, Counsellor. Because even with this overwhelming demand to survive that they've built into my soul, I would rather die than return to Lunar Five.
[now in "Bridge"]
WAGNOR: Captain Picard, we're ready to receive the prisoner. Now transmitting the coordinates of our holding cell.
PICARD: I'll send an away team, Prime Minister. Picard out. Counsellor Troi, Commander Data, Mister Worf, you will accompany me to the planet.
[now in "Corridor"]
PICARD: And my understanding is these men are programmed to survive. Is that correct?
TROI: Yes, Captain.
PICARD: And that they will not kill unless their survival is at stake?
DATA: It is against their nature to do so, Captain.
PICARD: You are dangerous. They're only victims. You made them what they are. You asked them to defend your way of life and then you discarded them.
ZAYNAR: They were not happy here.
TROI: They were not welcome here.
ZAYNAR: It was the will of the people to resettle them.
NAYROK: No one was pleased with the solution, but we had to act for the greater good.
NAYROK: We were helping them to survive the war, you understand? They needed these skills.
PICARD: They're your brothers, your sons, and you turned your backs on them.
TROI: There are methods of treatment. Until you try them, how can you know they won't work? Even a partial recovery could give them some peace.
ZAYNAR: It was the will of the people.
TROI: To allow them to suffer?
NAYROK: There was a referendum. The people weighed the costs involved. They chose the resettlement solution.
ZAYNAR: Besides, we may need to use them again some day.
NAYROK: You are programmed to survive. You can survive at the Lunar Five settlement.
ROGA: To survive is not enough. To simply exist is not enough.
TROI: Roga, tell them what you want.
ROGA: We want our lives back. We want to come home.
NAYROK: I am not prepared to negotiate under threat, Danar, but if you will put down your weapons and return peaceably to Lunar Five, I would be willing.
RIKER: If it served your purpose, yes.
Q: It's the truth. I stand before you defrocked. Condemned to be a member of this lowest of species. A normal, imperfect, lumpen human being.
TROI: They made you human as part of your punishment?
Q: No, it was my request. I could have chosen to exist as a Markoffian sea lizard or a Belzoidian flea. Anything I wished as long as it was mortal. And since I only had a fraction of a second to mull and I chose this and asked them to bring me here.
TROI: Why?
Q: Because in all the universe you're the closest thing I have to a friend, Jean-Luc.
DATA: Sir, he is reading as fully human.
Q: What, is there an echo in here?
TROI: I am sensing an emotional presence, Captain. I would normally describe it as being terrified.
Q: How rude.
PICARD: what is it you want, Q?
Q: But I could be a valuable member of the team. I'm human, I can learn.
DATA: He has provided important theoretical guidance for Geordi's analysis of the Bre'el satellite, Captain.
TROI: It seems you have an advocate, Q.
DATA: I am merely stating a fact, Counsellor.
PICARD: Mister La Forge, your status?
KRAG: Captain, I have established motive, method and opportunity. In any court in the Federation, that is sufficient to warrant the extradition of the accused. I await your decision forthwith.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: I don't see any alternative, do you?
TROI: We both know Will's innocent.
PICARD: Of course he's innocent. But as a Starfleet Captain, I can't allow myself the luxury of yielding to my personal feelings. The evidence warrants a trial. I'll have to allow extradition.
TROI: Do you think there's enough evidence to prove his innocence?
PICARD: No.
DATA: Captain, I believe we have found the source of the radiation. Can you join us on the Bridge?
ANNOTATION: Captain's log, Stardate 43657.0 While Commander Riker is away on personal leave, the Enterprise has travelled to sector three nine six to begin charting the Selebi Asteroid Belt.
[now in "Corridor"]
LAFORGE: He sent for you too?
TROI: Yes. He was very mysterious.
WESLEY: Does you have any idea what this is about?
LAFORGE: Something happened at that cybernetics conference. Since he's come back he's spent every off duty minute in that lab.
TROI: It's not like Data to be so secretive.
WESLEY: And cautious. He kept the lab locked every minute.
LAFORGE: Now how would you know that? Ah ha.
DATA: This is Lal. Lal, say hello to Counsellor Deanna Troi
LAL: Hello Counsellor Deanna Troi.
TROI: How do you do, Lal?
LAL: I am functioning within normal parameters.
DATA: Lal, this is Geordi La Forge.
PICARD: Data, I would like to have been consulted.
DATA: I have not observed anyone else on board consulting you about their procreation, Captain.
TROI: Why didn't you give it a more human look, Data?
DATA: I decided to allow my child to choose its own sex and appearance.
PICARD: Commander Data, at your convenience, I would like to talk to you in my Ready room. Counsellor?
DATA: That is why I must attempt this, sir. I have observed that in most species, there is a primal instinct to perpetuate themselves. Until now, I have been the last of my kind. If I were to be damaged or destroyed, I would be lost forever. But if I am successful with the creation of Lal, my continuance is assured. I understand the risk, sir. and I am prepared to accept the responsibility.
[now in "Corridor"]
LAL: Gender female.
TROI: That's right, Lal. Just like me.
LAL: Gender male.
DATA: Correct.
LAL: What are criteria?
DATA: Access your data bank on sexuality, level two. That will define the parameters.
TROI: Whatever you choose will be yours for your lifetime. It's a decision that will affect how people interrelate with you.
LAL: I choose your sex and appearance.
DATA: No, Lal. That would be confusing. We are taking you to the holodeck to show you several thousand composites I have programmed. You may choose from them.
TROI: Several thousand?
DATA: This is a big decision
[now in "Holodeck"]
ANNOTATION: (Data gently wakes Deanna and helps her to her feet)
DATA: Counsellor? Lal has narrowed the choices to four. Would you like to see?
TROI: Yes, yes, of course, Data.
DATA: Computer, Lal gender sequence finalists. Begin. An Andorian female.
TROI: Interesting. You'll be the only one on board the Enterprise, Lal.
DATA: That could make socialisation more difficult. A human male.
TROI: Very attractive. There's no problem with socialisation here.
DATA: A human female.
TROI: I like her.
DATA: A Klingon male.
TROI: A friend for Worf. They're all very interesting. Do you have a favourite?
LAL: Yes. I have chosen.
[now in "Laboratory"]
DATA: I have completed the assembly of the replicated anatomy. I was able to provide Lal with more realistic skin and eye colour than my own.
ANNOTATION: (Down comes the platform. It's the human brunette)
TROI: Congratulations, Data. It's a girl.
[now in "Data's quarters"]
DATA: This is home, Lal.
LAL: Home. Place of residence. Social unit formed by a family living together.
HAFTEL: Captain, you are jeopardising your command and your career.
PICARD: There are times, sir, when men of good conscience cannot blindly follow orders. You acknowledge their sentience, but you ignore their personal liberties and freedom. Order a man to hand his child over to the state? Not while I am his captain. If you wish, you can accompany us to Starfleet, where we shall see
TROI: Troi to Commander Data. Report to your lab at once.
PICARD: Acknowledged, Counsellor. He's on his way. Is there a problem?
TROI: Yes, Captain. Something is terribly wrong with Lal.
[now in "Laboratory"]
TROI: It lasted barely a moment. She experienced fear and confusion. And then for no apparent reason she walked out of my quarters. She didn't say another word, she just started walking here and each step became more and more difficult.
DATA: Lal is programmed to return to the lab in the event of a malfunction.
LAL: Father.
KURN: I am honoured, Captain.
ANNOTATION: (They all sit round the table)
TROI: Are you adjusting to your new environment, Commander?
ANNOTATION: (Kurn starts eating. No one else is)
KURN: I find the constraints a bit difficult to conform to. Just a short while ago, I had to stop myself from killing Commander Riker. I believe he was trying to communicate the crew's sense of discomfort with my style of command. Under different circumstances, I would consider that a challenge to my authority.
RIKER: Five, and twenty.
LAFORGE: Ouch.
TROI: If it's too rich, Geordi, fold.
LAFORGE: I'm thinking, I'm thinking.
ANNOTATION: (The doorbell rings)
LAFORGE: No Captain, it's no problem. Lady Luck left me long ago.
ANNOTATION: (La Forge leaves)
TROI: Would you care to join us, Captain? We have an opening.
PICARD 2: I'd rather just observe, if you don't mind.
RIKER: Not at all. Counsellor, twenty.
ANNOTATION: (She and Data see Riker's bid)
RIKER: Pair of threes.
TROI: Flush. Queen high.
DATA: That beats my fours.
PICARD 2: Well played, Counsellor. May I have a word with you for just a moment?
TROI: Certainly, sir.
PICARD 2: Forgive me, gentlemen. I'll return your player to you in a moment.
[now in "Corridor"]
PICARD 2: Counsellor, I wanted to ask you about the crew. How are they reacting to our sudden change in course?
RIKER: We're a mission that has no apparent purpose. In itself, I can accept that. All of us can, because the Captain says it's important and we trust him. Then he runs the crew through efficiency drills for the first time in my tour of duty, but he says we need them, so we need them, because we trust our Captain. But we also have a captain singing drinking songs with his men.
LAFORGE: A Captain who's come to the poker game for the first time.
TROI: And he was very odd with me afterwards. He wanted me to warn him if the crew started to lose confidence in him.
RIKER: Any signs of mental stress or trauma?
CRUSHER: He came in for a physical with no word from me.
CRUSHER: There was one other thing. He asked me to dinner in his cabin, and it was a very unusual evening.
RIKER: Which brings up a very serious possibility. What if there's an outside influence at work here?
TROI: I detect no evidence of telepathic coercion.
DATA: Commander, there is still one fact we have not considered. The abnormal energy reading in the Captain's quarters was never explained.
WORF: It is not enough evidence to justify mutiny.
DATA: Sir, the Hood is slowing to impulse.
PICARD: Mister Data, come with me.
TROI: Captain, let me come with you to greet Tam.
PICARD: You know him?
TROI: I do. He was at the university on Betazed when I studied psychology there.
PICARD: Oh, I see. He was a colleague of yours.
TROI: No. He was a patient
[now in "Corridor"]
TROI: Tam is a telepath of extraordinary talent, even for a Betazoid. He's a specialist in first contact with new life forms.
[now in "Transporter room"]
TROI: He's a very unique person, but he's not what you might expect, Captain.
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien beams the man in)
PICARD: Welcome aboard the Enterprise. I'm
TAM: Captain Picard, right?. Here. (tosses a data file to Picard) You want to know all about your mission. Everything's on there. Orders and briefings, destination and heading, all that. Dee, I sensed you were out here. How've you been?
TROI: I've been fine, but I thought
TAM + TROI: you were on thought you were on Chandra Five.
DATA: Sir.
RIKER: Have attempts been made
TAM: To communicate with it by subspace. Of course. Linguacode, universal translation, all that. It won't work. Tin Man is too different. Direct mind to mind contact is our only hope.
TROI: The opportunity for discovery is extraordinary but I don't understand Starfleet's urgency.
PICARD: Romulans.
TAM: Hell, I forgot. The Romulans.
LAFORGE: But shields won't help if that star explodes.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Data, you seem to have developed an affinity with Elbrun. Troi, you've known him for years. How far can he be trusted?
TROI: Captain, the issue isn't one of trust in Tam's intentions, but in his judgment. I would trust him to do what he believes is right
PICARD: Yes, of course. But his judgment
TROI: Is precarious. The stress of exposure to so many minds on the ship is bad enough. Now he's strongly drawn to this creature. I'm afraid for him.
PICARD: Afraid of what?
TROI: I sense that the alien is somehow calling him. If we allow him to do as he insists, to beam over, I'm believe that we will lose him to it. That he will lose himself.
DATA: Captain, I agree that Tam's motives are trustworthy, and I do not believe it is possible that he will act against us, or will cause Tin Man to act against us out of malice.
TROI: Captain, if Tam breaks down over there, we'll be no closer to accomplishing our mission. It would be a grave mistake.
PICARD: Thank you both.
ANNOTATION: (Troi leaves)
PICARD: Data, what happened over there?
DATA: Difficult to explain, Captain.
TROI: Tam?
DATA: I believe he found what he was looking for, Counsellor.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. With all main systems at least temporarily restored, we are proceeding to Starbase one five two for inspection and additional repairs. We have had no further encounter with the Romulans. As for the whereabouts of Tin Man and Tam Elbrun, we can only speculate.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: You sent for me?
DATA: Yes, Counsellor. It was Tam's final request that I explain his decision to the crew. But I believe his hope was that you would understand.
TROI: What did happen?
DATA: I witnessed something remarkable. Individually they were both so
TROI: Wounded? Isolated?
DATA: Yes. But no longer. Through joining they have been healed. Grief has been transmuted to joy. Loneliness to belonging.
TROI: Data, you do understand.
LAFORGE: Commander I don't think there's any regulation against
RIKER: Well there ought to be. Computer, discontinue programme and erase.
TROI: Computer, belay that order.
RIKER: Counsellor?
TROI: If Barclay is having difficulty facing reality, to suddenly destroy his only means of escape would be brutal and could do considerable damage.
PICARD: They are quite disagreeable, aren't they? Shall we have at them?
DATA: Delighted.
HOLO-RIKER: Ah, a personal grudge. I warn you. It would be wise for you to put your affairs in final order before you meet him in combat. You challenge the greatest sword
RIKER: in all the holodeck. You think this is funny?
TROI: You are very tall. It might be threatening to some people.
RIKER: Mister Barclay will find out what it means to be threatened. Computer, discontinue image of Riker.
PICARD: Sir, you have no sense of fair play.
ANNOTATION: (The musketeers sit down instead)
RIKER: You want us to search through all this to find him?
TROI: It could provide us with valuable information about what's troubling him. You know, there's nothing wrong with a healthy fantasy life, as long as you don't let it take over.
RIKER: You call this healthy?
TROI: You're taking it so seriously. It's not without its element of humour.
HOLO-TROI: I am the goddess of Empathy. Cast off your inhibitions and embrace love, truth, joy.
LAFORGE: Oh, my God.
HOLO-TROI: Discard your facades and reveal your true being to me.
TROI: Computer, discontinue.
RIKER: Computer, belay that order! We want to get more insight into what's been troubling the poor man, remember? Quite a healthy fantasy life, wouldn't you say?
ANNOTATION: (Geordi agrees)
PICARD: I'm sure Counsellor Troi appreciates the opportunity to spend time with her mother.
LWAXANA: (whilst eating) Little One, you could at least pretend you're happy to see me.
TROI: Mother, we're among non-telepaths. It's impolite not to speak aloud.
LWAXANA: You mean talk with my mouth full? Deanna, please! All right, you want me to say something aloud? Have you considered if you had stayed on Betazed, you might have been a happier person.
TROI: Let's not guess what might have been. I love my work aboard the Enterprise.
LWAXANA: Yes, of course you do, but its all business and no play. You've got to enjoy life, relax, like I do. Find yourself the right man, think of your future. Think of my future.
RIKER: Lwaxana, Deanna. Anything I can do for you?
TROI: (gets up) Could I?
ANNOTATION: (Riker and Troi leave Lwaxana and go to sit at the bar)
FAREK: She's as repulsive as the rest of them.
LAFORGE: They're as fast and probably just as manoeuvrable.
PICARD: Counsellor, do they mean to carry out their threat?
TROI: I believe so. Sunad's hatred for John was evident but there's something else. The Zalkonians are afraid of John.
PICARD: Commander Riker, Counsellor, Doctor. John, I want you to join us. Mister Data, you have the Bridge. Mister Worf stay at Tactical. Counter any moves the Zalkonian makes.
WORF: Aye, sir.
WESLEY: Got another king in the hole, Data?
DATA: I am afraid I cannot answer that Wesley. And as you are a newcomer to the game, may I say it is inappropriate for you to ask. I will buy another card, Counsellor.
TROI: No help there.
LAFORGE: Fold. Again.
TROI: Three jacks looking back for the handsome young ensign. (Shelby) Pair of deuces stands. (Riker) Flush, possible straight flush. Your bet, Mister Crusher.
WESLEY: I'm in for ten.
SHELBY: Call.
SHELBY: Excuse me, sir. With my knowledge of the Borg
RIKER: Those are my orders, Commander.
TROI: Commander Riker. It is inappropriate for you to lead the away team. Until the return of Captain Picard, you are in command of the Enterprise. We're in a state of war, and your place is on the Bridge.
RIKER: Commander Shelby, you'll lead the away team. Make it so. First officer's log, stardate 43998.5. Our pursuit of the Borg continues on a course that will take us to the very core of the Federation. The devastation they could bring is beyond imagination.
[now in "Transporter room"]
WORF: These phasers have been retuned. Each has a different frequency spanning the upper EM band.
RIKER: How long would it take to execute that?
CRUSHER: That's the problem. Two to three weeks.
TROI: In two or three weeks, nanites may be all that's left of the Federation.
WORF: We have the new phaser adapters.
LAFORGE: maybe in concert with photon torpedoes we can slow them down.
OBRIEN: Sir, your submicron matrix activity is increasing exponentially.
DATA: Neural connections complete. I have access to the Borg subspace signals. Processing. Processing.
TROI: Data!
DATA: Stand by. Processing. Processing. Fascinating. The Borg group consciousness is divided into subcommands necessary to carry out all functions. Defence, communication, navigation. They are all controlled by a root command implanted into each
ANNOTATION: (Picard wakes up and tries to get out. Data restrains the mechanical arm, then pulls off the working 'hand' component.)
OBRIEN: The Borg might be trying to terminate their link with him.
DATA: Negative. The subspace signal configuration is unchanged. What is causing the increased neural activity is unclear.
TROI: No, it's not. It's him. It's Picard.
ANNOTATION: (Picard reaches out with his organic arm and takes hold of Data, gently)
TROI: Troi to Bridge.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Data has made first contact with Captain Picard.
RIKER: Can you communicate with him, Data?
CRUSHER: He's regaining consciousness.
PICARD: Sleep.
TROI: It is Captain Picard speaking, not Locutus.
PICARD: Sleep, Data.
CRUSHER: He's exhausted.
ANNOTATION: (and Enterprise whizzes away as the cube starts to spark and fizz. Picard staggers. Then - Ka-BOOM!!!
CRUSHER: Life signs are stable. The DNA around the microcircuit fibre implants is returning to normal.
TROI: How do you feel?
PICARD: Almost human. With just a bit of a headache.
CRUSHER: We'll get you to Sickbay. We won't have any trouble getting these implants out now.
WESLEY: It'll take them hours to get here, sir, even at maximum warp.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: There is life on board, but it's fading.
PICARD: Number One, assemble the rest of your away team. Prepare for immediate rescue operations.
RIKER: Yes, sir.
ANNOTATION: (There's a commotion)
[now in "Sickbay"]
ANNOTATION: (Jono is writhing on a bed as people try to hold him down. He escapes from them and runs around)
TROI: Jono, what is it? Jono! I just suggested he take off his gloves. Suddenly he lost control.
CRUSHER: Security, we need some assistance down here in Sickbay.
PICARD: Jono!
PICARD: Tragedy seems to follow that family. The Admiral lost both her sons.
CRUSHER: And now she'll have something to celebrate.
TROI: Captain, if Jeremiah is returned to his family in his present condition, it would be a wrenching experience for everyone. Especially for him. He needs to re-discover his identity, make some connection with his roots.
PICARD: I agree. Do what you can to accomplish that, Counsellor.
TROI: I don't think I can do anything, Captain.
PICARD: Why not?
CRUSHER: Troi's right. It's very clear that the boy does not respond well to women.
DATA: The Talarians are a rigidly patriarchical society, sir.
TROI: Jeremiah needs to build a relationship with a man, a father figure with whom he can explore his origins. And I think it should be you, Captain.
PICARD: Oh, no, Counsellor! Oh, no, Counsellor, I don't think so. He needs someone who is trained in these things.
TROI: But you are the only person with whom he has shown any connection. If he is to find his humanity then you are the only one who can help him. It's up to you, Captain.
[now in "Guest quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Jono is still keening)
PICARD: Jono! Jono, why do you make that noise?
CRUSHER: You might not ask that, Lieutenant, if it was your child.
PICARD: There must be a way to avoid this.
TROI: If we can just reach Jono, help him make some connections with his origins, he may choose to come with us.
RIKER: You really think Endar would go along with that?
DATA: If Endar respects Talarian custom, he may have to. According to their tradition, a male child of fourteen has reached the age of decision. He then undergoes a ceremony of initiation, after which he has the freedom to make his own choices.
RIKER: Well Mister Potts, why don't we start at the beginning?
JAKE: We were at the arcade, sir. I brought this balloon with me, filled with red pillion dye. You see, Willie is always making fun of me. I figured I'd get him back.
TROI: Hey, hey, slow down.
JAKE: We programmed the game for an ordinary laser duel. You know, twenty one points. Four points for a
RIKER: I'm familiar with the game. Go on.
RIKER: Are you trying to fill another inside straight, Worf? Don't say I didn't warn you.
WORF: Pah!
TROI: I fold.
DATA: I will raise you three.
RIKER: No cards? The best poker face I've ever seen. Dealer takes two. Your three and ten more.
DATA: It will cost you twenty to make that determination, sir.
RIKER: Dealer folds.
TROI: You two have successfully divided the evening between you.
WORF: I suspect conspiracy. Far be it for me to accuse my superior officers.
RIKER: You're getting harder and harder to bluff, Data. You've learned this game very well.
DATA: Yes sir, I believe I have.
RIKER: Tell you what. I'll bet that I can find any card that you hide in this deck. And furthermore, I will make you help me find it.
TROI: Careful, Data.
DATA: Your guidance is much valued, Counsellor. However.
RIKER: Pick a card. Don't let me see it. (Jack of hearts) Now lose it in the deck. Cut the deck into two even piles.
RIKER: Pick three more. Okay, now pick one of those. Is that your card?
ANNOTATION: (Yes, it is.)
TROI: Incredible.
DATA: Not at all, Counsellor. You surreptitiously placed the edge of your left thumb against the card. When you divided the deck to reshuffle, you kept that card on top. You thus were able to have me either save or discard, depending on the location of the card, which you followed at each step until we were left with just one. The card I originally chose. Sir, I believe under the circumstances
ANNOTATION: (and Data gathers in the pile of poker chips)
PICARD: Does she understand the magnitude of these decisions?
DATA: She claims to, Captain.
TROI: I get a sense of ambiguity from her. Her loyalties are clearly divided, Captain.
PICARD: Are you suggesting we deny her an escape from this environment?
TROI: No, I'm just not sure she wants to escape. It's the only way of life she's ever known.
PICARD: Ultimately, it is her decision to make, not ours. Mister Data, proceed with the mission as planned.
TROI: Data?
DATA: Yes, Counsellor?
TROI: You seem so strong in your support. I'm curious.
DATA: We must free the crewmen. She appears to be our best hope of doing so. In addition, I have become used to her.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Ishara.
PICARD: Do you believe there is a threat to the Federation in this struggle?
KEHLEYR: Klingon wars seldom remain confined to the Empire. Sooner or later they'll drag in the neighbouring star systems, then the Tholians, the Ferengi. The Federation won't be able to stay out of it for long. This has been coming for some time. Only K'mpec, the head of the Council, has been able to maintain the peace.
TROI: Now something has changed that.
KEHLEYR: Correct. K'mpec is dying. He is aboard the cruiser. He has come specifically to meet with you, Captain. Alone.
[now in "K'mpec's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard is escorted into K'mpec's quarters. There's a lot of red in the decor, and the chairs are massive)
PICARD: Will.
RIKER: Admiral Picard. Deanna.
TROI: How are you feeling?
RIKER: I've felt better.
PICARD: Not surprising. Altarian viruses can be a nasty business.
PICARD: I beg your pardon?
RIKER: I said, shut up. As in close your mouth and stop talking.
TROI: Will, I sense how upset you are. You're angry and impatient.
RIKER: Deanna, back off. Well, would anyone else like to speak up? Or shall we end this charade?
TOMALAK: As you wish, Commander Riker.
RIKER: And yet all sensors are operating properly.
PICARD: Can there be an intelligence at work here? Counsellor, do you sense a lifeform out there?
TROI: No, I don't think so. No. There's nothing. Nothing. I sense nothing.
PICARD: It's alright, Counsellor. Perhaps there's nothing out there to sense.
DATA: Indeed, there are many races that are not empathically detectable. The Breen, the Ferengi, the
TROI: No, you don't understand. I don't sense anything. Not out there, not in here. All of you, you're all blank to me.
[now in "Sickbay"]
CRUSHER: No indication of a concussion or a blow to the head. Just a pattern of unresponsive neural cells throughout the cerebellum and cerebral cortex.
TROI: Unresponsive?
PICARD: Fascinating. So many questions. How can a two-dimensional entity have access to a three-dimensional universe? And are they aware of us? Number One, if we can put off the T'lli Betans, I would like to investigate this further as soon as we're free of the graviton field.
LAFORGE: It's a shame we can't tell if they're sentient.
TROI: What do you mean by that? I'm doing the best that I can.
PICARD: No one suggested otherwise, Counsellor. Mister Data, try to isolate any signal patterns from the cluster. Perhaps there'll be a basis for communication. Mister La Forge, we'll attempt your warp jump as soon as you're prepared. That'll be all. Counsellor
ANNOTATION: (but she's already out of the door)
PICARD: If there is a psychology to these creatures, we must discover it. If there is an explanation for their behaviour, we must know what it is. Even in your current condition, you are the most qualified person aboard this ship to assist. Data is in Observation attempting to formulate a strategy. I want you to join him. Deanna, we need you.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. If our speed and course remain unchanged, in one hour the Enterprise will be torn apart by the gravitational forces of the cosmic string fragment.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: Are your signals reaching them?
DATA: Possibly. However, the beings may perceive them as negligible noise rather than an attempt at communication.
TROI: Is there any evidence at all that they're sentient?
DATA: Negative. The nature of their movement suggests a simple order of intelligence.
TROI: I'm sorry, Data. I don't seem to be much help without my empathic abilities. I just don't know how to draw on my human instinct.
DATA: As I have no human instinct per se, I cannot advise you, Counsellor.
TROI: Right now, I feel as two-dimensional as our friends out there. In the universe but barely aware of it. Just trying to survive on instinct. Data, what if they're simply acting instinctively? There are inherent, inborn forces in every species. What they need, what they fear. We have to discover what drives this species.
DATA: I do not believe there is any way we can know for certain, Counsellor.
TROI: We can speculate on the available evidence.
DATA: The only evidence we have at present is the brief interruption in their movement pattern during our last attempt to break away.
TROI: Which may suggest some kind of awareness of our presence.
DATA: Otherwise their course and speed have been constant.
TROI: On a straight line to the cosmic string. You're convinced the string's gravitation is pulling them in?
DATA: Because the cluster is two-dimensional, I do not have enough direct evidence to support that assumption. However, it is the most reasonable hypothesis.
TROI: Why?
DATA: It is unlikely they would intentionally move toward a destructive force.
TROI: Moths fly toward a flame. Horses sometimes run into a burning barn. Data, don't you see? We've been thinking in three dimensions. We have to get two-dimensional.
DATA: Pardon me?
TROI: Subspace signals, photon torpedoes, nothing's had an impact. It is reasonable to wonder if a gravitational pull, even as strong as a cosmic string's, would affect them.
DATA: Please continue.
TROI: What if they've chosen a course to the cosmic string? A case of pure stimulus response, driven by instinct, just like the moth to a flame.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: If Counsellor Troi's supposition is correct, a replica of the string projected behind the cluster could induce them to reverse course, disrupting the graviton wake long enough for us to escape.
PICARD: How do you simulate a cosmic string? It has the gravitational force of a hundred stars.
DATA: It is clear that I need guidance to resolve this situation. Counsellor Troi's advice should be useful.
[now in "Troi's office"]
DATA: In many ways, Deanna Troi is the friend that I understand the least. Her life and her duties are predicated on her understanding and perception of emotions. Since I have none, no doubt she finds me as much of a mystery as I find her. Chief O'Brien talks to me. Keiko talks to you. Why do they not talk to each other?
TROI: That's a good question, Data. I wish I had a good answer for you. Perhaps when they're ready, they will.
DATA: Many aspects of this situation are puzzling to me. I have been studying various texts on the subject of marriage, but I have not found a suitable guide.
TROI: A suitable guide for what?
DATA: In an effort to be helpful, I am attempting to calculate the variables involved in a successful marriage.
TROI: Good luck.
DATA: There are many opinions. On Galvin Five, a marriage is considered successful only if children are produced within a year of the wedding. Andorian marriages require groups of four people unless
TROI: Data, would you like my advice on how to help them? Don't. This is something they have to work out for themselves.
DATA: But I am their friend. Should I not stand with them in a time of difficulty?
TROI: There are many ways to help a friend, and sometimes the best way is to leave them alone.
DATA: Do you believe it to be the right decision for them to marry?
TROI: I don't know. They're very much in love, but sometimes that isn't enough. Marriage is an agreement to share who you are with someone else. To spend your lives together. To grow old together.
DATA: To grow old together? That is an integral component of marriage?
TROI: Usually. Why do you ask?
DATA: Although I am an android, I have not excluded the possibility that I, too, may someday marry.
TROI: Data, I had no idea you'd thought about getting married.
DATA: I believe I have much to offer a potential mate. However, we cannot grow old together because I will not grow old.
TROI: Data, you do have a lot to offer.
TPEL: Commander Data, this is Ambassador T'Pel. Please report to my quarters.
DATA: Acknowledged.
RIKER: Even with a treaty, they're still skittish about protecting their border.
PICARD: Last time I was in this sector, I was on the Stargazer, running at warp speed ahead of a Cardassian warship.
TROI: Running, Captain? You? That's hard to believe.
PICARD: Believe it. I'd been sent to make preliminary overtures to a truce. I'd lowered my shields as a gesture of good will. But the Cardassians were not impressed. They had taken out most of my weapons and damaged the impulse engines before I could regroup and run.
WORF: The Cardassians have no honour. I do not trust them.
TROI: They're our allies now, Mister Worf. We have to trust them.
WORF: Trust is earned, not given away.
PICARD: I hope their scout ship makes contact soon. It's not a good idea to stay too long on a Cardassian border without making your intentions known.
WORF: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Counsellor, I want you to stay as close to the crew as possible. Some of them may feel uncomfortable with Cardassians on board. I don't want any incidents.
TROI: Yes, Captain.
PICARD: Mister Data, is there anyone else on board who served previously with Captain Benjamin Maxwell?
DATA: Accessing. Chief O'Brien served under his command aboard the Rutledge, sir.
PICARD: Jared, tell your people, if the hostages are released, I am prepared to offer Federation assistance should this, this Ardra return.
JARED: I am afraid it will not matter. They know your weapons are useless against her, Captain. I will make inquiries concerning the hostages. The innocent should not suffer from our sins. But I can make no promises.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: This situation is deteriorating, Captain. The people are approaching levels of anxiety that could lead to suicide.
PICARD: Mister Data, what do we know about this Ardra?
DATA: She is a cornerstone of Ventaxian theology. It seems that Ardra came to Ventax Two and promised one thousand years of peace and prosperity, for a price. Upon her return, she would enslave the entire population. In Ventaxian culture, it is considered bad luck to speak her name out loud. CLARK
PICARD: If your intent is to intimidate, you are not succeeding.
ARDRA: That's all right. I like a challenge.
TROI: An entire planet has been terrorised because of the suggestion that you're going to enslave the population.
ARDRA: Well, it's true. Of course, I wouldn't put it so melodramatically. It's just a standard contract with an unusually long term.
DATA: So you do purport to be the mythic figure Ardra?
WORF: Shields and weapons systems are fully functional.
PICARD: Counsellor? Are you all right?
TROI: I think so. I'm feeling a bit unfocused. It'll pass.
PICARD: Well, not too bad, all things considered.
RIKER: We're lucky we didn't end up half way across the galaxy in the middle of next week.
DATA: Counsellor Troi, what is it?
ANNOTATION: (Troi does not speak with her own voice, but sounds more like a Bynar)
TROI: The plan has failed.
DATA: You have returned.
TROI: Your ship is again in our space.
DATA: I was unable to prevent it.
TROI: Nevertheless, you are here.
DATA: The Enterprise is not a threat to you. Give me more time. Our destruction would only
ANNOTATION: (Geordi enters)
DATA: The energy field will eventually penetrate our shields. There is no way to counter the Paxans' technology. We can delay their takeover but we cannot prevent it.
PICARD: The Paxans. Who are they?
TROI: You have invaded our system.
ANNOTATION: (Worf points a phaser at Troi)
PICARD: No, Worf.
DATA: You will only harm Counsellor Troi's body.
PICARD: We are not invaders. We are explorers.
TROI: Your knowledge of us is unacceptable.
DATA: They are xenophobes, sir. Isolationists. The Paxans terraformed a protoplanet in this system in order to better conceal their whereabouts. The apparent wormhole we experienced is actually a trap designed to keep out invaders. The energy field stuns everyone on board the invading vessel and places them in a state of biochemical stasis.
LAFORGE: That explains why our beards didn't grow.
PICARD: What went wrong this time?
DATA: My positronic brain is a technology unknown to the Paxans.
TROI: Our stun field had no effect on him. He remained conscious while we tried to take over the ship.
DATA: When I realised the crew was incapacitated, I initiated emergency procedures
[now in "Flashback - Bridge"]
DATA: Computer, engage emergency plan zed zed alpha.
ANNOTATION: (Worf dashes over with a phaser. Troi grabs his wrist and throws him across the Bridge. That's how his wrist got broken)
PICARD: No, stop, everyone. Who are you?
TROI: You are aware of our existence. Our attempt to place you in biochemical stasis has failed. We have no choice but to destroy this ship.
PICARD: If you destroy this ship, then others will come in search of us. You may not be able to stop them all. Knowledge of your civilisation would be spread across half the galaxy.
TROI: No.
PICARD: Allow us safe passage and I will protect your right to privacy to the best of my ability. We will never tell anyone of your existence.
TROI: There are over a thousand lifeforms on this vessel. How could you assure their silence?
PICARD: This biochemical stasis, does it suppress synaptic functions?
TROI: It does.
PICARD: Then you must have the capability of affecting memory. Can you erase the short-term memory of everyone on this ship, remove all knowledge of this event, allow us to proceed as if it had never happened?
TROI: It would take time. One of your days. He is immune to our influence.
PICARD: Data, I'm going to give you a most unusual order. I'm not sure that you will be able to integrate it into your programme.
DATA: As a Starfleet officer, I am required to follow all of your orders, Captain.
DATA: Completely, sir.
PICARD: Satisfactory?
TROI: Agreed.
PICARD: Good. Now, our task is to eliminate from the ship's records any information that might lead to knowledge of this incident. Let's get to work.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: We proceeded to erase all evidence of our encounter with the Paxans. I reset the computer's chronometer and the crew was again stunned into unconsciousness, their short-term memories erased. When they were revived a day later, the computer adjustments made it appear that only thirty seconds had passed.
RIKER: And here we are.
PICARD: Here we are again.
TROI: Your plan has failed. This ship must be destroyed.
PICARD: No. Wait. The plan failed because clues were left behind that suggested a mystery. And to many humans, a mystery is irresistible. It must be solved. The Doctor's incubation experiment, Worf's wrist, Troi's hallucinations. Little pieces of evidence that suggested even more clues. The clock, the transporter trace, Data's odd behaviour. If we eliminate the clues and begin again
TROI: Again?
PICARD: Yes. Consider the first time a run-through, a rehearsal to shake out the flaws. The second time will succeed if we leave no clues.
TROI: You are a most unusual species. Worthy of a second chance. Proceed.
ANNOTATION: (the green leaves Troi and she falls to the floor)
RIKER: Deanna?
RIKER: No damage in Engineering.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: There's a general feeling of disorientation on board, but nothing serious as far as I can tell.
PICARD: Well, then. There's still that anomalous class-M planet we were going to investigate. Ensign, replot a course to take us back to
DATA: Sir, it is likely the anomalous readings were the result of the wormhole's effect. It was extremely unstable. I would recommend against returning. It might put the Enterprise at further risk.
DATA: Energy output is negligible, sir. Radiation patterns no longer coherent. I believe it is dead, sir.
PICARD: We're out here to explore, to make contact with other life forms, to establish peaceful relations but not to interfere. And absolutely not to destroy. And yet look what we have just done.
TROI: Captain, everything you did was consistent with established Starfleet procedures.
PICARD: Number One, you have the Bridge.
DATA: Captain, sensors are picking up a new energy reading from the life form.
RIKER: I think it needs a little more help.
CRUSHER: We've done all we can. I don't want to risk hitting the offspring by accident.
TROI: Come on. You can do it.
ANNOTATION: (and out slips a miniature version of the space creature)
CRUSHER: Captain, I'd like to announce the birth of a large baby something.
RIKER: Increase to half impulse.
WORF: It is matching our velocity.
TROI: It's imprinted on us. It thinks the Enterprise is its mother.
DATA: A change in energy readings, sir. I am reading an internal buildup of gamma particles in
WORF: Its velocity is increasing. It is moving directly toward the ship.
PICARD: Mister Data?
DATA: Sir, the life form is draining energy directly from the fusion reactors.
TROI: It's feeding off the energy of the Enterprise as it would from its mother.
WORF: What action should we take, sir?
PICARD: None, Lieutenant. None at all.
DATA: Inconclusive.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: There is life on board, but
PICARD: What is it?
TROI: I don't know. Something (she shrugs)
PICARD: Number One, assemble your team.
RIKER: Doctor Crusher, report to Transporter room three. Worf. Data.
TROI: Commander, I need to come too.
[now in "Brittain Bridge"]
DATA: There is no malfunction in any of the main systems, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Riker finds the captain dead in her chair, something impaling her through the chest)
CRUSHER: The entire Bridge crew.
RIKER: Whoever did this could still be on the ship.
TROI: There is someone alive, but he didn't kill these people. Here.
ANNOTATION: (a door opens)
TROI: I think he's Betazoid. It's all right. We're going to help you. Who did this? Who did this to you?
[now in "Sickbay"]
CRUSHER: We're almost finished with the autopsies, Captain.
PICARD: How long will it take to compile the data?
CRUSHER: Data, in Tyken's experience did the crew exhibit behavioural changes?
DATA: No. There were no reports of unusual conduct among the crew.
TROI: What about nightmares?
DATA: There were no records of sleep disturbances of any kind, Counsellor.
CRUSHER: Then, what is it? What's happening to us?
CRUSHER: What?
TROI: My nightmare. It's not a dream. It's not a dream at all. It's a message.
[now in "Ready room"]
TROI: REM sleep occurs at a different frequency for Betazoids than other humanoids. I believe the beings are using that frequency to communicate telepathically.
DATA: It is possible that this telepathic communication is creating interference in the REM sleep of other species. That would explain why the rest of our crew is not dreaming.
PICARD: Counsellor, what are these beings trying to tell us?
TROI: They're calling for help. I think they're trapped just like we are. Eyes in the dark could mean this twin star system.
DATA: Your hypothesis is certainly plausible. There may be another ship on the other side of the fissure, where we cannot detect it.
CRUSHER: Is there a way we could block their signals?
DATA: There is no technology to block telepathic transmissions, Doctor.
TROI: Maybe communication through dreams can work both ways. I could try to get them to stop.
DATA: Perhaps we can accomplish more than that. If there is another ship, and we can reach them, we might be able to coordinate our efforts to free ourselves.
TROI: It is conceivable. When working with patients with debilitating nightmares, I've often used a therapeutic treatment called directed dreaming. Dreamers can learn to control of their dreams, retain a conscious memory even while in REM sleep. I could remember a short message and deliver it to them.
PICARD: If it were possible, what would you say?
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (science station readout LCARS 40274, scrolling through molecules)
DATA: Working together with the aliens, we must discover a means by which we an produce an explosion more intense than either one of us could achieve alone.
TROI: What is it you're looking for?
DATA: These are the elements we have available. Some of them could be used in the creation of an explosive reaction. If we could communicate this inventory to the other ship, perhaps they would be able to
TROI: No, Data, no. This is too complex. This has to be a simple, clear message.
DATA: I am uncertain if a simple transmission will be adequate.
TROI: Stop. Go back. Further back. There. Stop. One moon circles.
DATA: Yes, Counsellor. One electron circles one proton. This is a hydrogen atom.
TROI: One moon circles. That's what they've been telling me over and over.
DATA: Perhaps the aliens are thinking as we are, to collaborate in producing an explosion. If hydrogen is combined with another element, calendenium for example, it is extremely volatile. But would the message mean they have hydrogen or they want hydrogen?
TROI: Well, if it's a distress call, I think they'd be asking for what they need, not what they already have.
DATA: Then the proper course of action would be to release hydrogen into the rift, and hope that they have a substance that will detonate it.
TROI: How do I tell them what to do?
DATA: If you are correct, Counsellor, I believe they have already told us what to do and are waiting for us to do it. When we are ready, the only message you should attempt to convey is, now.
[now in "Sickbay"]
CRUSHER: I can help keep you in REM sleep for a while with this cortical scanner. It will maintain electrical activity in your brain at the proper frequency.
DATA: Counsellor
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: You will have to communicate with the other ship within two minutes of entering REM sleep.
TROI: Two minutes.
[now in "Sickbay"]
TROI: Is that all, Data?
DATA: Unfortunately, yes.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: We have only enough power to emit a hydrogen stream for that amount of time. They must understand that they will have to detonate it immediately. Captain, we are ready to implement the plan.
ANNOTATION: (polite applause)
RIKER: Bravo!
TROI: Wonderful! Wonderful.
DATA: Lieutenant Barclay's performance was adequate, but clearly not rooted in The Method approach. I do not understand why.
RIKER: Data, because it's polite.
CRUSHER: Ah, Worf, I have an opening in my workshop.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher, Riker, Work and La Forge leave)
TROI: Well done.
BARCLAY: Thank you, Counsellor.
TROI: You've come a long way, Reg.
BARCLAY: After more rehearsals than I can count.
TROI: I don't just mean your acting ability. It takes a great deal of courage to put yourself on display like that.
BARCLAY: You think so?
TROI: There was a time when nothing could have dragged you onto a stage in front of an audience. You've made tremendous progress.
BARCLAY: I, I guess.
TROI: Don't you think so?
BARCLAY: Well, I just feel more more comfortable playing somebody else. Maybe all this is not any better than escaping into a holodeck fantasy.
TROI: I disagree. This isn't fantasy, it's theatre. You used to withdraw onto the holodeck. You isolated yourself inside your own imagination, avoiding contact with real people. Look at yourself now. Look at all the other people you're with. You're not just acting, you're interacting. Give yourself some credit, Mister Barclay.
BARCLAY: Maybe you're right.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 44704.2. We have arrived at the Argus Array, a remote subspace telescope at the very edge of Federation space. The unmanned structure mysteriously stopped relaying its data nearly two months ago.
RIKER: How soon before the ODN process is in place?
DATA: I have been monitoring Geordi's progress. It will be operational in seventeen minutes.
TROI: Captain, let me go to the holodeck and try and talk to him.
WORF: Sir, the subspace distortion continues to increase.
[now in "Holodeck"]
BARCLAY: Hello, Deanna.
ANNOTATION: (a heavily Hollywood-isd version of the old ballads, with Picard as Robin, and the senior staff as the outlaws. This is my local tradition and I personally hate the US messing with it....)
PICARD: Q!
TROI: Is this Tagus Three?
PICARD: I doubt there are many oak trees on Tagus. No, I think this is supposed to be Earth, somewhere round about the twelfth century. And this is England, or to be more precise, Sherwood Forest. Or at least Q's recreation of it.
RIKER: That would explain these costumes.
WORF: Sorry.
ANNOTATION: (Troi is still learning to use a bow and arrow, She aims at a tree and hits Data instead)
TROI: Data, are you alright?
DATA: The arrow impacted just above my sixth intercostal support, penetrating my secondary subprocessor. Fortunately, none of my biofunctions seem affected. Do not be concerned, Counsellor. I believe your aim is improving.
RIKER: We've got to get out of here, Captain.
LEKA: I'm afraid you're correct, Captain. The situation's growing progressively worse.
ANNOTATION: (Crusher enters)
TROI: Where've you been?
CRUSHER: With a patient. Minor emergency.
ANNOTATION: (Odan enters through another door)
ANNOTATION: (all leave except Picard and Troi)
PICARD: Counsellor, what is it?
TROI: It's Ambassador Odan. I continually feel fluctuations of emotion from him.
PICARD: Perhaps it's perfectly normal among the Trill.
TROI: It could be. We know so very little about them.
PICARD: Yes. Quite.
[now in "Beauty parlour"]
ANNOTATION: (Beverly is getting her toenails coloured, while soaking her hands in green gunk and with a padded eye-shade on)
CRUSHER: No, Data. The relationship requires a biological being.
PICARD: We are at a desperate impasse in the Peliar system. The attack on the shuttlecraft has inflamed the dispute.
TROI: Who was responsible?
PICARD: No one will admit anything. Each side accuses the other and the threats are mounting. We need Odan.
RIKER: Doctor, could a human host carry him?
LAFORGE: Anything I can do.
ANNOTATION: (walking to the turbolift)
TROI: You had a good time.
LAFORGE: Does it show?
TROI: You're more relaxed than I've ever seen you.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi and Troi enter the turbolift)
WORF: Captain, Governor Vagh has signalled he is ready to meet with you.
DATA: They have discontinued their association. She has made the first move in initiating a relationship with me. What should I do?
LAFORGE: She's just coming out of a bad situation. You know, sometimes it takes people a while, Data, but then, if they jump right into another relationship, you see, that can be trouble, unless, of course, she's really ready, and then I guess it depends on whether or not you're really serious. This can be a little complicated. Listen, my advice is ask somebody else for advice. At least someone who's got more experience at giving advice.
[now in "Troi's office"]
TROI: I think you should be careful. This isn't just some experiment you're running, Data. Jenna is a living, breathing person with needs and feelings that have to be considered.
DATA: Then you do not believe I should pursue this any further.
TROI: I didn't say that. I just want you to be aware that this is unlike any other more casual relationship that you've attempted.
DATA: I have studied much human literature on the subject of love and romantic liaisons. There are many role models for me to emulate.
TROI: Ultimately, Jenna will care for you for what you are, not what you imitate out of a book.
DATA: My programming may be inadequate to the task.
TROI: We're all more than the sum of our parts, Data. You'll have to be more than the sum of your programming.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Klingons do not pursue relationships. They conquer that which they desire. However, Lieutenant D'Sora serves under my command. If she were mistreated, I would be very displeased, sir.
DATA: I understand.
DATA: The Children of Tama were called incomprehensible by Captain Silvestri of the Shiku Maru. Other accounts were comparable.
WORF: A cause for concern. For all we know, they could be threatening our border.
TROI: Everything in the previous encounters suggests a peaceable race. We have to start from there.
PICARD: Agreed. I appreciate your prudence, Mister Worf, but Starfleet believes that the Tamarians have extended a hand. We must do the same.
RIKER: The Children of Tama. I've heard rumours about them for years.
DATHON: Rai and Jiri at Lungha. Rai of Lowani. Lowani under two moons. Jiri of Ubaya. Ubaya of crossed roads at Lungha. Lungha, her sky grey. Rai and Jiri at Lungha.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: I'm sense nothing but good intentions from them, Captain.
PICARD: Mister Data?
DATA: The Tamarian seems to be stating the proper names of individuals and locations.
ANNOTATION: (Atmospheric ionisation scan 927 is on the wall monitor)
LAFORGE: I'm pretty sure I can punch up the annular confinement beam enough to transport the captain through the field, but it's going to take me at least a full day to do it.
TROI: Captain Picard could be dead by then.
WORF: I do not believe so. I have confidence in his ability as a warrior. He will be victorious.
TROI: You're still assuming this is some sort of a challenge ritual. We can't be certain of that.
RIKER: Agreed. We're only making educated guesses about their motivations, no more than that.
WORF: Then why do we wait? If we attack the ship now, they will not be able to maintain their scattering field.
TAMARIAN: Mirab.
DATA: Freeze. Darmok.
TROI: Darmok. Well, it seems to be a point of contention between them. Perhaps something the Tamarian captain proposed that the First Officer didn't like.
DATA: The apparent emotional dynamic does seem to support that assumption. As with the other terms used by the Tamarian, this appears to be a proper noun. The name clearly carries a meaning for them.
TROI: Computer, search for the term Darmok in all linguistic databases for this sector.
COMPUTER: Searching. Darmok is the name of a seventh dynasty emperor on Kanda Four. A mytho-historical hunter on Shantil Three. A colony on Malindi Seven. A frozen dessert on Tazna Five. A
TROI: Stop search. Computer, how many entries are there for Darmok?
COMPUTER: Forty seven.
TROI: All our technology and experience, our universal translator, our years in space, contacts with more alien cultures than I can even remember.
DATA: I have encountered one thousand, seven hundred fifty four non-human races during my tenure with Starfleet.
TROI: And we still can't even say hello to these people.
DATA: Correct.
TROI: A single word can lead to tragedy. One word misspoken or misunderstood. And that could happen here, Data, if we fail.
DATA: Replay at time index one four four.
DATHON: Darmok at Tanagra.
DATA: Freeze. Computer, search for the term Tanagra. All databases.
COMPUTER: Searching. Tanagra. The ruling family on Gallos Two. A ceremonial drink on Lerishi Four. An island-continent on Shantil Three
TROI: Stop. Shantil Three. Computer, cross-reference the last entry with the previous search index.
COMPUTER: Darmok is the name of a mytho-historical hunter on Shantil Three.
TROI: I think we've got something.
[now in "Planet surface"]
PICARD: A captain's log?
DATHON: Darmok!
RIKER: Here's the situation on El-Adrel. The entity has moved off several hundred metres.
CRUSHER: Captain Picard's bioscan readings are stable. The Tamarian's are not.
TROI: He may be injured.
RIKER: If the entity decides to attack again, the Captain may be facing it alone.
LAFORGE: The transporter's out of the question. The Tamarian ship has deepened the scattering field to the D region of the ionosphere. There's no getting through.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi and Worf leave)
RIKER: I would prefer to find a peaceful solution. If we could talk our way out of this one, that much the better.
TROI: Unfortunately, it may not be that simple.
RIKER: What did you find out?
DATA: The Tamarian ego structure does not seem to allow what we normally think of as self-identity. Their ability to abstract is highly unusual. They seem to communicate through narrative imagery by reference to the individuals and places which appear in their mytho-historical accounts.
TROI: It's as if I were to say to you, Juliet on her balcony.
CRUSHER: An image of romance.
TROI: Exactly. Imagery is everything to the Tamarians. It embodies their emotional states, their very thought processes. It's how they communicate, and it's how they think.
RIKER: If we know how they think, shouldn't we be able to get something across to them?
DATA: No, sir. The situation is analogous to understanding the grammar of a language but none of the vocabulary.
CRUSHER: If I didn't know who Juliet was or what she was doing on that balcony, the image alone wouldn't have any meaning.
TROI: That's correct. For instance, we know that Darmok was a great hero, a hunter, and that Tanagra was an island, but that's it. Without the details, there's no understanding.
DATA: It is necessary for us to learn the narrative from which the Tamarians drawing their imagery. Given our current relations, that does not appear likely.
[now in "Planet surface"]
ANNOTATION: (night has fallen, a fire is lit and Dathon is lying down)
PICARD: What can you tell us about him, Doctor?
CRUSHER: I found him to be a very concerned leader and a good spokesman for his people. And a terrific dancer. No, really, I'm serious. At a reception afterwards.
TROI: At least this man has genuine experience in diplomacy.
PICARD: And that's a big advantage on this mission. Very well. Mister Data, will you contact Holza, arrange a meeting?
DATA: Sir.
WORF: Maintain tricorder security link.
PICARD: Mister Worf, you come with me.
TROI: Data, I'm picking up energy fluctuations over here. Troi to Picard. Captain, acknowledge.
DATA: Data to Picard. Data to Worf.
ANNOTATION: (Data and Troi go off in the same direction as Worf and Picard. They run into Bajorans)
RO: He has no reason to lie.
WORF: He fears our reprisal.
TROI: I perceived no fear or deception from him.
WORF: If they did not attack Solarion Four, then who did? And why would anyone want to falsely implicate the Bajora?
DATA: Perhaps someone wanted to draw us into the conflict.
ANNOTATION: (Marr, Riker and Data leave)
PICARD: Well?
TROI: I don't think you need an empath to sense that woman's feelings. There's hostility that she seems to have transferred from Lore to Data. Perhaps you shouldn't have forced them together so soon.
PICARD: If her discomfort is going to affect her judgement or her objectivity, I need to know now.
[now in "Cave"]
DATA: Doctor, there is evidence of residual bitrious matter in the soil. It was not present before the Entity's attack.
DATA: Changing to twenty pulses per second.
ANNOTATION: (the Entity changes its direction of rotation)
TROI: Is it responding to us?
MARR: Let's test that. Ramp the frequency again, Commander.
DATA: Emissions now at thirty pulses per second.
MARR: Let me try something else. A continuous graviton beam.
LAFORGE: All graviton pulses from the Entity have stopped.
TROI: Maybe it doesn't like what we're doing.
PICARD: Doctor, return to the intermittent signal.
ANNOTATION: (the Entity begins to shake)
DATA: Doctor? Doctor Marr? Doctor Marr, we must return to the intermittent signal.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: Something's very wrong, Captain.
DATA: Sir, the Entity is beginning to resonate. Vibrations are increasing.
PICARD: Doctor, stop the transmission. That is an order. Doctor Marr, do you hear me?
WESLEY: Praestat quam prius.
PICARD: Oppido bonum. Your Latin has improved.
TROI: You're looking very handsome.
CRUSHER: You really do that cadet uniform justice, Wesley.
LAFORGE: I bet you're driving all the girls wild.
LAFORGE: Excellent. As soon as you get settled, come down to Engineering and we'll get you started.
CRUSHER: So what kind of game is this?
TROI: Come by my quarters and I'll show it to you.
[now in "Corridor"]
DATA: Have you found the Academy challenging, Wesley?
WESLEY: Yeah. I thought after being on the Enterprise, it would be a breeze, but there's a lot more to learn than just starship operations. What was your first year like?
RIKER: And Spock?
PICARD: The Ambassador is sceptical, but he cares a great deal about reunification. As long as there's a chance of success, he's prepared to pursue it.
TROI: I'm afraid I don't see how a stolen Vulcan ship fits into all this.
PICARD: Neither do I, Counsellor. How soon can you be at Galorndon Core, Number One?
RIKER: A little over eight hours.
PICARD: You know everything I do, Will.
RIKER: Deanna?
TROI: It's hard to tell, but he is holding something back.
CRUSHER: Of course he is. All the things he could tell us. All the things he would like to tell us.
TROI: It might be that, I don't know.
RIKER: What if he's an imposter? God knows we've seen enough of them.
PICARD: He is human. The medical scans have proved that, right, Doctor?
DATA: Counsellor, I must join Commander La Forge in Engineering. If you will excuse me.
ANNOTATION: (but Timothy is holding onto Data's hand)
TROI: Timothy, would you like Data to stay with you a little bit longer? (a little nod)
[now in "Engineering"]
ANNOTATION: (looking at a schematic of the Vico on a wall monitor)
LAFORGE: Sections of the primary and secondary hull were torn right off. The shearing planes are here, here, and here.
LAFORGE: There was absolutely no evidence of anybody coming on board the Vico. We would have found a transporter field trace. Or if somebody had used the entry ports, we would have found an electrostatic differential in the docking latches, and we didn't. Could Timothy have imagined that, Counsellor?
PICARD: Or could he be lying?
TROI: If he's lying, I haven't been able to sense it. Perhaps his emotional trauma level is too high.
PICARD: Why wouldn't he tell us the truth?
TROI: He's still in shock. it's hard to know what's going on in his mind right now.
LAFORGE: Well, I'll go back and check the sensor readings again but I don't think we're going to find anything.
PICARD: Thank you, Geordi.
ANNOTATION: (La Forge leaves)
TROI: Data. Captain, I think we should ask Data to spend some time with him.
DATA: I do not understand.
TROI: I'm very worried about his behaviour and what I've just heard doesn't make me feel any better. Data, you're the only one he's reached out to, because you rescued him. We can use your relationship with him to help his recovery.
PICARD: Would Timothy also be more inclined to tell Data the truth about what happened?
TROI: It's a possibility.
PICARD: Commander, proceed with Timothy as the Counsellor suggests.
DATA: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Picard leaves)
DATA: Counsellor, exactly how shall I proceed?
TROI: Just be with him. You're a presence he trusts, and that's what he needs most right now.
[now in "Timothy's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (Timothy is working on the temple sculpture he was doing in class earlier when the doorbell rings)
TIMOTHY: What?
RIKER: Maybe that's what happened to the Vico. They didn't see anything coming until it was too late.
PICARD: Counsellor, has the boy volunteered any further information?
TROI: No, but I do have an appointment with him in less than half an hour.
PICARD: If there's a possibility of getting more from him, I'd like you to pursue it. But we need to continue our investigation. We'll enter the Black Cluster at oh seven hundred hours tomorrow morning. Dismissed.
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi rings the bell of 08-1402 and Timothy opens the door. He's wearing a jumper with a gold body section like a starfleet uniform)
ANNOTATION: (Data and Troi are watching Timothy with two other children)
DATA: He laughed.
TROI: Yes. It's nice to see, isn't it?
DATA: It is certainly not consistent with his android persona.
TROI: I'd say he's beginning the process of letting go of that fantasy.
DATA: Then my work with him is done.
TROI: No, I don't think it is, Data. A laugh is one step in the right direction. We need to help him take a few more steps.
DATA: How, Counsellor?
TROI: I'd like you to talk to him about your own fascination with humanity. If you can explain to Timothy the appeal that humanity has for you, he might find it easier to become a boy again.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
ANNOTATION: (Data and Timothy are solemnly sucking tall drinks through long straws)
TIMOTHY: This is great. How is yours?
DATA: Given the effects we have observed, the probability is exceedingly remote, sir.
PICARD: Picard to Counsellor Troi.
TROI: Yes, Captain?
PICARD: Counsellor, will you bring Timothy to my Ready room?
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Timothy, can you tell us what happened to your ship?
TIMOTHY: I did tell you.
TROI: Tell us again.
TIMOTHY: We were attacked.
DATA: That is highly unlikely. Our investigations have clearly demonstrated
PICARD: What was it that didn't you mean to do, Timothy?
TIMOTHY: My arm hit the computer panel. That's what destroyed the ship.
TROI: The ship was damaged when your arm hit the computer panel? Timothy, listen to me. The damage to your ship might have occurred at the same time your arm touched the panel, but it was only a coincidence. This wasn't your fault.
TIMOTHY: Yes it was.
DATA: It is not possible. The onboard control systems for every starship require a user code clearance. You could not have inadvertently affected any of the Vico's systems.
PICARD: Your computer had safety precautions. There is nothing you could have touched that would have damaged your ship.
TROI: You're not responsible for what happened to your parents, Timothy.
TIMOTHY: But if it wasn't me
PICARD: We're trying to determine what happened right now, and if there is anything you can remember that may assist
FELTON: Captain, impulse power has been disrupted. The helm won't respond.
TIMOTHY: We couldn't get out either.
TROI: Timothy, perhaps you and I should go below and get out of everyone's way.
TIMOTHY: No.
RIKER: Riker to La Forge. Can you give me more power to the shields?
PICARD: Full about, one quarter impulse. Take us out of here.
[now in "Classroom observation area"]
ANNOTATION: (the class is singing 'Row your boat')
TROI: Timothy's a boy feeling a great deal of pain. But he is a boy again. Is this difficult for you, Data?
DATA: Difficult?
TROI: To watch him moving away from being like you.
DATA: That would require an emotional context which I cannot provide.
[now in "Classroom"]
TEACHER: Okay, everybody, let's go. Come on.
LAFORGE: I don't think so. Thanks anyway.
TARMIN: I have rarely encountered such squeamish people. Doctor Crusher? Commander Riker?
TROI: Mister Tarmin, are all Ullians able to read memories?
TARMIN: Oh, no, my dear. The technique requires special training. It is a serious commitment.
INAD: It takes years of study. Tarmin is the most proficient of our group.
DATA: And were the Ullians present?
LAFORGE: Checking the mission logs. That's funny. On stardates 45321 and 45323, when the comas occurred, Tarmin was on his home planet. He wasn't anywhere near the Nel system.
[now in "Troi's quarters"]
TROI: Come in.
ANNOTATION: (Jev enters)
TROI: Hello, Jev.
JEV: We'll be reaching starbase soon. I wanted to say goodbye, and to apologise again for my father.
TROI: There's no need. You're not responsible for what he did.
JEV: Before all this happened, I had hoped we might become friends.
TROI: We still can.
JEV: After what he's put you through? Maybe you can forget. I'm not sure I can. You're so lovely. I have to go. Goodbye.
TROI: Jev, you're upset. Would you like to talk?
JEV: No.
TROI: You'd feel better if you did.
JEV: Why do you have to be so nice? So lovely.
ANNOTATION: (and he goes into memory probe mode. The chips fall again)
TROI: What? What's happening? It's happening again.
JEV: You're so beautiful. So fragile.
TROI: It was you. It was always you.
JEV: (as Riker) Have you stopped thinking about us?
TROI: No!
ANNOTATION: (Jev takes Deanna's arm and removes her comm. badge)
TROI: Don't. Don't. I won't let you!
ANNOTATION: (Deanna slaps Jev's face. They struggle. She kicks and hits him with anything to hand)
TROI: No! No!
ANNOTATION: (Worf enters and knocks Jev down with a single blow)
DATA: Counsellor. Are you all right?
TROI: Yes.
ANNOTATION: (Security remove Jev)
TROI: Why are you here? How did you know?
DATA: We discovered two instances of unexplained coma on Nel Three while the Ullians were there, but Tarmin was not part of the group. Further examination revealed that only one Ullian was present at all incidents of coma. Jev.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 45435.8. Doctor Crusher and Commander Riker regained consciousness while we were en route to the Ullian home world. The slow process of their recovery has begun.
ANNOTATION: (a 3D chess game is in progress)
DATA: The characteristic response to the Kriskov Gambit is to counter with the el-Mitra Exchange, particularly since I have already taken both your rooks. By missing that opportunity, you have left your king vulnerable.
TROI: We'll see.
DATA: As you wish, Counsellor. Check.
ANNOTATION: (Troi makes her move)
DATA: Intriguing. You have devised a completely unanticipated response to a classic attack. You will checkmate my king in seven moves.
TROI: Data, chess isn't just a game of ploys and gambits. It's a game of intuition.
DATA: You are a challenging opponent, Counsellor.
TROI: Thanks, but don't think a compliment's going to get you out of our bet. You owe me one Samarian Sunset made in the traditional style, as only you can make it, Data.
DATA: I will honour our agreement.
[now in "Sickbay"]
CRUSHER: Raise your arm to the side.
DATA: One Samarian Sunset, made in the traditional style.
ANNOTATION: (Data puts a glass of clear liquid in front of Deanna, then taps it with his fingernail. A yellow glow diffuses into orange in the glass)
TROI: It's beautiful.
DATA: I hope you enjoy it.
ANNOTATION: (a green light passes across Data)
RO: You don't strike me as a man who needs a holodeck to have a good time.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
RIKER: Who reported to the Bridge from this group?
TROI: I did.
RIKER: Have you found anything that might give us some insight into what happened?
TROI: Not specifically, but there are two things that seem unusual. The bartender is an artificial lifeform.
DATA: Can I get you something? A beverage?
RIKER: No, thank you.
DATA: The databanks that identify who I am are not functioning.
RIKER: You were going to mention something else?
TROI: I don't know if this means anything, but I seem to have an ability that the others don't. I have a very strong sense of what other people are feeling at times it's almost
RIKER: Is something wrong?
TROI: No. Just for a moment, you seemed familiar.
RIKER: You remember me?
TROI: Not exactly. I mean, I don't know who you are, but there's something about you.
WORF: Bridge to survey team.
RIKER: Survey team here. Go ahead.
LAFORGE: We haven't finished a full search of the computer records, but we have found out quite a bit.
DATA: This vessel is called the Enterprise. We are part of an organization called the United Federation of Planets. The Federation is currently in a state of war.
TROI: With whom?
LAFORGE: The Lysian Alliance. They're a genocidal race determined to destroy us. The war has been going on for years.
DATA: Starfleet Command believes the Lysians are using a new weapon which has shifted the balance of power to their favour.
PICARD: Mister La Forge, do we have any record of our current mission?
LAFORGE: Yes, sir. (goes to wall screen) We're approximately here. We've been ordered to cross into Lysian territory and destroy their Central Command. This is it. The nerve centre for the entire Lysian military operation.
TROI: Captain, there's been a great deal of damage to our computer system. Maybe we're not getting the correct information.
PICARD: What are you saying?
TROI: That we get confirmation of this mission from our headquarters.
WORF: If we use subspace radio we will be detected.
TROI: There could be thousands of lives at stake.
LAFORGE: Our orders specifically require us to maintain radio silence.
DATA: Our mission is part of a highly coordinated effort to put an end to the war. There are other vessels on other fronts, all working according to an intricate plan.
MACDUFF: No! Their new weapon. Whatever it was that erased out our computers and our memories, maybe this is how they do it, over communication channels.
DATA: It is conceivable, sir.
TROI: It's also possible that they just want to talk to us. I think we should respond.
WORF: Captain, the ship is hailing us again.
MACDUFF: If you're wrong, it could mean our destruction. We can't take the risk, Captain.
DATA: Armaments consist of four laser cannons and thirty nine cobalt fusion warheads with magnetic propulsion. Defensive shield output is four point three kilojoules.
RIKER: One photon torpedo ought to do it.
TROI: Data, how many people on that station?
DATA: Fifteen thousand, three hundred eleven.
MACDUFF: We're within range, Captain.
PICARD: Stand by.
MACDUFF: Waiting for your order, sir.
TROI: Captain, this isn't right.
MACDUFF: The rest of our forces are depending on us.
RIKER: How can our mortal enemy be over a hundred years behind us in weapons technology?
RIKER: W arrived a little late.
PICARD: Mute it, Mister Data. With that storm activity down there, it isn't worth the risk to check on a ghost ship. Advise Starfleet that we have solved the mystery of Captain Shumar and the Essex.
TROI: I'm not sure we have. Someone's down there. Alive. First officer's log, supplemental. The electromagnetic interference on the surface has been judged too dangerous for anyone to transport down, so we have taken a shuttle to investigate.
[now in "Shuttle"]
TROI: Riker, Data and Troi are actually wearing harnesses to keep them in their seats)
DATA: Shields are holding, sir.
RIKER: Wind shear is incredible. Data, keep an eye on the stabilisers. If it's anything like this on the ground, I don't see how anyone can survive on this moon for long.
TROI: Maybe they've been living underground.
RIKER: Question is where? I still can't locate the source of the damn signal. It's bouncing around more than we are.
DATA: Forward thrusters have failed, sir. We are losing power.
RO: I think I can. I followed their entry almost all the way in. We can calculate the coordinates from the angle of descent.
[now in "Moon surface"]
ANNOTATION: (an explosive charge blows off the rear emergency hatch)
TROI: Your arm.
RIKER: Yeah, I'm pretty sure that's broken. Enterprise?
DATA: It is unlikely that we will be able to establish communication with the ship, given the electromagnetic interference.
RIKER: We'll stay in the area until the Enterprise finds us. Take an inventory of the shuttle. See if there's anything left in there that's usable. The ground cover is all non-porous rock, which makes me believe it's even less likely there's anyone living here.
DATA: There are no instruments left of practical value that have not been damaged by our landing, sir.
TROI: What is that?
RIKER: That doesn't look like any storm front I've ever seen.
DATA: The tricorder is picking up high levels of EM bursts across the spectrum. No lifesign readings other than our own.
TROI: There is someone alive here. I'm more certain of it now than ever.
RIKER: Well, I hope they can find us, because there's no way we'll find them.
TROI: They're coming. They're coming with the storm.
[now in "Transporter room"]
LAFORGE: We can't get a pattern lock on their communicators because of the EM bursts, Captain. There's no way we can beam them out of there, not under these conditions.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: The same conditions won't permit a shuttle to land safely, Mister LaForge. Any suggestions?
PICARD: Is something wrong, Commander?
DATA: My apologies. It seems my primary speech processors are experiencing a minor fluctuation. I will have it corrected in a moment.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Captain, may I speak with you a moment in private?
PICARD: Of course. You have the Bridge, Number One.
RIKER: Mister Data, deploy sensor scans when you're ready. Ensign, take us to a synchronous orbit aligned around our crash site.
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien shoots Riker. Data fails to override Riker's last command and thumps the blank console in frustration) (In the Ready room, Troi knocks out Picard, then enters the Bridge)
OBRIEN: This way!
TROI: What happened?
DATA: He would not move to a polar orbit.
TROI: You couldn't wait? The Captain would have done it for me.
[now in "Turbolift"]
OBRIEN: Deck thirty six. Engineering.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Computer, re-enable Bridge control. Security protocol, Riker omega Three.
ANNOTATION: (the lift jerks to a halt)
DATA: They've trapped us.
TROI: What deck is this?
OBRIEN: We're on deck ten.
TROI: Can you move us again?
OBRIEN: I know how to override the bridge command.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Activate security fields decks eight through fifteen.
ANNOTATION: (But when Worf and Patricia Tallman and another security guard get there, the turbolift is empty except for three comm. badges on the floor)
[now in "Deck 10 Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (The three encounter forcefields)
TROI: Do you know how to deactivate this?
OBRIEN: The computer will not allow us to override an emergency forcefield command.
DATA: My entity's artificial substructure may be useful.
PICARD: Doctor Crusher to the Bridge.
CRUSHER: On my way.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
TROI: What are you doing now?
DATA: I can reverse the polarity of their forcefields to isolate this room.
TROI: Good.
OBRIEN: Their communicators. Now they will learn nothing but what we tell them.
[now in "Bridge"]
RO: They've done something to the forcefields on deck ten, section one.
PICARD: Doctor, go back to the biofilter readouts taken of the away team's transport from the moon's surface. See if you can come up with any clue that might explain this. Ten Forward, this is Captain Picard. I am prepared to discuss this situation. There is no need for further violence.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
PICARD: Please identify yourselves.
TROI: They will now attempt to negotiate for the safety and release of their people. Interesting. Under normal circumstances, I would be counselling the Captain at a time like this.
OBRIEN: And what would you tell him to do?
TROI: I would help him find a way to secure our trust.
DATA: What are you looking at? You, Klingon. Attack me. (Data throws his phaser to Miles) Are you afraid?
WORF: I have no fear of death.
DATA: And I have no fear of killing you.
TROI: Stop it!
PICARD: Please respond, Ten Forward. Are there any members of my crew who require medical assistance?
TROI: We can discuss your wounded, but first you will move the ship.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Move it where?
TROI: You will
CRUSHER: If this is going to work, we have to have some way to contain or neutralise this anionic energy once it's out of our people.
PICARD: Yes, Doctor. That will be your top priority. Very well, proceed. Bridge to Ten Forward. Now that we are moving the ship as you requested, I would like to know the nature of the injuries to the members of my crew.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
TROI: Five of your people have been injured.
PICARD: How serious is their condition?
TROI: You, Klingon, tell him.
WORF: Captain, one person has suffered what looks like a level-five phaser hit, and four others have secondary burns. They require medical attention. And our captors are not affected by phaser stun settings.
DATA: Silence, Klingon.
PICARD: If you will release them, I will take their place.
[now in "Ten Forward"]
DATA: I don't trust him. It may be a deception.
TROI: The crew values Picard's life above all others. Captain Picard, we agree to your proposal.
[now in "Bridge"]
PICARD: Expect a medical team to accompany me.
TROI: Acknowledged.
OBRIEN: No. Make it stop.
PICARD: Ten Forward, we're outside the door.
TROI: Lower the force field.
ANNOTATION: (O'Brien does, and Data takes Picard's comm. badge)
TROI: Welcome, Captain. Allow me to introduce myself. I am Captain Bryce Shumar, of the Federation Starship Essex.
PICARD: The Starship Essex vanished over two hundred years ago.
TROI: Indeed. I know, I was there. This is my First Officer Commander Steven Mullen (Data), and my Security Chief, Lieutenant Morgan Kelly. (Miles)
PICARD: And you have survived all this time as?
TROI: Spirits? Ghosts? But you're a man who would never believe in ghosts, Picard. Isn't that true? You see, Troi knows you. And so I do as well.
PICARD: Then Counsellor Troi is still alive?
TROI: Yes, of course she is. I have no wish to harm her or to harm anyone else.
PICARD: I'm very pleased to hear that.
TROI: We have been forced to take this action, Captain, because we need your help.
PICARD: My help?
TROI: Our consciousness has been trapped on this moon for two centuries. We must escape this torture.
PICARD: How did this happen to you?
TROI: I can't explain how it happened. I only know that it did. The Essex was caught in an electromagnetic storm just as your shuttle was. Moments before we crashed, the bridge was struck by lightning. The ship was ripped apart. Somehow, in that instant, our consciousness was absorbed in the magnetic currents on the surface.
PICARD: Why didn't you tell us this? Why the deception? The violence?
ANNOTATION: (The medical team take the injured out of the room)
TROI: Because as I said, I knew you would not believe us. Even now, I know you don't.
PICARD: What was your vessel's designation and its complement?
TROI: NCC One seven three. Daedalus-class starship. Crew, two hundred and twenty nine.
PICARD: Under whose command in this sector?
TROI: Admiral Uttan Narsu, Starbase Twelve. You will find all this in Starfleet records.
PICARD: I don't need to see the records.
TROI: Then you know I am correct.
PICARD: End this, and I will give you whatever help you need.
TROI: No. You don't trust us. And I can't risk trusting you.
DATA: It is taking too long. We should have been there by now. He is manipulating you.
TROI: Captain Picard has every right to be curious.
DATA: He will try to delay until a rescue attempt is possible.
TROI: I know that. I also know that he will make every effort to protect the lives of his people. Since our demands are not excessive, Captain, I hope you will see that it will be simpler to accede than to risk further injuries.
PICARD: What do you want?
TROI: All you need to know for now is that we want to rest. Simply, finally, to rest.
[now in "Jefferies tube"]
ANNOTATION: (Geordi and Ro are pushing some equipment in front of them)
LAFORGE: Section two B, A, section one.
ANNOTATION: (He leans in to kiss her)
KEIKO: No! Get away! Get away from me.
TROI: Leave her alone.
PICARD: Captain Shumar. We'll be approaching the southern polar region that you requested in a few minutes. I need to give additional instructions.
TROI: Very well. We're taking you to our crash site.
PICARD: The southern pole?
TROI: That is correct.
PICARD: Nothing our sensors were able to detect indicated that the Essex went down in that region.
TROI: As I told you, Captain, the ship broke up in the atmosphere, and the bridge went down here. When we reach it, you will beam what's left of our skeletal remains on board this ship and then take them back to Earth for a proper burial. You see how simple a request this is?
PICARD: Captain, if you will let these people go, I'll order the Bridge to follow your instructions.
TROI: I will release no one.
PICARD: If you are who you say you are, there's no need for any of this. We'll gladly take you home.
TROI: I wish you were truly as open-minded as you say, Picard.
PICARD: If you don't release the hostages, I won't cooperate.
DATA: You will cooperate, Captain. You will cooperate or someone will die. Who shall it be? How about the Klingon? Get another one.
DATA: We must be able to use the transporters.
PICARD: Mister O'Brien was the one who safely executed the return of the away team. He's the most qualified person on board to operate the transporters under these circumstances.
TROI: Can you do it from here?
OBRIEN: No. I'd have to use a transporter pad.
PICARD: I could give you safe passage to a transporter pad in one of the cargo bays.
DATA: It's a trick. He is trying to divide us.
TROI: We must not be separated.
PICARD: I can give you all safe passage.
DATA: Why are you suddenly being so helpful?
PICARD: Because I assume that if you choose go to the cargo bay, then you won't to take all of the hostages. Their safety is my chief priority.
TROI: What are the risks when we leave this room?
DATA: Without the protection of the forcefields, we are completely vulnerable.
OBRIEN: They could use the transporter against us. Once the forcefield is down, they could beam us back to the surface. But there is a way to neutralise that threat. Bridge, transfer all transporter functions to Ten Forward.
OBRIEN: Once we create our own access code, we can prevent anyone using the transporter against us. We can go to the cargo bay.
DATA: What about the weapons?
TROI: We will each take a hostage for protection.
DATA: Klingon.
TROI: Picard, you are mine.
KEIKO: Please, let her stay.
ANNOTATION: (Miles lets Keiko hand Molly over to the woman again)
TROI: Lower the forcefield.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Security teams, stand by.
RO: They're heading through section five.
CRUSHER: They have the same anionic signature we saw on the biofilter scans.
RIKER: I think we can give the Captain a new bargaining chip. Doctor Crusher, flood the cargo bay with your containment field.
[now in "Cargo bay"]
TROI: No! Let them go or you will all die.
PICARD: Your threats are meaningless now.
OBRIEN: We are still in control of these three bodies. We will not let them go.
WORF: To die defending one's ship is the hope of every Klingon.
PICARD: If you each know the officers you inhabit, then you know they're equally ready to give their lives for this ship. Free them now and I will return you to the moon's surface.
TROI: I advise you, Picard, not to pass our way again.
ANNOTATION: (the balls of energy leave them, and Troi, Data and Miles collapse)
PICARD: Picard to Bridge.
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 45572.1. Doctor Crusher has examined Troi, Data and O'Brien. There seem to be no residual effects from their experience.
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (leaving Sickbay)
TROI: It was as though my own consciousness were pushed to the side. I was watching everything happen, hearing my own voice, but not being able to control any of it.
PICARD: What about the entity that controlled you, What were your perceptions of him?
TROI: He was intelligent, actually. Thoughtful, in a ruthless sort of way. Cold.
DATA: Lieutenant, I must apologise for my inadvertent misconduct toward you.
WORF: No apology necessary.
SOREN: You have my word.
[now in "Data's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (I'm assuming that from the deerstalker and cape on the hat stand behind Worf)
TROI: All right. This hand, the game is Federation Day.
WORF: What is that?
TROI: Well, the Federation was founded in Twenty One Sixty One, so, twos, sixes, and aces are wild.
WORF: That is a woman's game.
TROI: Oh? Why is that?
WORF: All those wild cards. They support a weak hand. A man's game has no wild cards.
CRUSHER: Let me get this straight. Are you saying it's a woman's game because women are weak and need more help?
CRUSHER: And just this afternoon I was insisting to one of the J'naii that those attitudes were but a distant memory.
WORF: The J'naii. They bother me.
TROI: Why, Worf?
WORF: They just do. They're all alike. No males, no females.
TROI: Well I'm sure we're just as strange to them.
CRUSHER: Well one of them seems to be overcoming the differences, at least in regards to one of us.
WORF: What are you saying, Doctor?
WORF: A human and a J'naii? Impossible.
DATA: Why?
TROI: Good question. Worf?
WORF: With all these wild cards, it is difficult to know exactly what is in my hand. However, I will open with fifty.
[now in "Shuttlecraft"]
RIKER: The portable transporter array is in. When we get into null space, we'll need to initialise it before we can transport the J'naii crew to this shuttle. But there should still be enough power left to beam all of us back to the Enterprise.
PICARD: Yes, Doctor?
CRUSHER: I heard voices in my room last night. I was alone, so at first I thought I was imagining things. But this morning, ten other people reported hearing them at the same time I did.
TROI: What were the voices saying?
CRUSHER: I couldn't make them out.
RIKER: Data, did the sensors pick up anything unusual last night?
DATA: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Counsellor?
TROI: I sensed nothing unusual last night.
LAFORGE: Maybe it's a problem with the comm. system.
WORF: Bridge to Captain Picard.
RIKER: Red alert.
DATA: There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
TROI: We have to get out of here now.
DATA: Captain, something is emerging.
ANNOTATION: (it's a smaller starship)
RIKER: Red alert.
DATA: There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
TROI: We have to get out of here now.
DATA: Captain, something is emerging.
ANNOTATION: (here comes the ship again)
CRUSHER: I'm sorry to call you here so early, but we couldn't wait until oh seven hundred hours. We think we may have an explanation for the odd occurrences around here. Commander.
LAFORGE: This is going to sound pretty wild. Somehow, we've entered what seems to be a temporal causality loop. We think we're stuck in a particular fragment in time, and we've been repeating that same fragment over and over again.
TROI: Is this what's causing our dj vu?
CRUSHER: Yes, but it's more than that. In dj vu, you only think you're repeating events. We actually are.
LAFORGE: Our theory is this. Every time the loop begins again, everything resets itself, and starts all over. We don't remember anything that happened before, so each time through the loop, we think it's the first.
RIKER: Is that possible?
DATA: We have seen that echoes, or after-images, from previous loops appear as distortions in the dekyon field. We may be able to send a deliberate echo into the next loop.
TROI: Like a message in a bottle.
LAFORGE: Exactly. We could enhance a dekyon emission to create a specific pattern and send ourselves a message. Not a long one, probably only a few characters. Maybe one word.
RIKER: How do we know we'll pick up that word the next time through?
LAFORGE: All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
DATA: There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
TROI: We have to get out of here now.
DATA: Captain, something is emerging.
ANNOTATION: (here comes the ship)
RIKER: What could be causing it?
LAFORGE: I don't know, but if I wanted to send information from one loop to the next I might use a method like a dekyon emission.
TROI: You think we sent ourselves a message?
LAFORGE: It would make sense. Maybe we are trying to tell ourselves something.
PICARD: If that were true, what could three indicate?
LAFORGE: All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
DATA: There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
TROI: We have to get out of here now.
DATA: Captain, something is emerging.
ANNOTATION: (the ship)
PICARD: Please inform the Academy, Mister Worf, and send my regards to Superintendant Brand.
WORF: Aye, sir.
TROI: Do you know Admiral Brand?
PICARD: We've met a few times. She's a formidable woman.
RIKER: Sounds like my superintendent. When I was at the Academy, we had a Vulcan Superintendent who had memorised the personnel files of every single cadet. He knew everything about them. It was like having your parents around all the time.
CLARA: So is Isabella.
ANNOTATION: (Troi enters)
TROI: Hello, Clara.
CLARA: Hello.
GUINAN: Clara and Isabella and I were just having a conversation.
TROI: Would you and Isabella like to come for a walk with me?
CLARA: I guess so. Bye.
GUINAN: Bye, Clara. Bye, Isabella.
ANNOTATION: (a large orange sun is on the viewscreen)
RIKER: Very impressive.
TROI: It's beautiful, but frightening at the same time.
DATA: Captain, I am detecting a transmission emanating from within the system.
RIKER: What sort of signal?
RIKER: I agree. We're at war.
CRUSHER: There's been no formal declaration of war.
TROI: Not from us, but certainly from them. They've attacked us in every encounter.
PICARD: They've declared war on our way of life. We are to be assimilated.
CRUSHER: But even in war there are rules. You don't kill civilians indiscriminately.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi leaves)
GUINAN: Full circle.
[now in "Corridor"]
TROI: I heard about Data.
RIKER: Yeah.
TROI: It's having an unusually traumatic effect on everyone.
RIKER: Yeah.
TROI: If you don't want to talk about it, it's okay.
RIKER: I'm fine. I'm just
TROI: Angry.
RIKER: I'm not angry. Yeah, I'm angry. Why should I be angry?
TROI: Maybe because it reminds us of our own mortality.
RIKER: I just don't want to believe it.
TROI: Have you ever heard Data define friendship?
RIKER: No.
TROI: How did he put it? As I experience certain sensory input patterns, my mental pathways become accustomed to them. The inputs eventually are anticipated and even missed when absent.
RIKER: So what's the point?
TROI: He's used to us, and we're used to him. It's like finding out someone you love has a terminal illness and
ANNOTATION: (The turbolift arrives, the doors open and - )
RIKER: Data.
DATA: Counsellor. Commander.
[now in "Turbolift"]
DATA: Would either of you mind if I made a personal inquiry?
TROI: Personal inquiry? No, go right ahead.
DATA: I am perceiving an apparent change in the way others behave toward me. For example, people abruptly end conversations when I appear, just as you did when the turbolift doors opened. Is that an accurate observation?
RIKER: Not at all.
TROI: (same time) Yes.
RIKER: Yes.
TROI: You're right, Data. And it's not a very nice thing to do.
RIKER: It's just that our mental pathways have become accustomed to your sensory input patterns.
DATA: I understand. I am also fond of you, Commander. And you as well, Counsellor.
DATA: Caught in the after effect. I am attempting
ANNOTATION: (there's a flash, and the forcefield generator falls to the ground)
TROI: Data!
RIKER: Over here.
PICARD: Commander Riker, report.
LAFORGE: If we tune a phaser to the approximate frequency of triolic waves and lay down a field burst, it might respond.
ANNOTATION: (the phaser shot turns the cane head into a writhing snake's head)
TROI: The ophidian the aliens were carrying.
ANNOTATION: (it sends off energy charges before reverting to the cane)
RIKER: What the?
ANNOTATION: (knocking on the door and frantic activity)
CARMICHAEL: Mister Pikerd! I know you're in there. Open the door!
TROI: Mrs. Carmichael.
DATA: How now, spirit. Whither wander you?
CRUSHER: Over hill, over dale, thorough bush, thorough brier,
TROI: Mrs. Carmichael, thank goodness you're here.
PICARD: We need someone to read a part. You're just in time.
CARMICHAEL: Mister Picard, I need to be talking to you.
TALMADGE: We're conveying a mediator to Seronia. I think he's the reason the Rekags fired on us. He's (breaks up)
PICARD: Captain, I'm losing you. Go ahead and beam your passengers on board. Counsellor, after you've seen to their needs will you escort them to my Ready room.
TROI: Yes, Captain.
RIKER: Cancel Red alert. Mister Worf, take the weapons offline.
WORF: Aye, sir.
DATA: Counsellor Troi has altered her appearance.
ANNOTATION: (She goes over to Alkar's table)
TROI: Am I interrupting?
LIVA: Hello, Counsellor.
TROI: You want him. I can tell. But you have nothing to give him.
ALKAR: Deanna, could I talk to you in private.
TROI: And you. You're envious of him. You pretend to support him, but secretly you want him to fail.
JARTH: That's not so.
ALKAR: Please, you must return to your quarters.
TROI: I won't. I want to be here, with you.
RIKER: Ambassador, the Counsellor and I are needed on the Bridge.
ALKAR: Of course, Commander.
ANNOTATION: (each says their personal farewell and leaves)
DATA: Mister Scott.
TROI: Goodbye.
SCOTT: Bye, bye. (a kiss on the cheek)
RIKER: Scotty.
RIKER: Yes, there is. Give it to me. They've taken me for the last few nights. If I'm right, the same thing'll happen tonight.
LAFORGE: If you had a homing device, we could track it to your location in subspace. And as soon as they send you back to the ship, we could transmit the graviton pulse and neutralise the tetryon emissions.
TROI: If they send him back. Ensign Rager still hasn't been returned.
RIKER: They're going to take me whether I want to go or not.
PICARD: Well, we could wait as long as possible for you to be returned, Number One, but when the spatial ruptures begin to threaten the ship, then we would have to transmit that graviton pulse.
DATA: However, two hours later, when it was aboard the Enterprise and no longer in danger, it repaired itself. I believe the exocomp was protecting itself. And if that is true, it has demonstrated an awareness of its environment, and an ability to adapt to that environment.
FARALLON: You're anthropomorphising these units. Like any mechanical devices, they occasionally malfunction. One time, I saw an exocomp enter a reaction chamber for no apparent reason and vaporise itself. Is that supposed to make me think it was depressed and suicidal?
TROI: Doctor, why is it so difficult for you to accept the fact that the exocomp could be alive? After all, you're talking to a living machine right now.
FARALLON: And I have nothing but the utmost respect and admiration for Doctor Soong's accomplishment. But his intention was to create an artificial life form. I created the exocomps to be tools. And there is a big difference between Data and a tool.
DATA: Doctor, there is a big difference between you and a virus, but both are alive.
RIKER: Are the Cardassians ready for a war?
NECHAYEV: I didn't say war, Commander, I said incursion. Our intelligence reports suggests that they'll try to seize one of the disputed systems along the border. We think they're gambling that the Federation won't actually go to war over one system.
TROI: Will we?
NECHAYEV: I hope we won't need to make that decision. We have decided to send the Enterprise to meet with the Cardassian representative and open talks. We're hoping that the presence of the Federation flagship on the border will send a message to their leadership about just how seriously we view the situation.
RIKER: Where's Captain Picard?
DATA: Captain on the Bridge.
JELLICO: Let him stew for a few minutes, then go in and tell him you've convinced me to meet with him one more time. Tell him I'm a loose cannon and that he needs to be more reasonable because I'm such an unreasonable man. Lemec will want to bring his own aides on board. Pretend to be worried that I'll object, and then give grudging permission for two aides, no more. Understood?
TROI: Yes, sir.
RIKER: Aye, sir.
ANNOTATION: (Jellico goes into his Ready room)
RIKER: Well, I'll say this for him. He's sure of himself.
TROI: No, he's not.
[now in "Precipice bottom"]
PICARD: The installation should be about three hundred metres this way.
CRUSHER: I don't suppose we'll be able to find another way to get back up there.
PICARD: I assure you, we will do everything possible to make you comfortable.
MORIARTY: So long as I accept the terms under which you dole out those comforts. Captain, I am a powerless man. You hold my future, my happiness, my very life in your hands. Please, consider my request.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: I understand his frustration. We created him and we created her to be the woman he loves. Surely we have some responsibility to them.
CRUSHER: It's very romantic, but until we know just what it was that walked off the holodeck, I don't think we should be trying it again.
BARCLAY: Even if we decided to do it, there's no guarantee that we'd be able to.
PICARD: We managed to programme the holodeck inside the holodeck, and use the same ruse that Moriarty used on us.
DATA: When he was attempting to contact the real Bridge, he was in fact speaking to a simulation.
TROI: You mean he never knew he hadn't left the holodeck?
PICARD: In fact, the programme is continuing even now inside that cube.
CRUSHER: A miniature holodeck?
BARCLAY: As far as Moriarty and the Countess know, they're half way to Meles Two by now. This enhancement module contains enough active memory to provide them experiences for a lifetime.
PICARD: They will live their lives and never know any difference.
TROI: In a sense, you did give Moriarty what he wanted.
PICARD: In a sense. But who knows? Our reality may be very much like theirs. All this might be just be an elaborate simulation running inside a little device sitting on someone's table. Well, we have a newborn star to study. Mister Barclay, you will keep that safe?
BARCLAY: Aye, sir.
TORAK: Answer their questions.
MORAG: Yes. Yes, I was there. My patrol route takes me near the station every six days. Three days ago, I hailed them. There was no response. I was concerned.
TROI: Concerned?
MORAG: Yes. I went aboard to see what had happened. There was no one was there, so I left.
RIKER: Is that all?
PICARD: Thank you. I'd like to talk to you for a moment about my future on the Enterprise.
RIKER: Of course, Lieutenant. Jean-Luc, isn't it?
TROI: Maybe I should go.
PICARD: No, please, Counsellor, I would very much like to hear your thoughts. First of all, and I would like you to be absolutely straightforward with me. How would you evaluate me as an officer?
TROI: Well, er, your performance records have always been good. You're thorough, dedicated.
RIKER: Reliable, steady, (searching desperately) punctual.
PICARD: I see. What would you say if I told you that I believed that I was capable of being very much more.
RIKER: Frankly, Lieutenant, I don't think that's realistic.
PICARD: Why?
TROI: I really don't think this is the place to be discussing this.
PICARD: Please. This is important to me. I believe that I can do more.
TROI: Hasn't that been the problem all along? Throughout your career you've had lofty goals, but you've never been willing to do what's necessary to attain them.
PICARD: Would that be your evaluation as well, Commander?
RIKER: I think I have to agree with the Counsellor. If you want to get ahead, you have to take chances, stand out in a crowd, get noticed.
DATA: Senior officers, please report to the Captain's Ready room.
RIKER: Acknowledged.
TROI: We should talk about this later.
ANNOTATION: (Riker and Troi leave)
PICARD: All right, Q, that's enough. You've made your point. Q?
PICARD: Oh, er, Geordi, Deanna. I don't think you've met our host. This is Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge, Counsellor Deanna Troi. This is Commander Hutchinson.
HUTCH: Oh, please, call me Hutch.
TROI: Hello.
HUTCH: I was just telling your captain about some of the fascinating sights here on Arkaria. Either of you interested in ornithology?
TROI: Er, well.
HUTCH: The mating habits of the Arkarian horn fowl are quite interesting. If the weather were better, we could take horses to the southern promontory and visit the nesting grounds.
PICARD: Horses?
LAFORGE: About twenty five minutes, sir.
PICARD: Then I have enough time to back to the ship and get my saddle.
TROI: Your saddle?
PICARD: Yes. A saddle is a very personal thing. It has to be broken in, used, cared for.
LAFORGE: You keep a saddle on board the Enterprise?
PICARD: Oh yes, yes. I never know when I'll have the opportunity to ride.
TROI: I see.
PICARD: It's perfectly normal. Most serious riders do have their own saddles.
TROI: Of course.
HUTCH: Absolutely.
PICARD: Well, if you'll excuse me.
DATA: I was aware of that. But are you aware that Tyrellia is one of seven known planets with no atmosphere whatsoever.
HUTCH: Really?
TROI: They're still at it.
RIKER: Non-stop. I have to admit it has a certain strange fascination. How long can two people talk about nothing?
ANNOTATION: (Geordi is helping himself to the buffet when his visor picks up something.)
POMET: Understood.
[now in "Arkaria base"]
ANNOTATION: (Hutch is covered in a purple curtain)
TROI: They haven't tried to communicate with the outside.
RIKER: No demands, no political statements, no theft. They must want something.
TROI: Orton is not as calm as he looks. He's very agitated and nervous, as if something's gone wrong.
DATA: It is possible that Geordi upset their timetable when he saw the hidden weapons.
RIKER: Orton may be improvising. Maybe he didn't plan to take us hostage so early and now he doesn't know what to do.
KIROS: What about Neil?
KELSEY: The sweep got him. Let's go.
[now in "Arkaria base"]
TROI: I thought you were just going to talk to him.
RIKER: I did. He just didn't like what I had to say.
ANNOTATION: (an alarm sounds, and Orton goes to a computer terminal in a recess)
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, supplemental. We have completed our mission in the nebula and are en route to a diplomatic conference on Atalia Seven. I must admit I've lost my enthusiasm for those proceedings.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: At our present speed, we will arrive at the Atalia system in thirty seven hours.
TROI: Captain, I'm going for a walk in the arboretum. I wouldn't mind some company.
WORF: Captain, a distress call from Professor Galen's shuttle. On screen.
GALEN: Enterprise! I'm being boarded.
RIKER: Right.
[now in "Corridor"]
RIKER: How's Lieutenant Suna?
TROI: A little shaken but all right.
RIKER: I feel like such an idiot.
TROI: It's nothing to be embarrassed about. We're your friends. We all know the stress you've been under. I'm sure everyone understands perfectly.
DATA: Commander, I must compliment you on your performance this evening.
RIKER: Oh?
DATA: Your unexpected choice to improvise was an effective method of drawing the audience into the plight of your character. You gave a truly realistic interpretation of multi-infarct dementia.
RIKER: Thank you.
TROI: Well, maybe not everyone understands.
RIKER: I think I'd better get a little rest. Clear my mind a little.
TROI: I want you to try a few relaxation techniques as well. Remember the ones I showed you a few months ago?
RIKER: They never seem to work for me.
SYRUS: Maybe you need another treatment.
TROI: What's wrong?
RIKER: Nothing. Nothing.
TROI: Will, I want you to get some sleep. I'll see you tomorrow.
RIKER: Okay.
[now in "Turbolift"]
ANNOTATION: (the doors open onto the asylum corridor)
OGAWA: That's a possibility, but this is very circumstantial evidence.
CRUSHER: There's only one way to know for certain.
[now in "Bridge"]
TROI: Captain, I'm concerned about Beverly. I've tried several times to talk to her, but she's been avoiding me.
PICARD: I'm not surprised.
TROI: This entire experience has been
DATA: Captain, an unscheduled launch is taking place in Shuttlebay two.
RIKER: No idea. No one's filed a flight plan.
ANNOTATION: (it's jazz night, and the quartet are in full swing, with Riker on 'bone playing 'Tell them I remember you')
RIKER: Thank you. Thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you very much. Any requests tonight?
TROI: Night Bird.
ANNOTATION: (Troi is given a Look)
RIKER: Any request?
TROI: Night Bird!
RIKER: Ladies and gentlemen, Night Bird. One, two.
CRUSHER: What was that all about?
TROI: Will's been trying to get this piece right for ten years now. He's never made it through the solo.
ANNOTATION: (he certainly looks worried)
TROI: Here it comes.
DATA: Data to Commander Riker.
RIKER: Go ahead.
RIKER: Without knowing what he did, that'll be tough.
PICARD: Perhaps he can help us. He was alone down there for a long time. I'm hesitant to let him go back until he's been evaluated.
TROI: I'll talk to him.
PICARD: Thank you, Counsellor.
[now in "Lt Riker's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (The Lieutenant is in a fresh gold uniform, and finishing a meal when the doorbell rings)
COMPUTER: Helm control activated.
[now in "Runabout living section"]
ANNOTATION: (Data joins the others for a meal. The runabout is huge, there is even a corridor between the cockpit and this area)
TROI: I was just leaving the reception when this Ktarian walks up to me and says, (slightly Irish) hello, Diane. I understand you're an empath. I'm a very sensitive man myself. I'm doing a thesis on interspecies mating rituals. Would you care to join me in some empirical research?
LAFORGE: That's a very good impression of Doctor Mizan.
TROI: How did you know?
LAFORGE: He's notorious, but he really is an expert on interspecies mating practices.
DATA: Did you help him with his research, Counsellor?
TROI: Absolutely not.
DATA: I thought it was a topic you were interested in.
LAFORGE: How did you enjoy the rest of the conference, Counsellor?
TROI: To be honest, I was bored. I spent most of my time at Professor Wagner's phylobiology seminar. I thought the idea of the seminar was that we would all participate, bring different points of views to the discussion. He gathered two hundred scientists from all over the Federation, and all he did was put us to sleep.
DATA: I have a memory record of the entire lecture, Counsellor. I can repeat the portions you missed, if you
TROI: No, thank you, Data.
PICARD: Well, it was little better at the physiognomy workshop. Doctor Vassbinder gave an hour long dissertation on the ionisation effect of warp nacelles before he realised that the topic was supposed to be psychology.
LAFORGE: Why didn't anybody tell him?
PICARD: There was no opportunity. There was no pause. (mock Teutonic) He just kept talking in one long, incredibly unbroken sentence, moving from topic to topic so that no one had a chance to interrupt. It was really quite hypnotic.
LAFORGE: Well, I had a great time. The warp-energy symposium was fascinating. I actually had an opportunity to touch a plasma field.
TROI: Really? What was it like?
LAFORGE: It was incredible. I could feel the plasma moving up my arm. It was warm and, oh, there was this amazing tingling sensation that
ANNOTATION: (Troi sees that everyone else has stopped in mid-whatever)
TROI: Captain? Data?
LAFORGE: Moved through my chest. It was incredible. It was like taking a bath in pure energy.
DATA: It was not painful?
LAFORGE: Oh, no. Counsellor? Is there something wrong?
TROI: I'm not sure.
ANNOTATION: (after the opening titles)
LAFORGE: Well, our bioscans check out. There are no physiological anomalies. If something did happen, it didn't leave any biological traces.
PICARD: How long did it appear to you that we were frozen?
TROI: I don't know. Four, maybe five seconds. You just stopped and then started again. I can't explain it.
DATA: My memory record does not indicate a pause or disruption during that time period. My internal chronometer and the ship's computer are both perfectly synchronised. There does not appear to be a temporal discrepancy.
LAFORGE: Data, let's run a ship-wide diagnostic. Maybe we missed something.
ANNOTATION: (Data and La Forge leave)
PICARD: Let's go through all this again. You were sitting there. The rest of us were here. Describe the exact moment when we appeared to freeze.
TROI: Well, Geordi was talking about what it felt like to touch the plasma field and you were taking a sip of tea.
PICARD: Did you sense something from any of us at that time? Any unusual emotion?
TROI: Not a thing. I was empathically aware of you right up to the moment you froze, and then it all stopped. (plexes) The past few days have been exhausting. Maybe it was my imagination. There were moments in that lecture hall when I thought time was standing still there, too.
PICARD: Or there is another possibility, Counsellor. This could be nothing more than simple
ANNOTATION: (Troi has a start. Picard is now next to her waving a hand in front of her face)
PICARD: Are you all right, Counsellor?
TROI: What happened?
DATA: You were motionless for three minutes eleven seconds.
PICARD: It appears to be the same effect that you described in us. Do you remember anything?
TROI: No. One second I was talking to you, and the next you were all standing around me.
LAFORGE: Wait a second. This is weird.
TROI: What is it?
LAFORGE: I had the tricorder run a comparison between the bioscan I took of you earlier and the one I took just now. In the time between the two scans, you should have aged twenty three minutes, but according to your cellular decay levels you've only aged twenty minutes.
PICARD: How do you account for this discrepancy?
PICARD: I'll check the fuel consumption logs.
[now in "Runabout living section"]
ANNOTATION: (Picard goes to the console, then smells something. The fruit in the bowl has become moldy. He reaches towards it and shouts in pain. His fingernails have grown a good half inch. The others rush in.)
TROI: What happened?
ANNOTATION: (Troi uses a medical tricorder)
PICARD: My hand.
TROI: The cells are metabolising at an incredible speed. Almost fifty times normal.
PICARD: The pain is going away.
TROI: Your metabolism's stabilising.
PICARD: It happened when I reached for the bowl of fruit.
ANNOTATION: (the fruit is now totally decayed. Data uses his tricorder)
LAFORGE: Slowing to one eighth impulse.
PICARD: There she is.
TROI: My God.
ANNOTATION: (Enterprise is hanging nose to nose with a Romulan warbird. An orange line and a green dotted line link the two ships.)
PICARD: Mister Data?
PICARD: Scan for life signs.
DATA: Sensors cannot penetrate the subspace field. I am unable to scan within the vessels.
TROI: It looks like the Enterprise has been damaged. There, on the port nacelle.
LAFORGE: The warbird doesn't look to have sustained any damage at all. I wonder if the Enterprise even had time to get off a shot.
TROI: The Romulans could've decloaked before the Enterprise had a chance to respond.
PICARD: There's a second energy beam. It's coming from the Enterprise deflector array. Do you have any idea what that could be?
DATA: It is impossible to tell from a visual inspection. However, it appears to be focused on the warbird's Engineering section.
ANNOTATION: (later)
LAFORGE: We've channelled all communications through the subspace relays in the armbands. That way we'll be able to be in continual communication.
TROI: How long will the fields last?
LAFORGE: About an hour, maybe less. Don't worry. I'll monitor you very carefully.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi switches on the armbands and Troi falls into Data's arms)
DATA: Counsellor?
TROI: I got a little dizzy for a second.
LAFORGE: We've created an artificial pocket of time around you, so it's probably playing tricks with your equilibrium. It might take a little while to get used to it. Let me know if it gets any worse.
PICARD: Beam us directly to the Enterprise Bridge.
ANNOTATION: (a Romulan is leaning over a fallen Riker)
PICARD: There are three Romulans, all of them with disruptors. One at conn. There are none of our security officers on the Bridge. They must have taken us by surprise. It appears that we can move objects in this time frame.
TROI: Maybe we could do something to help Will.
PICARD: I'm wary about making changes in this time continuum until we understand more about what's going on.
DATA: Captain, the equipment is no longer functioning. However, the information currently displayed indicates that there was a massive power surge in Engineering.
PICARD: Excuse me, Mister Worf.
ANNOTATION: (Picard moves Worf's hand)
TROI: Captain.
PICARD: Counsellor, take a look at this. It appears that Mister Worf had just beamed these three on board, and according to this, three other Romulans had been beamed directly to Sickbay just seconds earlier.
TROI: I know. I just saw them.
PICARD: What are we doing transporting Romulans on board the ship in the middle of a battle? They don't have any weapons and that one looks injured. If they were part of an invasion, then why are they unarmed? It doesn't make any sense.
TROI: Captain, there's something I have to tell you. Doctor Crusher has been hit by a disruptor blast at point blank range. If time returns to normal I don't see how she can survive.
DATA: Data to Captain Picard.
PICARD: Go ahead, Mister Data.
PICARD: Expanding? I thought that time was suspended on this ship.
DATA: We were incorrect, sir. I have determined that time is moving forward at an infinitesimal rate.
TROI: Why didn't we notice it before?
DATA: Our initial conclusion was based on our observations of the crew. A warp core breach moves at a much faster rate. The motion of the cloud is within my visual detection threshold. At its current expansion rate, it will consume the Enterprise in approximately nine hours, seventeen minutes.
PICARD: Is there anything we can do to stop it?
DATA: It is no longer a question of stopping it, sir. The explosion has already occurred. The fact that it is moving slowly changes nothing.
PICARD: Astonishing to see it frozen like this.
TROI: Do we know what caused the breach?
DATA: No. However, the console displays indicate a power transfer in progress between the Enterprise and the Romulan ship at the moment time decelerated. That is why there is a second beam between the two ships.
TROI: Why would we be sending them power?
DATA: Perhaps we should go aboard the Romulan ship. The answer to that question may
ANNOTATION: (Picard is laughing)
DATA: Captain?
ANNOTATION: (Picard has drawn a smiley face in the cloud. He laughs and points, then staggers)
TROI: Captain, are you all right?
PICARD: My head. Oh. Dizzy. I can't. (laughs then panics) No! No!
TROI: Troi to La Forge. Get us out of here now!
[now in "Runabout living section"]
LAFORGE: It looks like you weren't completely protected from the effects of the other time continuum. The neurophysical stress must've been overwhelming.
DATA: In much the same way deep sea divers experience nitrogen narcosis, you experienced a form of temporal narcosis.
LAFORGE: I don't think so. I'd say the best thing we can do right now is to be careful, limit our exposure to their time frame. I'd say no longer than ten minutes per trip. And we should stick probably stick together while we're there, just in case.
PICARD: Very well. Well, the first step is to find out why the Enterprise was transferring power to the Romulan ship. I think we should begin our search in the Romulan engine room. Counsellor, you spent several days on a Romulan vessel. You probably know more about the layouts than anyone here. Perhaps
TROI: Captain, it might be better if you stayed here this time and gave yourself a chance to recover.
PICARD: Yes, very well. I will monitor your progress from here. But just remember, ten minutes, no more.
TROI: Yes, Captain.
[now in "Warbird Engineering"]
TROI: Geordi, there should be a power utilisation monitor over there. Data.
DATA: This is highly unusual. The crew is not at battle stations. The ship is on evacuation alert.
TROI: Is that why Romulans were being transported to the Enterprise?
LAFORGE: Take a look at this. There's an energy feedback returning through the transfer beam. It's probably what overloaded the Enterprise's engines and caused the core breach.
DATA: Perhaps the warbird was trying to destroy the Enterprise.
LAFORGE: I don't think so. According to this, the Romulans were actually trying to shut down the power transfer.
TROI: Whatever happened, this is beginning to look less and less like a Romulan attack.
LAFORGE: Data, why don't we take a look at their engine readouts?
DATA: Geordi, the engine core is completely inactive.
TROI: That's impossible. The Romulans use an artificial quantum singularity as their power source. Once it's activated, it can't be shut down.
LAFORGE: Let's take a closer look.
ANNOTATION: (he opens the equivalent of the dilithium chamber)
LAFORGE: I think we've found the problem.
DATA: It appears to be a highly focused aperture in the space-time continuum. Its energy signature matches that of the temporal fragments we observed earlier. However, it is approximately one point two million times as intense. I believe this may be the origin of the temporal fragmentation.
TROI: What are these dark spots?
DATA: I am not certain. They exhibit a complex bioelectric patterns. Very possibly organic.
LAFORGE: Organic?
PICARD: Suggest what the Romulans were doing?
DATA: They may have been attempting to eject their engine core.
TROI: I thought I heard one of the Engineers say something about a power transfer. Something about an energy feedback.
LAFORGE: Yes, Captain. It looks to me like they were trying to stop whatever was happening here.
PICARD: Mister La Forge
LAFORGE: I think so, Captain. Wait. Something's not right here. Data, was this man always standing right here.
ANNOTATION: (the Romulan grabs Geordi, there's an energy flash and they both fall. Geordi is convulsing)
TROI: He's in neural shock,
DATA: We must get him to the runabout.
TROI: There isn't time. He's dying.
ANNOTATION: (she takes Geordi's armband off)
TROI: At least this way, he'll be alive in the other time frame. We might have a chance to save him later. Is the Romulan still alive?
DATA: Yes, but I am getting unusual readings from his bioscan. I am not sure he is a Romulan.
[now in "Runabout living section"]
DATA: His cellular structure does not conform to any known species. His bioelectric patterns are in a state of temporal flux. I do not believe that this being is native to our time continuum.
PICARD: Data, this could be some sort of embryo.
DATA: It is possible. If I could further scan the aperture, it might be possible to
TROI: Captain?
ANNOTATION: (the alien is awake)
ALIEN: Must save. No.
PICARD: Who are you?
ALIEN: This body is not mine. It was necessary to assume it to exist in your time.
TROI: Why are you here?
ALIEN: We had to come to save them. They were in danger.
PICARD: Who were in danger?
ALIEN: Our young. They will die in the gravity well. It is artificial.
TROI: Artificial gravity well? Do you mean the Romulan engine core?
ALIEN: Yes. Our young are trapped. We must get them out, return them to our time.
DATA: His molecular structure is destabilising.
ALIEN: We must use a natural gravity well to incubate our young. We thought the Romulan core would suffice. It did not.
DATA: Captain, I believe the aliens mistook the artificial singularity, which the Romulans use in their engine, for a natural one. A black hole. They tried to use it as a nest.
TROI: That's what deactivated the Warbird's engine core. So the Romulans sent out a distress call.
PICARD: The Enterprise responded, and found the warbird suffering from an apparent engine failure, and they attempted a power transfer.
ALIEN: Power transfer. Must stop the power transfer. Ruptured time, destroy our young
DATA: Correct, sir.
PICARD: What if we could reverse that process? Cause time move backwards and then forwards.
TROI: We might be able to run time back to a point before the warp core breach occurred and then find a way to prevent the power transfer. And then when time goes forward
PICARD: The breach never happens.
DATA: I could attempt to remodulate the tricorder's delta-band emissions. It should be possible to better control the temporal aperture.
PICARD: Yes, sir.
[now in "Troi's office"]
DATA: For the past six hours, I have attempted to produce an emotional response by subjecting myself to various stimuli.
TROI: Like what?
DATA: I listened to several operas known to be uplifting, I watched three holodeck programs designed to be humourous, and I made four attempts to induce sexual desire by subjecting myself to erotic imagery.
TROI: What happened?
DATA: Nothing.
TROI: I'm curious. Why are you ignoring the one emotion you've already experienced? Why aren't you trying to make yourself angry again?
DATA: Anger is a negative emotion. I wanted to concentrate on something more positive.
TROI: Data, feelings aren't positive and negative, they simply exist. It's what we do with those feelings that becomes good or bad. For example, feeling angry about an injustice could lead someone to take a positive action to correct it.
DATA: But my study of humanity indicates there are some emotions that are harmful, such as jealousy or hatred.
TROI: Those are very strong emotions, and you're right, very little good can come from them. But I don't think that an exploration of anger need necessarily lead to hatred or malice.
DATA: But what if it does, Counsellor? What if it turns out that those are the only emotions I am capable of experiencing? Would that not make me a bad person?
TROI: We've served together for a long time and I think I've come to know you pretty well. I have to believe if you ever reach your goal of becoming human, you won't become a bad one.
DATA: I wish I were as confident as you, Counsellor. When I was fighting the Borg, I felt angry, but when I think back on the incident, I realise that I was also experiencing another sensation. It was not the same as anger, but I think it was an emotion.
TROI: When exactly did you feel this other emotion?
DATA: It was just after I had killed the Borg. I looked down at his body. I felt something.
TROI: If you had to give this feeling a name, what would you call it?
DATA: I believe it was pleasure.
[now in "Bridge"]
RIKER: Red alert! All hands to battle stations. Lay in a course. Engage warp nine.
LAFORGE: I don't think so. There are no Borg energy signatures. But there is a door or a hatch or something about twenty metres this way.
[now in "Borg hall"]
ANNOTATION: (decorated with what is presumably the Borg symbol and a raised dais/podium at the far end)
TROI: This seems to be some kind of meeting place.
PICARD: Well, it certainly hasn't been abandoned.
LAFORGE: Something's wrong. I can't get any kind of energy signatures from these light sources.
LORE: Stop!
PICARD: Data?
TROI: That's not Data.
PICARD: What?
LORE: You should listen to her, Captain. She's way ahead of you.
DATA: Stop. Stop. Stop. It was just after I had killed the Borg, I felt something. I believe it was pleasure.
RIKER: I don't believe they were part of the Borg collective. One of them referred to himself as I.
TROI: The only Borg who had a name was Hugh.
HUGH: We are Hugh.
PICARD: He was here in this room. I could have rid the Federation of a mortal threat, and I let him go.
PICARD: I'm not particularly impressed. All you've done is teach them to enjoy killing.
DATA: You are wrong, Captain. My brother and I serve a much higher purpose.
TROI: Data, I can sense feelings in you.
DATA: Yes. My brother has made that possible.
PICARD: He gave you the chip. The one Doctor Soong made for you.
DATA: Do not try to drive a wedge between us, Captain. I am loyal to my brother.
LORE: You see, Picard? He's not your pawn anymore. I've helped him to break free, just as I've helped them. Look at them. Look at what I've helped them become. They're no longer simply mindless automatons. They're passionate. Alive.
TROI: Are you saying that you caused them to become individuals?
LORE: No, you did that. You and your friends. All I did was clean up the mess you made when that Borg you befriended returned to his ship.
DATA: Hugh interfaced with the others and transferred his sense of individuality to them. It nearly destroyed them.
PICARD: Data, you must realise that something has happened to you. The Data I know would never have agreed to be a willing party to Lore's plan.
DATA: (taking the comm. badges) I now realise that my life aboard the Enterprise was a waste. My quest to become human was misguided. An evolutionary step in the wrong direction.
TROI: Data, all I'm sensing from you is anger and hatred. Have you felt any other emotions?
DATA: There are no other emotions.
LAFORGE: Data, just because you haven't experienced certain emotions doesn't mean they don't exist. Lore is only feeding you the negative ones.
PICARD: A carrier wave? Is that how he's manipulating Data?
LAFORGE: I think what's happening is that Lore is tapping into the chip he stole from Doctor Soong and somehow he's found a way to transmit part of that emotional programme to Data.
TROI: But the only emotions Data seems to feel are negative.
LAFORGE: Yeah, I'm sure that's intentional. But in order for Data to be affected by those emotions, Lore would have had to disable his ethical programme first.
PICARD: Can we reactivate it?
PICARD: And although Lore would still be feeding him negative emotions, at least Data might listen to us.
LAFORGE: Right.
TROI: I think it's worth a try.
LAFORGE: So, got any ideas on how we generate a kedion pulse?
ANNOTATION: (Data enters and hauls Geordi to his feet)
ANNOTATION: (more injections)
DATA: They are cause for concern. However, I still have Counsellor Troi and Captain Picard. The odds are that at least one of the procedures will be successful.
[now in "Holding cell"]
TROI: Help me!
ANNOTATION: (a Borg comes to see Picard lying on the floor)
TROI: He tried to escape. The force field sent him into neural shock. If he dies, Lore will blame you.
ANNOTATION: (the innocent Borg takes down the force field and enters. He leans over Picard and gets one of his tubes pulled out, rendering him unconscious)
PICARD: See if the corridor is empty.
DATA: I will be back for him later.
ANNOTATION: (Data leaves)
TROI: Geordi, are you in pain?
LAFORGE: No. I'm just a little dizzy.
PICARD: I was able to take part of a transceiver from the guard's interlink system. I think that it uses some kind of phased-pulse technology. Do you think it could be modified to generate a kedion pulse that would reboot Data's programme?
LAFORGE: Yeah, yeah, it's possible. See if you can locate the phase modulation circuitry.
TROI: I'll watch the door.
PICARD: All right, I think I've found it.
LAFORGE: Okay, good. Now, do you see anything that we might be able to use as a flux inhibitor?
WOMAN: Good evening.
ANNOTATION: (at the buffet table)
TROI: So first thing tomorrow, I thought I'd take you on a tour of the operational centres and the residential decks of the ship. Then we could spend some time discussing the cultural underpinnings of your society.
LOQUEL: Are you going to eat?
TROI: Excuse me?
LOQUEL: You have no food on your plate. Are you going to eat?
TROI: Oh, well, actually, I was waiting until we got to the desserts.
LOQUEL: Desserts? What is this?
TROI: It's something we eat after the main course. It's usually very sweet, it's usually very bad for you. We eat it purely for pleasure. If you ask me, it's the best part of any meal.
LOQUEL: My people eat only for nourishment.
TROI: Oh, well, let me introduce you to some of my favourites. This is peach cobbler with whipped cream. Tarvokian powder cake. And this is my favourite. Ktarian chocolate puff. I don't know exactly what's inside, but I think it's made with seventeen varieties of chocolate.
ANNOTATION: (Troi gives Loquel a sample)
LOQUEL: That is, that is
TROI: Delicious?
LOQUEL: Delicious.
TROI: Ambassador, I think we're going to get along very well. Shall we?
ANNOTATION: (Loquel takes his loaded plate and a tray of small desserts with him to a table) (meanwhile, at another table, Worf and Crusher eat with Byleth)
BYLETH: This is unacceptable.
GIUSTI: Aye, sir.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
DATA: Starfleet Intelligence confirms that a ship matching this configuration has been linked to raids on several other planets in this sector. For the short time it was within our visual range, we were able to take sensor readings of the mercenary vessel. It appears to be encased in an energy absorbing material. Although we can see the ship, this energy sheath renders it virtually undetectable to our long range sensors.
TROI: There must be some way we can track it.
LAFORGE: Data, I know this is a long shot, but if I remodulate the long range sensor array, I might be able to make it sensitive enough to detect the ship.
DATA: Without a full compositional analysis of the energy sheath, the chances of finding the correct remodulation sequence are remote.
BARAN: Do it.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Commander, we are receiving some kind of signal from the mercenary ship. These are Commander Riker's access codes. He is attempting to shut down our shields.
TROI: That doesn't make any sense. He knows those codes would have been changed as soon as he was captured.
DATA: That is correct, Counsellor. He does know. Mister Worf, prepare to drop the shields.
WORF: Sir, we would be totally defenceless.
ANNOTATION: (the weapons fire definitely hits the starboard nacelle)
WORF: Direct hit to the port nacelle. Only minimal damage. Hit to the starboard nacelle. Still, no appreciable damage.
TROI: Will must've done something to their weapons.
DATA: I believe you are right, Counsellor. It is now up to us to play along. Release inertial dampers and cut power to decks thirty one through thirty seven.
GIUSTI: Aye, sir.
DATA: I am aware of the tactical situation, Lieutenant. Let them go.
ANNOTATION: (after the opening credits, at the science station)
TROI: I've gone over every word, every inflection, every facial response, and I still can't find any kind of code or hidden message.
DATA: I agree the existence of such a message is remote, but I believe we should check.
TROI: I'll keep trying.
WORF: Two starships have been sent to intercept the mercenaries at Yadalla Prime and Draken Four, in case they attempt to attack those planets.
DATA: Inform Starfleet Command that we will hold this position until further notice.
DATA: That is correct. But I believe Commander Riker wanted us to let them escape.
LAFORGE: Commander, I think I've got something. I've been studying the comm. link Commander Riker used to transmit his command codes. I didn't see anything at first, but then I ran the transmission through a subharmonic analysis. I found this. It was sent by the same carrier wave as the command codes.
TROI: It might be the message we've been looking for.
DATA: Possibly. I will attempt to resequence the signal. Begin running a search for a decryption key.
[now in "Mercenary Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (at another planet)
ANNOTATION: (transmission ends)
DATA: He seems most uncooperative.
TROI: He may have been curt, but he was also very worried and even a little scared.
WORF: Sir, may I recommend that we bring the shuttle aboard with our tractor beam, search it, and interrogate Koral.
DATA: According to the terms of the Klingon-Federation Treaty, Koral has every right to free transit through Federation space. We cannot board or search his vessel without cause.
WORF: Yes, sir. However, the Treaty does give us the right to conduct health and safety inspections of any ship in our space.
TROI: Health and safety inspections?
DATA: I am not sure that using this clause as an excuse to conduct a search would be consistent with the spirit of the Treaty.
WORF: Yes, sir.
RIKER: I haven't forgotten.
BARAN: I have an additional task for you, one that will prove your loyalty. This raid is an opportunity to get rid of Galen. Once you've found that artefact, kill him.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: I'm sure the health and safety inspection won't last much longer. And in the meantime, I'm really glad that we have this opportunity to get to know you. May I ask what business you're in?
ANNOTATION: (silent stare)
DATA: Lieutenant Worf has programmed our replicators to make a very good approximation of Klingon bloodwine. I believe you will find it to your liking.
ANNOTATION: (Riker shoots at Picard and misses. Picard doesn't miss)
PICARD: Is he dead?
TROI: Yes.
PICARD: Good. Activate the transporter.
ANNOTATION: (the raiding party beam out)
DATA: Security alert. Medical emergency team to the Observation lounge. Data to Bridge. Raise shields and begin sensor sweeps for the mercenary ship.
GIUSTI: Aye, sir.
TROI: He's all right. He's only stunned.
DATA: I must admit, I am experiencing a similar sensation.
RIKER: This is going to take a little time to explain.
ANNOTATION: (Data is closely gazing at Spot lying on the bed when the doorbell rings)
DATA: Enter.
TROI: Hello, Data.
DATA: Counsellor.
TROI: What are you doing?
DATA: I have been watching Spot sleep. In the past fifteen minutes, he has had twelve muscles spasms, which indicates he was dreaming. I have often wondered what Spot dreams about. His twitching and his rapid breathing would seem to suggest anxiety, but Spot has never seen a mouse or any other form of rodentia. He has never encountered an insect, or been chased by a canine.
TROI: I understand you've had some interesting dreams recently. Geordi was worried about you and he wanted me to check in and see how you were doing.
DATA: That was very thoughtful of him. I've been debating whether or not to initiate another dream sequence.
TROI: Because of the nightmares?
DATA: I have found them to be quite unsettling.
TROI: Data, you shouldn't be afraid of dark imagery in your dreams. It's a natural expression of your unconscious, if you have an unconscious. I'm not really sure how your positronic brain works but if it's anything like ours, then there's part of you that's trying to express itself through your dream state. And I think you should allow yourself to experience it. As Sigmund Freud said, dreams are the royal road to the knowledge of the mind.
DATA: Thank you, Counsellor. I believe I will initiate a dream programme now.
TROI: Let me know how it goes. Goodnight, Data.
DATA: Goodnight, Counsellor. Goodnight, Spot.
ANNOTATION: (Data plumps the pillow, gets under the sheet fully clothed, kicking Spot off, and approximates a yawn)
WORKMAN: Be quiet!
ANNOTATION: (the workman hands Data a cake knife and beckons him forward. Troi is a torso-shaped cake with a slice cut out of her where the comm. badge would have been)
TROI: Please, don't hurt me, Data.
DATA: I am sorry, Counsellor.
TROI: No! Don't! No! No! Data!
ANNOTATION: (Data cuts into the cake)
[now in "Data's quarters"]
TROI: Data! Data!
ANNOTATION: (Data wakes to see Geordi, Worf and Troi standing over him)
DATA: What is wrong?
TROI: We've been trying to wake you up for the last five minutes.
LAFORGE: When you didn't show up on time in Engineering, I got worried.
DATA: My internal chronometer was supposed to wake me thirty five minutes ago.
ANNOTATION: (Data is still holding the brace coil)
DATA: Everything seems to remind me of the nightmare. Objects, sounds, smells. And now I have seen elements of the dream in a waking state. I cannot explain it.
TROI: Data, if you were one of my human patients, I might be concerned right now. I'd say you had a waking dream or an hallucination. But you're not human. I think we might be looking at some kind of technological problem.
DATA: I have run three complete self diagnostics. All of my systems are functioning normally. Perhaps Doctor Freud was correct. The knife I dreamed about is the embodiment of my unconscious desire to inflict violence.
TROI: Data, even Freud said, sometimes a cigar is just a cigar. But the bottom line is, I think you're developing an almost obsessive interest in your own inner workings. I'd almost call it the beginnings of a neurosis.
DATA: That is not possible.
TROI: Why not? You've eliminated all the technical explanations. And it makes sense that as your neural net becomes more complex, more human, that you might experience the same kind of psychological complexities as a human.
DATA: Do you really think it is possible?
TROI: Data, you must be the first person who's come into my office and been excited at the prospect of a new neurosis. But yes, I do think it's possible, and I'd like to start counselling you on a regular basis.
DATA: Daily?
TROI: No, we'll start weekly. And as a first step, I'd like you to shut down your dream programme until our next session, just to be on the safe side. Give yourself a chance to reflect on this experience.
DATA: Thank you, Counsellor. I look forward to our next meeting.
TROI: And Data? Next time, see me before you see Sigmund.
[now in "Ready room"]
PICARD: Admiral, I can explain.
NAKAMURA: Let me guess. Your new warp core is malfunctioning again?
LAFORGE: Good work, Tyler. I thought he'd never leave. Data, I want you to give me a hand locking down this plasma conduit. Data? Data?
[now in "Corridor"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi has the feeling she's being followed)
[now in "Turbolift"]
TROI: Deck thirty six.
ANNOTATION: (Data stops the doors closing)
TROI: Hello, Data. Are you all right?
ANNOTATION: (Data stares at her shoulder and raises the 'knife')
TROI: What are you doing?
DATA: Hold very still, Counsellor.
TROI: No!
ANNOTATION: (and Data stabs her)
[now in "Corridor"]
WORF: Ever since you gave Alexander that music programme, he's been playing it all night, every night.
ANNOTATION: (Troi enters, carrying a covered dish)
DATA: Counsellor. I did not have a chance to apologise for my actions.
TROI: Data, don't worry about it. Geordi explained everything to me. It wasn't your fault. But somehow I thought turnabout would be fair play, so I made us a little something to snack on.
ANNOTATION: (she uncovers a cake shaped like Data, and hands him the knife)
DATA: I wonder, what would Doctor Freud say about the symbolism of devouring oneself?
TROI: Data, sometimes a cake is just a cake.
LWAXANA: Don't worry. The Cairn couldn't read your thoughts even if they wanted to. Your brain isn't sophisticated enough. (to Riker) Neither is yours, dear. They can only communicate with other telepaths. Have either of you seen Deanna?
RIKER: She was working, but she said she would be (doors open) Speak of the devil.
TROI: Sorry I'm late. I lost track of the time.
LWAXANA: Deanna, dear, come with me. I want you to meet the senior diplomat of the Cairn delegation. Maques, this is the beautiful daughter I've been telling you about. Deanna.
MAQUES: Pleased to. Hello.
TROI: Hello. Pleased to meet you.
MAQUES: Oh, yes, that is it. Pleased to meet you, Deanna.
LWAXANA: Good. Well, I'll just let you young people chat.
ANNOTATION: (Lwaxana takes Hedril and moves off)
TROI: Well, Maques, what do you think of the Enterprise?
MAQUES: It is beautiful. Comfortable, also.
TROI: I'm glad you think so.
MAQUES: There is another word that describes it. But I cannot remember.
TROI: You've learned a great deal in a very short time. I'm sure it won't be long before your words do justice to your thoughts.
MAQUES: Your mother told me of your need.
TROI: Need?
MAQUES: A moment. Husband. You need a husband. I need a wife.
[now in "Corridor"]
LWAXANA: Deanna! Good morning. So what did you think of Maques?
LWAXANA: Get away from her!
[now in "Sickbay"]
TROI: No!
[now in "Observation lounge"]
TROI: Hedril, I asked your father to bring you here because I wanted to talk to you about something. You know that Lwaxana's sick, don't you?
HEDRIL: Yes. Is it my fault?
TROI: No, not at all. But I believe that she's been thinking about you. Do you know why?
HEDRIL: I make her sad.
TROI: Why do you say that?
HEDRIL: Because it's true.
TROI: Do you have any idea why Hedril would make my mother sad?
MAQUES: No.
TROI: Well, thank you for coming to talk to us. I'll see you later, all right?
HEDRIL: Counsellor, I hope your mother gets better.
TROI: Thank you, Hedril. So do I.
ANNOTATION: (Hedril and Maques leave)
TROI: I just don't understand how she fits in to all this.
CRUSHER: And I haven't found a physiological cause for what's happened to your mother, which makes me feel that Maques was right when he said that your mother's condition was precipitated by a traumatic event.
PICARD: Could this event have involved Hedril?
TROI: I don't think so. My mother never mentioned her.
CRUSHER: Does your mother keep personal logs or a journal?
TROI: Yes, she does. I'll contact Mister Homn on Betazed and ask him to transmit a copy as soon as possible. There may be some clues there.
DATA: Perhaps we are being too literal. I have recently learned in my study of dream analysis that people who appear in a dream can sometimes represent different aspects of the person who is dreaming.
TROI: That's right. A child might represent vulnerability. Hedril may depict some fragile part of my mother.
PICARD: A part that she's protecting. You said that everything you encountered when you were in her mind was a barrier of one kind or another.
TROI: Yes. You, the wolf, my father. It was though she were summoning all her defences to keep me away. But keep me away from what? What is she protecting?
[now in "Troi's quarters"]
ANNOTATION: (a box containing, amongst other things, a carving, a silver case containing a lock of dark hair, and a picture of her father)
TROI: Come in.
WORF: Could we send out reconnaissance probes to supplement the sensors?
LAFORGE: They won't be very effective. The interference will make it difficult to maintain contact with the probes. The best we can do is to increase sensor efficiency. We've installed multiphase buffers on all the sensor modules, Captain. It should help a little.
TROI: Hekaras Two is inhabited, isn't it? Maybe they've had contact with the Fleming.
RIKER: They haven't. I've already spoken to the Hekaran government. According to them, only one ship has passed through the system in the last week. It was a Ferengi trader.
CRUSHER: The Fleming was carrying a supply of rare biomimetic gel, which is very valuable. Is it possible that the Ferengi might have hijacked it?
DATA: I am not certain. I understand why my father felt as he did, but his wishes are not necessarily paramount. I am more concerned with what would be best for her.
CRUSHER: Wouldn't she be better off knowing the truth? Dealing with the reality of her existence?
TROI: I don't think so. She's believed she's human all her life. The truth might be devastating to her.
PICARD: Data, there might come some time in the future when she would find out anyway. Another accident, perhaps. Maybe it would be easier for her if she learned the truth from you.
CRUSHER: I can tell you that if I were in her place, I would rather be told by my son than by some stranger.
DATA: I find I am having difficulty separating what would be best for her from what would be best for me.
TROI: What do you mean?
DATA: If she knew she were an android, we would have something to share. I would no longer be alone in the universe.
TROI: I know how much that means to you, Data, but at the same time, by telling her you're robbing her of the one thing you've wanted all your life. To be human.
PICARD: It's a difficult choice. You must do what you think best, Data. But whatever decision you make, we will support it.
[now in "Sickbay"]
ANNOTATION: (Data puts the chip back in her head and covers it over with her hair. She wakes.)
ANNOTATION: (Worf blows out the candles)
WORF: That was not a Klingon song.
TROI: It wasn't easy to translate. There doesn't seem to be a Klingon word for jolly.
CRUSHER: It's traditional for the birthday boy to cut the cake.
RIKER: Captain Picard sends his birthday wishes. He was needed on the Bridge.
DATA: Yes. I have entered my Expressionistic phase. This is my interpretation of the Battle of HarOS.
WORF: The Battle of HarOS?
TROI: I think it's wonderful. And I know just where to put it.
WORF: What are you doing?
ANNOTATION: (Riker takes down the brass shield, and Troi hangs the big bright canvas to the left of the door)
TROI: I always thought this room could use a little more colour.
LAFORGE: Nice. The Battle of HarOS, right?
ANNOTATION: (Worf sways)
ANNOTATION: (the inside of the cake is yellow)
WORF: I thought the cake was chocolate.
TROI: Don't I wish. This is from Alexander. He gave it me just before he left to visit your parents. (takes cake) Thank you.
ANNOTATION: (Worf unwraps a plaster cast)
LAFORGE: What is it, Worf?
WORF: It is a cast of Alexander's forehead. The ridges of a warrior.
TROI: He wished he could have been here when you got back from shore leave. You should have seen him, Worf. He stayed up all night talking about how proud he was of his father.
WORF: Thank you for watching him while I was away.
TROI: Oh, it was my pleasure.
PICARD: So, how old are you, Mister Worf?
WORF: Captain, I was told you could not attend.
RIKER: Mister Data?
[now in "Ten Forward"]
WORF: Excuse me, Counsellor. Do you have a moment?
TROI: Of course.
WORF: I have been meaning to speak with you about Alexander.
TROI: Oh?
WORF: It has never been easy for me having Alexander on board. I have always tried to be a good father, to give him guidance, but he seems to have his own mind about some things.
TROI: Most children do.
WORF: I could not have come this far without your help. Alexander looks up to you. At times, I have felt that you are like a mother to him.
TROI: Worf, that's one of the nicest things anyone's ever said to me.
WORF: One time when I thought I was going to die, I asked you to watch over Alexander. I was wondering if you might consider formalising that arrangement. I want you to be Alexander's Soh-chIm.
TROI: His Soh-chIm?
WORF: You would become his surrogate mother. In case anything ever happened to me, you would be responsible for him.
TROI: I don't know what to say. It's a great honour. So, that would make me your?
WORF: The closest analogy is step-sister.
TROI: That would make my mother your step-mother.
WORF: I had not considered that. It is a risk I am willing to take.
TROI: I accept.
DATA: Lieutenant Worf, please report to Engineering.
WORF: I am on my way.
DATA: I am initiating a subspace scan to search for temporal anomalies on or off the ship.
OGAWA: Counsellor Troi, please report to Sickbay.
TROI: I'm on my way. Let me know if you find anything.
WORF: Commander, how long have I been married to Counsellor Troi?
DATA: (with blue eyes) Two years, one month and twelve days.
CRUSHER: Doctor Ogawa?
WORF: My uniform has changed. What is my rank and position?
TROI: You're a Commander and First Officer.
WORF: Are we still married?
TROI: Yes.
DATA: I am detecting a quantum flux in your cellular RNA.
WORF: What does that mean?
DATA: I have an explanation, sir.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
DATA: I believe the quantum fissure we discovered is a fixed point across the space time continuum. A keyhole which intersects many other quantum realities.
TROI: What do you mean, quantum realities?
DATA: For any event, there is an infinite number of possible outcomes. Our choices determine which outcomes will follow. But there is a theory in quantum physics that all possibilities that can happen, do happen in alternate quantum realities.
WORF: And somehow I have been shifting from one reality to another.
DATA: That is correct.
TROI: How did this happen?
DATA: When Worf's shuttlecraft came into contact with the quantum fissure, I believe its warp engines caused a small break in the barriers between quantum realties. Worf was thrown into a state of quantum flux. He immediately shifted into other realities.
CRUSHER: And Geordi's visor somehow triggered that effect?
RIKER: Red Alert.
WORF: Sir, the Bajorans?
TROI: Ever since the Bajorans overpowered the Cardassian Empire, they've become more and more aggressive.
RIKER: Yesterday they destroyed one of our subspace telescopes because they thought we were using it to spy on them.
WESLEY: They're charging their weapons, sir.
CRUSHER: I can, and I have. I've decided to stay on Caldos and become a healer like my grandmother. It's a proud Howard tradition and I've decided to uphold it. Energise. I've resigned my commission, so unless you plan on kidnapping me?
ANNOTATION: (Picard nods and she is beamed away)
[now in "Ready room"]
TROI: Beverly was attracted to Ronin in a very intense and intimate way. I warned her that it was all very sudden but she didn't want to talk about it, so I let her alone. I sensed that she was holding something back, that she wasn't telling me the whole truth.
PICARD: Do you think this Ronin could be exerting some sort of influence over her? That it's because of him that she's staying?
TROI: It's possible. But she may really believe she's in love with him.
PICARD: This is a rash decision, ill considered. It's not like Beverly at all.
TROI: I agree, but she does have the right to make that choice, even if we don't feel it's a good one.
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
PICARD: Come.
RIKER: We don't know much about what happened either. Apparently you saved an entire village from radiation poisoning.
CRUSHER: And you were a very special friend to a little girl.
TROI: Well, if you'll excuse me, I have the Bridge this watch.
DATA: Counsellor, have you been promoted in my absence?
TROI: That's right. Which means from now on you can call me sir.
TROI: (to a girl) That's very good. (to a boy) Well, that's very nice.
ERIC: No, it isn't. I just can't get it right. Do you think the wings are too big?
TROI: Not at all. Birds have wings of all sizes, Eric. And you shouldn't worry about making it look perfect.
ERIC: But Mrs Narsu said we should try to make our sculptures as realistic as possible.
TROI: She's right. It is important that you be able to make the clay take the shape you want it to have, but you're not supposed to be concentrating on technique today. I'm here to help you focus on the feelings you want to convey with your sculpture. For instance, what do you think about when you see a bird?
ERIC: Flying?
TROI: Fine. So, make your sculpture make me think of flying, too.
ANNOTATION: (She moves on to the big kid in the class)
TROI: How's it going, Data?
DATA: I have finished.
ANNOTATION: (it's a perfect PADD)
DATA: The dimensions are accurate to within one point three percent.
TROI: I'm sure they are. Data, you obviously don't have a trouble with realism, but you're here to work on your imagination. Maybe you should try something a little more abstract. Here. I want you to start a new piece. I'd like you to sculpt music.
DATA: Counsellor, music is a collection of acoustic vibrations. How can I reproduce a sound with clay?
TROI: Well, think of the effects that sounds have on people, the images that music brings to your mind, and then give it a form.
ANNOTATION: (he quickly forms a treble clef)
TROI: It's a start.
RIKER: Riker to Data. Please report to the Bridge.
DATA: Acknowledged, sir. On my way.
CRUSHER: Well, you'll figure it out later. Come on, we're going to be late.
ANNOTATION: (Troi and Crusher leave, and a compass rose appears on the top stone)
[now in "Classroom"]
TROI: (to a child) That's nice. Data, this is amazing. How did you come up with this?
ANNOTATION: (Data has made a half-face mask with a compass rose motif on the forehead)
DATA: I followed your advice, Counsellor. I used my imagination.
TROI: That's an understatement.
DATA: For some reason, as I was shaping the clay, the image of the mask was exceptionally clear in my mind. The design seemed to flow quite naturally.
TROI: Data, have you been in my quarters?
DATA: No, Counsellor.
TROI: Somebody left an object in my room. Some kind of artefact, and it has something very similar to this. And you don't know anything about it?
DATA: I do not.
ERIC: Excuse me, Counsellor. Can you help me with my terminal? It's not working right.
TROI: Let's get out of here.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: Do you remember anything else?
TROI: Yes, I think I do. There was a tool crate on the floor. It was labeled Utopia Planitia.
DATA: The shipyard where the Enterprise was built.
PICARD: Clearly this was much more than an empathic echo. It seems that you were actually seeing something that happened in the control room eight years ago.
TROI: Everyone was looking directly at me, but it was as though I was seeing through someone else's eyes.
DATA: Lieutenant Kwan was partially empathic.
CRUSHER: Maybe you were seeing it through his eyes?
TROI: It's possible, but I don't see how it could have happened.
PICARD: Well, putting that on one side for the moment, let's assume that by some unexplained phenomenon, you witnessed an event that occurred to Lieutenant Kwan. Those faces that you saw. Did you recognise any of them?
TROI: I've never seen the woman before, or the man who was with her. But there was someone else there. A man. He was staring at me in the most peculiar way. I think he had reddish hair. And he did seem familiar to me. But it's all so hazy. It's like trying to remember a dream.
PICARD: There was a woman who was frightened. And then you saw her again, laughing, presumably at Lieutenant Kwan.
CRUSHER: What does it all mean?
TROI: I don't know, but something terrible happened in there. I felt it.
PICARD: Counsellor, I want you to look through the personnel files of Utopia Planitia. See if you can recognise any of those faces.
TROI: If only I could go back to the control room without being overwhelmed by the experience. It might help me remember some detail that might be relevant.
CRUSHER: I could give you an inhibitor that would slow the brain's production of psilosynine. That might be able to suppress your empathic abilities and make the experience more manageable. It would take about sixteen hours to synthesise the inhibitor.
TROI: I'd like to try that.
PICARD: Very well, Counsellor.
[now in "Bridge"]
ANNOTATION: (Troi is ploughing through personnel files on the science station - Guy Vardeman is masquerading as Darien Wallace)
WORF: I think I know what's wrong.
[now in "Nacelle control"]
LAFORGE: Counsellor, you okay?
TROI: I'm fine. The inhibitor seems to be working. Have you found anything?
LAFORGE: No, nothing unusual.
TROI: I don't remember seeing these during my empathic experience. Have they been here since the ship was built?
DATA: No, they were installed two years ago.
ANNOTATION: (Troi goes up the ladder to the nacelle proper)
TROI: Geordi, I remember seeing a plasma conduit right there.
LAFORGE: The main ODN line runs right behind that panel. It lifts out so you can get to it.
NARA: Kwan was working on that conduit the day before he died.
TROI: Can you open it?
LAFORGE: Sure. It'll take just a minute.
ANNOTATION: (he goes downstairs.)
LAFORGE: Data.
TROI: Lieutenant Nara, may I ask you something? The work Lieutenant Kwan was doing, was it unusual in any way?
NARA: He was refitting a field coil, but it was probably the first time that particular panel's been opened since the ship was built.
TROI: Thank you.
[now in "Injector room"]
ANNOTATION: (Geordi removes the panel)
WOMAN: No!
ANNOTATION: (Troi sees Pierce in his UP coverall)
LAFORGE: Counsellor, are you all right?
TROI: Something happened when you removed the panel. There's something in there.
DATA: I am getting readings that indicate organic material embedded in this wall.
LAFORGE: Organic? You're right. Let me reconfigure the emitter beam. We might be able to see what it is. There.
ANNOTATION: (Troi hugs Worf with relief and joy)
[now in "Observation lounge"]
WORF: I opened the maintenance door at Counsellor Troi's request, then turned to see her standing too close to the force field.
TROI: It all seemed so real to me. I can't believe that everything I experienced happened in just those few seconds.
DATA: It appears Counsellor was correct. Pierce was partially telepathic. His maternal grandmother was born on Betazed.
PICARD: What else have you found out?
DATA: According to Starfleet records, Pierce and the other persons Counsellor Troi identified, were killed in an accidental plasma discharge eight years ago. Their bodies were never found.
TROI: I don't believe it was an accident. I think Lieutenant Pierce found out the other two were having an affair. He lost control and he killed them both. Afterwards, he probably activated the plasma stream and then threw himself into it.
WORF: The plasma discharge would have obliterated any evidence that it was murder.
ANNOTATION: (La Forge enters)
LAFORGE: I scanned behind the panel Counsellor Troi asked me to. I didn't find any bone fragments but I did find some traces of cellular residue showing some kind of psionic signature.
TROI: It may be that when Lieutenant Pierce was struck by the plasma stream, the subspace energy present there imprinted his empathic pattern into the residue.
LAFORGE: Kind of like a psychic photograph.
TROI: That's what triggered my hallucination. My mind must have taken elements from my own life and then created a situation that in many ways mirrored what happened to Pierce. If you hadn't been there, I would have jumped just like he did.
[now in "Bridge"]
WORF: Counsellor. When I pulled you from the plasma stream, you seemed surprised I was alive.
TROI: Well, actually, in my hallucination, you were killed.
DATA: The resonance signature indicates that there is magnesite ore present.
RIKER: Then we're too late. The sisters have already been here.
TROI: Somehow I doubt the Yridians are going to be forthcoming about where they might have gone.
DATA: Sir, readings indicate that there are only five hundred kilograms of ore in the Yridian hold.
WORF: There should be over ten thousand kilograms.
RIKER: Once we verify the purity of your ore, we'll beam over the gel.
ANNOTATION: (transmission ends)
TROI: You're up to something.
RIKER: Have the transporter room beam the ore to these coordinates.
DATA: Sir, that would place the ore directly off the ship's starboard bow.
WORF: A Klingon bird of prey.
RIKER: Put a tractor beam on it.
TROI: How did you know?
RIKER: The Yridians had only part of the shipment in their hold. I realised we had arrived before they had completed the transfer.
WORF: The Klingon ship is hailing us.
DATA: Unlikely as it may sound, I believe that the Enterprise may be forming an intelligence.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
DATA: This is a synaptic map of the human neo-cortex. This is a cross section of my positronic net. And this is a schematic of the connection nodes linking the ship's systems. I believe some sort of neural matrix is forming on the ship. It is still relatively primitive, but it is an intelligence nonetheless.
TROI: How could that happen?
DATA: I believe it is an emergent property.
PICARD: Explain.
PICARD: Processing centre?
DATA: Yes, sir. A focal point where all the ideas and instincts of this emerging intelligence are first expressed in some form.
TROI: Almost like an imagination. Captain, I'd like to go to the holodeck. I could interact with the characters and maybe find some clues to help us understand what's happening.
PICARD: Very well. Mister Data, Mister Worf, I want you to go along. See if you can to re-establish control of the ship without damaging the nodes. If the ship is truly an emerging intelligence, then we have a responsibility to treat it with the same respect as any other being.
[now in "Holodeck - train"]
WORF: Welcome aboard, Counsellor.
RUSTIC: Not yet, but we're gettin' close.
WORF: Do you recognise it?
TROI: No.
WORF: I would like to help. Tell me. What exactly are you making?
RUSTIC: What do you think we're making? A puzzle!
RUSTIC: Well, I don't know.
ANNOTATION: (Troi goes to the card game)
TROI: Can you deal me in?
GANGSTER: Sorry. It's a two man game.
ANNOTATION: (Troi reaches for the brick)
GANGSTER: Hey! Get your hand off of that.
TROI: Is that why you killed the Engineer? To get this brick?
GANGSTER: I had to get it back. You know how much it's worth, lady? Plenty. And I got to get it to Keystone City.
TROI: Why? What's at Keystone City?
GANGSTER: That's where everything begins. Gin.
ANNOTATION: (his five cards all show the jigsaw)
CONDUCTOR: Well then I'm sure you wouldn't mind showing me your tickets? Right. Sorry, boys. You're getting off right here.
GANGSTER: This is my stop.
TROI: Wait. What happens at Keystone City? Why are you taking the brick there?
GANGSTER: Excuse me.
TROI: I think we should follow that man. That brick may be an important clue.
[now in "Holodeck - subway"]
ANNOTATION: (the Gangster goes up the subway steps from the New York City Transit System at Broadway + 7th)
TROI: Where did he go?
ANNOTATION: (they walk down the empty street to a manhole cover)
DATA: I can access the power grid here. I will attempt to depolarise the grid by using a low frequency inversion field. It may disengage the nodes without destroying them.
TROI: There he is. I'm going after him.
ANNOTATION: (Worf goes with her, leaving Data alone. Sunshine taxi registration H20638 hurtles round the corner and drives straight at him. Data rolls out of the way and carries on his work)
[now in "Holodeck - wall"]
ANNOTATION: (the Gangster comes to a building with scaffolding, and a wall where there is one brick missing from the middle)
PICARD: Picard here. What's going on?
LAFORGE: I wish I could tell you.
[now in "Holodeck - building site"]
TROI: That man said he was laying a foundation.
WORF: Foundation for what?
TROI: Troi to Data
DATA: Data here.
TROI: How are you doing?
[now in "Holodeck - street"]
DATA: I encountered a minor difficulty, Counsellor, but it has been dealt with.
ANNOTATION: (he is holding the revving taxi with one hand)
ANNOTATION: (the Conductor pulls the brake lever and everyone gets thrown around)
[now in "Holodeck- train"]
WORF: Are you all right?
TROI: Yes. What happened?
WORF: The Conductor accidently derailed the train.
DATA: Data to Captain Picard.
ANNOTATION: (everything's back to normal)
RUSTIC: Whoo wee, that was a close one, wasn't it?
TROI: Where are we going now?
RUSTIC: Well, New Vertiform City, of course.
DATA: Data to Captain.
DATA: How did the Conductor stop the train?
WORF: There is a braking lever in the engine room.
TROI: Let's go.
RUSTIC: Sorry, folks, but you ain't going nowhere.
[now in "Bridge"]
LAFORGE: I've narrowed the search to the MacPherson Nebula, which is a supernova remnant, and Dikon Alpha, which is a class nine pulsar. They're both fairly close to our current flight path and either one could produce vertion particles if we detonated a modified photon torpedo inside it.
CRUSHER: I just scanned his temporal lobe and compared it to the scan I performed just a few minutes before. There's a thirteen percent increase in the acetylcholine of the hippocampus. Within a matter of minutes, you have accumulated over two days worth of memories.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: Counsellor, do you remember when I first came on board the Enterprise?
TROI: Yes.
PICARD: What happened after the welcoming ceremony?
TROI: There was a reception in Ten Forward. I introduced you to Worf and the other senior officers.
PICARD: Do you have any memory of my calling Red Alert in Spacedock? Do you remember Starfleet diverting us from Farpoint to the Neutral Zone to investigate a spatial anomaly?
TROI: No.
DATA: It would appear there is a discontinuity between the time periods you described. Events in one time period would seem to have no effect on the other two.
RIKER: And yet in both the past and the present there's a report of the same anomaly in the Devron System. I find it hard to believe that that's a coincidence.
PICARD: These are all very important questions, and perhaps I will find answers to them in the past, but now we have a potentially dangerous threat from the Romulans. I want all departments to present a battle readiness report to me at oh eight hundred hours tomorrow morning. Dismissed.
RIKER: Deanna, it's going to be a late night. Would you like to have some dinner first?
TROI: Actually I, we have plans.
RIKER: Oh. I see. I'm sorry. I'll see you in the morning.
WORF: Goodnight, sir.
OBRIEN: Who, sir?
PICARD: Q! We're here! This has gone on long enough! Counsellor, do you sense an alien presence?
TROI: No, sir.
WORF: What is a Q?
YAR: It's a letter of the alphabet, as far as I know.
PICARD: Normally I would agree with you, but this time I feel that somehow it is different. There was a deadly earnestness about him. I think he's serious. Which means that in some fashion, I am going to be the cause of the destruction of humanity.
CRUSHER: But didn't Q say you already had caused it?
TROI: And that you were causing it now?
DATA: Given the fact that there is an apparent discontinuity between the three time periods the Captain has visited, Q's statement may be accurate, if confusing.
PICARD: So what am I going to do? Lock myself in a room in all three different time periods?
RIKER: Captain, maybe not acting is what causes the destruction of mankind. What if you were needed on the Bridge at a key moment, and you weren't there?
TROI: I don't think we can start second guessing ourselves. I think we have to proceed normally and deal with each situation as it occurs.
PICARD: Agreed. I've been thinking about my conversation with Q. He admitted that he was responsible for my shifting through time. Now it occurred to me that he might be giving me a chance somehow to save humanity.
RIKER: What makes you say that?
DATA: We are approaching the Devron system, Captain. Sensors are picking up a large subspace anomaly directly ahead.
PICARD: All stop. On screen. Then it is larger in the past.
TROI: Sir?
PICARD: Nothing. Full scan, Mister Data.
DATA: Aye, sir.
CRUSHER: Our cellular structures appear to be coalescing, reverting to earlier forms. In some cases, this has caused old injuries to be healed, but the effect is only temporary. Eventually, may kill all of us.
[now in "Observation lounge"]
PICARD: We have to find out how widespread this effect is. Contact Starbase Twenty three, that's the nearest outpost. Have them check their personnel to see if there are any signs of temporal reversion.
TROI: Aye, sir.
PICARD: Mister Data, how close are you to completing the tachyon scan?
DATA: Approximately one hour forty five minutes, sir.
DATA: I am preparing to initiate a static warp shell.
OBRIEN: Course laid in, sir.
TROI: All decks report ready, sir.
PICARD: Take us in, Chief.
[now in "Bridge"]
DATA: Captain, I have an idea. If we take the ship to the centre of the anomaly and create a static warp shell
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
RIKER: Come in.
TROI: Am I too late?
RIKER: Of course not. Pull up a chair.
TROI: What's the game?
DATA: Five card draw, deuces wild.
ANNOTATION: (doorbell)
DATA: Would you care to deal, sir?
PICARD: Oh, er, thank you, Mister Data. Actually, I used to be quite a card player in my youth, you know. I should have done this a long time ago.
TROI: You were always welcome.
WORF: Romulan ale should be illegal.
LAFORGE: It is.
TROI: That was a lovely toast.
PICARD: It was from the heart.
TROI: And you needn't worry. I'm going to brief your new counselor on everything she needs to know.
PICARD: Like I know you are! You already know too much about me, ...but I take it there will be no speeches during the ceremony on Betazed?
RIKER: No, no speeches and ...no clothes.
WORF: ...Irving Berlin!
DATA: 'Nothing but blue skies do I see...'
[now in "Enterprise-E bridge"]
TROI: It's tradition, Worf! You of all people should appreciate that.
WORF: I will not do it!
PICARD: Won't do what, Mister Worf?
CAPTAINS LOG: Captain's log, stardate 56844.9. The Enterprise has arrived at Romulus and is waiting at the designated coordinates. All our hails have gone unanswered. We've been waiting for seventeen hours.
[now in "Enterprise-E bridge"]
PICARD: Counselor?
TROI: They're out there, sir.
WORF: Captain, I recommend we raise shields.
PICARD: Not yet, Mister Worf.
LAFORGE: Emergency forcefields are holding.
RIKER: Evacuate those decks and reroute field power to forward shields.
TROI: Captain, I think I may have a way to find them.
[now in "Scimitar bridge"]
SHINZON: Prepare a lateral run. All starboard disruptors.
ANNOTATION: (the Viceroy suddenly stiffens)
LAFORGE: The Scimitar's shields are still at seventy percent. It would make no difference, Captain.
ANNOTATION: (they watch the Scimitar through the hull breach)
TROI: What's he doing?
PICARD: He wants to look me in the eye. ...We've got him. ...He thinks he knows exactly what I'm going to do. Geordi, divert all power to the engines. Take it from life support if you have to. Give me everything you've got.
LAFORGE: Ready Captain?
PICARD: How long until he can fire?
LAFORGE: The targeting sequence should take about seven minutes, Captain. When the targeting arms are fully deployed the matrix on the bridge will relay the thalaron radiation to the firing points at the tips. No one on the Enterprise will survive.
TROI: How can he? He'll kill you.
PICARD: It's not about me anymore. Prepare for a site-to-site transport.
LAFORGE: Captain, I don't think there's a transporter...
PICARD: Data, this is something I have to do.
DATA: Sir.
TROI: Let him go.
PICARD: You have the bridge, Commander. Try and put some distance between you and the Scimitar. Now, Mister La Forge.
LAFORGE: Aye sir.
RIKER: What do you mean, 'We're not going'?
PICARD: Our orders are to patrol the Neutral Zone, in case the Romulans decide to take advantage of the situation.
TROI: The Romulans?
DATA: Captain, there has been no unusual activity along the Romulan border for nine months. It seems highly unlikely they would choose this moment to start a conflict.
CRUSHER: Does Starfleet feel we need more shakedown time?
PICARD: Mister Hawk. Pursuit course. ...Engage.
HAWK: Aye sir.
TROI: What?
PICARD: I can hear them.
CRUSHER: I have a patient here who insists on coming to the bridge.
PICARD: Life signs?
DATA: Population ...approximately nine billion. ...All Borg!
TROI: How?
PICARD: They must have done it in the past. ...They went back and assimilated Earth. ...Changed history.
CRUSHER: Then if they changed history why are we still here?
PICARD: Oh, yes. For humans, touch can connect you to an object in a very personal way. It makes it seem more real.
DATA: I am detecting imperfections in the titanium casing. Temperature variations in the fuel manifold. It's no more real to me now than it was a moment ago.
TROI: Would you three like to be alone?
PICARD: What have you found out?
TROI: There's no sign of Cochrane anywhere in the complex.
PICARD: He has to be here. There was nothing more important to him than this ship. This flight. It was his dream.
TROI: Captain, we should consider the possibility that Doctor Cochrane was killed in the attack.
PICARD: Huh. If that's true then the future may die with him.
[now in "Enterprise-E engineering"]
EIGER: What do you think?
DATA (OC): Re-routing the transport grid to avoid detection was wise, sir. However the transporter is rarely used after oh two hundred hours.
ANNOTATION: (Geordi and Riker (in uniform), Troi, Worf, Crusher and Data (in civilian clothes) descend on a lift)
TROI: Taking the Captain's yacht out for a spin?
WORF: Seven metric tons of ultritium explosives, eight tetryon pulse launchers, ten isomagnetic disintegrators.
RIKER: Looks like you're planning on doing some hunting?
LAFORGE: I'll be in engineering.
RIKER: RED ALERT! All hands. Battle stations!
[now in "Ba'ku planet foothills"]
TROI: And have you noticed how your boobs have started to firm up?
CRUSHER: Not that we care about such things in this day and age.
TROI: Uh huh.
CRUSHER: Thank you, Data.
WORF: I have an odd craving for the blood of a live Kolar beast. This environment must be affecting me again.
WORF: Worf to Picard!
CRUSHER: Two life signs, ...one of them is extremely faint.
TROI: There are almost four metric tons of rock blocking our way.
ANNOTATION: (she aims a phaser at the rock fall)
WORF: No! That might cause another cave-in.
ANNOTATION: (Enterprise D has arrived at the Devolin system's asteroid field.)
DATA: Data to Counsellor Troi.
TROI: Yes, Data.
DATA: I was wondering if this might be an appropriate time to continue our discussion on the long-term effects of space travel on my positronic net.
TROI: Can I give you a rain check?
DATA: You may check me for rain if you like, Counsellor, but I assure you there is no water in my
ANNOTATION: (Doorbell chimes.)
TROI: Data, I'll get back to you. Come in.
RIKER: I know it's past office hours.
TROI: What is it?
RIKER: It won't be long before they find the Pegasus.
TROI: You haven't made your decision. The holodeck?
RIKER: They rescued the Andorian's daughter.
TROI: So you're coming to the moment of truth in there, as well.
RIKER: I need you to promise you'll keep this confidential.
TROI: You know I will.
RIKER: What do you know about the Treaty of Algeron?
TROI: 2311. It redefined the Romulan Neutral Zone.
RIKER: It also outlawed the use of cloaking technology on Starfleet vessels.
TROI: The Pegasus?
RIKER: A secret group in Starfleet Security developed a prototype. Pressman was put in charge of testing it.
TROI: That's why they're so eager to find it before the Romulans do.
RIKER: The accident, the seventy one people who died, we were testing the cloaking device.
TROI: It was covered up.
RIKER: The nine of us who made it back alive were sworn to secrecy.
TROI: And you've lived with that for twelve years?
RIKER: They want to pick the experiment up where they left off.
TROI: Are you sure?
RIKER: Pressman told me himself. What they're doing is wrong. It could jeopardise the treaty.
TROI: And you want to tell that to Captain Picard.
RIKER: I took an oath of secrecy. Pressman still outranks the Captain.
TROI: Will, you didn't get this far in your career making easy decisions. I'm confident you'll make the right one now.
RIKER: I wish I was.
[now in "Galley"]
ANNOTATION: (Reed and Chef Riker are rolling pastry.)